
Jo Jorgensen
I think Japan is close. No mandatory mask wearing, etc.
“The benefits of the new pattern are increased material wealth per person, a reduction in disease, starvation, and genocide, and upward social mobility. The main drawback is the onset of a dysgenic phase that may end civilization as we know it.” Haha! No big.
So, when you find yourself irritated, respond with the question “how is the word used in the field?” Then you can ask if they know how specific scribes are using it, going down the list until they wonder where they got their own definition from.
Teenage angst is definitely a byproduct. You don’t see that among homeschoolers.
They turned his tweet, and your tweet, into a platform for moral posturing.
If you look at Hitler's early speeches you can see him honing his subject matter by what provoked the crowds, I hear.
They should do this to cops that kill people.
That’s exactly the reason I deleted Facebook off my phone: seeing the badge induced a hunger to prevent someone from thinking badly of me.
No
Yes
I take the non-Aggression principle as a psyop being pulled off by the spotless Lamb of God.
And they *are* larping. This is participatory knowing, not procedural or propositional. Inventing Rube-Goldberg-machine explanations takes all the fun out of it. Maybe a generation not yet born will come up with compelling explanations during the next Great Awakening.
The problem with that is you get into the weeds of explaining why things evolved the way they did with a mishmash of vocabularies that are mostly only understandable within their own sub domains.
There is no part of your wickedness, your craftiness, your outrageousness that's going to deliver you from this. But here is a story of someone who experienced death and lived to tell about it. More importantly, Jonah experienced how to worship when life is at an end.
For me it’s musicals with lots of dancers surrounding the main characters having a song-conversation.
Wokeism as a spiritual descent from Puritanism
The threat that we must experience death is with all of us, all the time. "No man has power to retain the spirit, or power over the day of death. There is no discharge from [that] war, nor will wickedness deliver those who are given to it" Ecclesiastes 8:8.
What’s the scene of?
The base case scenario, Connecticut, will take about 2 years to reach herd immunity, assuming we actually know how many cases there are, and that herd immunity even exists.
The narcissistic rebranding of anecdotal evidence as “lived experience”
They also uncover the nakedness of the fathers. Eventually drunk Noah gets found out.

And, of course, any religion that goes through enough cycles of “a plague is upon us, what did we do wrong?” will lose the ethics and practices that cause them to act in an existentially risky way.
I think older religious ideologies are virus-proof. But religious ideologies are short-lived anyway.
Acting like something is true is important: this is what "believing in your heart" really means. It's not a propositional knowing. Non-confessors are dancing with God, with ever greater choreography, and the older brother with his correct doctrines is missing this.
The Bible is a one-of-a-kind book in the fact of its very survival. No machinations of any generation so far, with over 150 generations-worth of attempts, has succeeded in irradiating it. Sworn enemies and whole heathen nations act like it is true.
“For just as Jonah was three days and three nights in the belly of the great fish, so will the Son of Man be three days and three nights in the heart of the earth.”
I want to explain why the being-swallowed-by-a-fish miracle is significant and how it leads us to worship God more, given the extensive iconographic history of this story as a symbol of death and resurrection. I'd also like to talk about the significance of the three days.
They’re trying out new tools which assume nothing is true unless you can get enough people to believe it’s true.
We need Virginia drawn, but that’s a start

Maybe a communication of the worst-case scenario to all the worlds that have the potential?
Also, whatever is hidden, shall be revealed, not due to some opening of accounts, but a merging.
A good cure for overthinking, too.
It certainly is a better take for what’s going on: no you didn’t just commit that one sin, you committed all possible sins, so stop kicking yourself.
“Made ya look!” Yeah, you did that. For some reason, I thought the phrase “worlds without end” was in there somewhere, but it’s just a bad translation of “??? ???? ?????? ??? ??????” which is referring to saeculum.
Does the superpositional atonement cover your all-possible sins?
So, how does being a superpositional hyperself inform your hamartiology?
The Many-worlds Muddle?
If you try to explain miracles from a materialist perspective you not only miss the point, but end up with these Rube Goldberg machines like an electroweak quantum tunneling mechanism directing a neutrino beam created just below Jesus’ feet downward to get him to walk on water.
Well, it's you Brits own fault for making those words spelled so closely together! Have a few language standards! :-)
26% of the variability in the log of the cumulative deaths per capita can be explained by the average yearly temperature
I do appreciate his hold-my-beer moment where he tortured his Son to death. It's not that He doesn't care.
This was probably induced by listening to the Bible on tape repeatedly. I've had many of these dreams, each completely different.
In this one dream, I was lead to an arena and told to fight this monster. A hand came out of the clouds and handed me a sword. Then the most fearful voice, sounded like God speaking, said "Fight!" The demon was large and super terrifying, but I was promised I could defeat it.
You can calculate the Rt by the difference in cases today vs cases yesterday. So it was actually 5-6 instead of 2-3 THREE MONTHS AGO. It has since fallen below 2.0 everywhere in the US. Is everyone going to go back to hugging and smooching and hanging out in the miasma? No.
I added years to herd immunity to  's Rt plot. Assuming 90% is a good target (), here is the chart for CT (only 3 more years!) and AK (about 250 years at the present rate):
“If any one of us were duplicated down to the quantum state, the duplicated copy would no longer be a copy. Instead, there would be two of the original person in this universe.” Frank J. Tipler, The Physics of Christianity
Pix?
Can anybody read this? It’s too stylized and obscure for us goyim.
You have three years.
Take a descriptivist approach to analyzing the archetypal, Jungian dynamics of the Seven Seals of Revelation chapter 6 as applied to the 2020s.
I took it upon myself to do a scientific study of the rest of the buttons the other day. None of the simple ones work as expected and I can't figure out how to program the more complicated ones.
Blood
What'll it be?
Can you move beyond simple and complicated models of the human system (and still connect up a bunch of stuff for us)?
Can you compute the days to, say, 60% of the population having had been infected given the numbers you have now?

Not understanding probability maps all that much, I would graph the Virology Lab section more like this:
Is this data available for download?
This is  's probability map for COVID-19 provenance  I think there isn't that much evidence of chimerism as he does
There is some tendency to treat the intrinsic value of human life like it was a propositional thing, but I think it’s more participatory.
I love this! Where does Sanctity of Life fall?
Noah was a pre-flood Patriarch. Jesus mentions the ark in Matthew 24:38. This is a weak argument.
Stoicism: plan your fears out like you would plan out your goals
I think this is born out with children:
Woohoo! Nebraska! ?

You should take out an ad (using that copy) in your local paper with a phone number for voice mail and publish your results! ??
I think a reasonable explanation is that President Trump is unfamiliar with DC culture and is unwilling or unable to conform to it.
Actually, that's the only part I wish they'd left out. She is the most clean-hearted thing I've ever seen on screen.
It's my new favorite film of all time. Best subversion of the Let's Wait a While trope ever!
I'm going to see it tonight! I want to be able to judge my leaders by their character, and it sounds like this movie delivers.
Five Differences Between the Alt-Right and Libertarianism  via
"Nationalism does not clash with cosmopolitanism, for the unified nation does not want discord with neighboring peoples, but peace." Mises
The relation between addiction and computing has been out in the open since Pong - as soon as the goal became $$.
#SOCIALISM (n): A cult where success &amp; wealth are declared evil and the followers own failures&amp; poverty are declared noble.
How do I manage to be unpopular on every social media platform and yet worthwhile to everyone I meet in person?
"The principle that the end justifies the means, ... becomes necessarily the supreme rule." The Road to Serfdom, Friedrich Hayek
I got white hair on my chest! Now I'm officially old.
I think we are in the midst of a religious war of political religions. Separation of college and State!
This bet should stick to something concrete like UAH Lower Troposphere data:
Warren Buffett's $1M bet will come true at the end of this year. Looks like he's going to win!
In the Wonder Woman theme:
Look! It's not even summer yet and I already have a tan!
Peterson: Neo-Marxism and post-modernism appeal largely to “resentful people,” given the ideologies’ appeal to covetousness and jealousy.
Dissident Professor Explains Neo-Marxism
Herbaceous Peony; Lovely Lady
Kentucky Wisteria; Arizona Babbitt; Pizza Hut
????? ??? ????? Ramadan ad for a kuwaiti telecom company goes boom:
Tomorrow is Ramadan, so I hope everybody is going to go from 5 in the morning to 9 at night without eating or drinking. For a month.
If true, then vestigiality would be Proof of Work (PoW) that somewhere someone on this level ran a simulation a long time.
I have a hastily constructed theory: the constant violations of personal space from their helicopter parents has damaged their psyches.
Interesting thought: Vestigiality is Proof of Work (PoW) that somebody somewhere on that level let their simulation run a long time
Is the gold market being artificially capped somehow?
It's pretty chilly this afternoon - anybody out there enjoying some nice global warming?
My answer to I have 4 months to learn data science/machine learning. What do I do?
Robot Race by Senbei  is the theme song for Sam Charrington's "This Week in Machine Learning &amp; AI" podcast
All the benefits in life come from compound interest.
Check out this book: "Hands-On Machine Learning with Scikit-Learn and TensorFlow..."
Well, it kind of "mists"
I'm still getting calls for Kevin Marston from Chicopee even though he hasn't owned this phone number since 2009 :-/
I have a jar of "epic" duck fat in my fridge. What? And how?
But that points to a solution: a trading house could conceivably be an AI run by support; a government could conceivably be an ophanocracy
It was great to listen to you. Your engineering mind gives me hope that I can understand and use deep learning in my own data science.
I trained my dogs by yelling "organic spills cleanup team away!" But now they just watch me when I'm in the kitchen. :-)
Will I be allowed inside a Church if I wear a Muslim hijab?
And it's methodologies focus on proving what is FALSE
It's like the guy who's morally disgusted with the lady selling water by the road during a water crisis.
My son quipped "Man! So liberal I can smell the Medicade!" I'm pining for when the misallocations to the healthcare market were that few.
Kind of like Socialism
It's missing the MNIST database - is that not talked about any more? Also "So..." at the beginnings of the talks.
Is it odd for a non-Jew to eat Kosher?
According to the Lövheim cube of emotion, the focus needs to be on keeping the Noradrenaline down and both the Seratonin and the Dopamine up
It's a form of ophanocracy: "rule by decentralized governance mechanisms" - a play on the "if men were angels" argument of Federalist #51
No, Socialism just doesn't scale well past the level of family
I know this would violate US privacy norms, but would it help if everyone in-house could look up their coworker's salary?
He has risen!
Another gift from your mother (or whoever first gave you butterfly kisses)
How do I do a cluster analysis of rows of chronological sequences of events?
San Diego's Experiment With Higher Minimum Wage: 4,000 Fewer Restaurant Jobs
Citing?
Any progress on the ability to actually implement UBI?
I have a phone alarm that goes off every night (to take pills). So when it goes off, my dog gets in his bed and stays there for the night :)
Where are the US anti-war Democrat protesters? They usually show up after a 4 or 8 year hibernation. Has anyone made any sightings?
Another example: "supply and demand simply does not work in healthcare" - they think it's a political buzzword they need to take a spin on!
Add these on your viewing machine's HOST file, right?
Yes, I've been in the process of simplifying a problem to post on StackOverflow, only to discover I made a copy-paste error. lol
Exactly. Build the code you need to prove it's there and prove it's gone, maybe with a toy dataset, and leave it until you are rested
I've learned not to code with kids in the room. Yelling at kids has no effect on the problem: just stop with solving and BE WITH THE KIDS
I just told my kids "Communism works great! It just doesn't scale well past the family level"
Nebraska Dems stuff refugee gift baskets with VOTER REGISTRATION FORMS
“Quis custodiet ipsos custodes?
Decentralization through algorithm-based consensus is an organizational theory, not a stand-alone political theory.
The US has the best national starvationcare system by hrs waiting in line, hrs filling out paperwork, &amp; $$ to keep someone alive 3 more days
It will make for a healthier population. I could certainly use the incentive! :-)
I'd like to introduce a new word, and get your input  via
A law is never a good way to go from Wohlfahrtsbedürfnis to Verfügungsbedürfnis! I gotta start sayin that!
Bitcoin also assumes users are omnicompetent and remember their pass phrases. Forgetful people prefer trusted third parties.
Bills have been humanly impossible to read for a while now. Put them on GitHub and let us look at the diffs:
"no person holding any office.. shall, without the consent of the Congress, accept of any ... emolument... from any... foreign state"
I like the evictionism as a moral theory. It's a good compromise.
Just classify contenders by lifetime total androgens in the body. Gender is subjective and not a good designation.nhttps://t.co/9pinOj1YXd
Never underestimate the power of autistics in large numbers:
I must be a dick
I'm in the bottom right and I subscribe to at least one person in each quadrant! Stipulation: you have to be clever.
I propose "ophanocracy" for the word for "rule by robot" - it combines Eze 1:16 with the Federalist #51: "wheel within a wheel"
He quotes Bostrom but misses his argument: goal-seeking robots won't let you turn them off!
Have you done research on the lucrative black market in albino body parts? This is the worst sort of market I can think of.
When you play Sims you're going to have to develop your own theodicy, just sayin.
"Anecdote became empirical, and experiences became the radical eucharist." Try asking for their "reasoning"!
I poured my dog a beer, but he didn't drink it. What am I doing wrong?
A right to repair: why Nebraska farmers are taking on John Deere and Apple
Stop the "arms race" by incentivizing the erstwhile poachers to maintain a breeding stock  #private #property #rights
Probably better to use "classified" rather than "secret which is itself one of the levels of classification.
Writing comprehension questions takes some training; I don't know how extensively this solution will be adopted
Wow! This site is “taking the edge off rant mode” by making readers pass a quiz before commenting  via
"While we support open sharing of data when it can be ethically shared, we leave the decision ... to the author"
It's like they start with one morally-charged word and can't understand why repeatedly using it has diminishing returns.
The Left is outraged using mores only recently invented; the Right is using the name-calling itself as data!
Censorship/noun/the suppression ... of any ... news... that are considered ... politically unacceptable...
Uber journalism is when you get to the point where you can predict what  is going to tweet next
Why do some ideologies participate in "outrage olympics" and some don't?
But then his tweets would get whittled to nothing. Yeah, I'll take the thunderdome.
If I choose the safe space, will I still get to read the tweets from our president?
What does that say for those that take the Bible literally?
The tide keeps rising: the word "computer" used to be a job title!
Here's some in-depth reporting that gets to the heart of what Trump is reacting to:
It's probably A|B testing - but what are they getting for feedback?
Yo reporters: you know Trump is a binge-watcher of cable news - why not research what was on in addition to of reacting to what was said?
Isn't Milo a victim? And Free Speech only means the government can't oppose some forms of speech.
TIL that dark matter can't be grey goo because it would emit black-body radiation. So, no self-replicating spacecraft means we're all alone?
sounds like good enough defense.
That site sure is a hassle to read over the phone
So we were quoted $2500 to replace a catalytic converter and my son did it for $100. We raised him right. :-)
What leads you to believe he doesn't know that?
General Michael Hayden, former Director of the NSA and CIA, shares his perspectives on Cyber security.
Cool! Thx
This is my first sighting of the Anti-war Left since their 8 year hibernation.
President of the United States: Declare ANTIFA a terrorist organization - Sign the Petition!  via
All my cat does is sleep nowadays
I think all heavily unionized civil servants have accountability issues. Take public school teachers, for instance
Dear Mr. Putin, Let's Play Chess  via
So you are fine with that sort of anarchy? I see this as the inevitable end of political ideology.
Is bitcoin anarchy? (It "forces" you to not double spend.) If so, can it be extended into some kind of governance mechanism?
Are they giving you training?
We need some articulation awesomeness around here!
Are you on iTunes yet?
You should write an article entitled "Are anarchocapitalists part of the alt right?" with appropriate punctuation of course.
Here's one, for instance:
Some taxonomies have anarchocapitalists as part of the alt right
How about pro-Teachers Union!
I still own two pairs of them and plan to wear them this summer!
My favorite is the before-and-after picture of the deaf dog being signed "good boy" to. He gets it. :-)
Compare the UNODOC homicide rates of African countries with the FBI rates for blacks - they're statistically the same
As extensions to that, there's the being offended at nudity; also masturbation (you can't masturbate without lusting), et al
For the Christian, it's all about making "no provision for the flesh, to gratify its desires" Romans 13:14
Let us walk properly as in the daytime, not in orgies and drunkenness, not in sexual immorality and sensuality... Romans 13:13
is this map accurate?
I got this on a t-shirt
Here I am.
not merely coders - data scientists! Coders with statistical and mathematical knowledge.
What were you thinking when you let Obama concentrate so much power in the Executive Branch?
Time to be governed by "angels" - that is, decentralized governance mechanisms written in code, not laws.
I guess it's time to ask every journalist you know on twitter whether they follow any Trump supporters
I don't want to be more Soviet, I just don't want to lie to myself that this hasn't been tried before with success
The Soviets forbid their Muslims from dressing that way, and now they are pretty moderate.
Anybody up for some synonym rolls just like grammar used to make?
Looking forward to the second half of that article
Before the Personhood of AI becomes an economic commodity, AI as a weekly guiding spirit will have the market share.
Bible Trivia: Which two of these four colors is mentioned in the Bible as the color of the sky? a) Red b) Blue c) Green d) Black
Mimi at the water park:
"well governed" - think "well coded" with behavior-shaping constraints.
Hudl preparing for war:
My  answer to Why are so many "Ancaps" so ignorant of what they supposedly hate?
My  answer to Should property rights exist?
IF A PIZZA HAS A RADIUS "Z" AND THICKNESS "A THEN ITS VOLUME CAN BE DEFINED AS = PI (Z*Z) A
Thanks stubbot! I created that article.
"The United States will come to talk to us when you have a black president and the world has a Latin American pope." Fidel Castro in 1973
The wise individual doesn't get too attached to any of life's pleasures, knowing that science is hard at work proving it's bad for him.
I'll try, thanx
Which Wikipedia page are you referring to?
When I was young I espoused conspiracy theories which upset my dad (though he tried not to show it); now my son is returning the favor.
One retronym among the related coinages  missed was referring to tobacco cigarettes as "analogs".
Apply stole my iPhone 5S JOMO with its buggy 8.x iOS updates.
Harvest from one sunflower:
The fat cats in China should be able to move millions of their billions without market effects, shouldn't they?
Dutch baby:
Supper looks pretty:
According to Wikipedia, Kazakhstan is majority Christian:
What is the single most important historical event you have witnessed in your entire life?
Will all the Anarcho Capitalists in the Bitcoin space stop posing as lawyers!?!
For you cash-strapped, time-poor middle class out there - what's more important: to do something heroic, or to do something monetize-able?
9' 5" from a sunflower seed:
Cryptolina 2014:
What's their motive?
DAOism is the advocacy of Decentralized Autonomous Organizations as a way to combat political corruption of the distribution system
The crypto-wordspace has some up-n-comers: cryptosystem, crypto-economy, cryptocurrency, and my favorite - DAOism.
SWARM is:  and we need trustless micro-investing and I see you at 9am on Saturday. :-)
Can I get a list of questions that I will be asked?
The way is the DAO - the Decentralized Autonomous Organization as the Chessmaster that tricks humans to do all the heavy lifting.
It's possible that we can design distribution systems of any shade, but not be able to describe them OR ourselves with old labels.
Yes, it's already a success, and therefore a perfect candidate to test whether inelastic money supplies can fuel modern economies.
Let's see what happens to a deflationary crypto-currency like Bitcoin - if it's successful, I mean
A DAO (Decentralized Autonomous Organization) is now a thing on Wikipedia:  - It's only taken me two years!
And keep doing that for a few generations until your great grand children are so poor they can't afford to.
The ism in the Bitcoin space is "solutionism" - the belief that every complex problem has a simple, neat, and technological solution.
Hey, is that e-cigarette vapor in your avatar picture?
How so?
Poverty in America makes you fat, where all you can afford to eat is subsidized starchy, sugary junk foods.
I'm on Cryptolina's crowdfunding panel:
The volume of the universe is only 8.2E184 cubic planck lengths.
Our cucumber crop. Banana for reference.
Doh! I moved some bitcoins into a Brain Wallet that began with "In the beginning, God..." - it took 3 seconds for someone to steal them.
So, my son has dismantled a car we were given. Now the state wants $500 unless we get it insured! I have to pay so thieves can't fence it?!?
So, how's the $20 trillion War on Poverty going? Will your solution work this time around?
Isn't there a way to calibrate a contagion network simulation that would warn you when to get out?
Austrianism provides a good moral vocabulary but doesn't have the predictive accuracy needed for widespread adoption.
Bitcoin is supposed to be an experimental trustless system. Why not celebrate Byronic heroes who understand it well enough to exploit it?
Why can't Abode (or anyone else) convert ligatures to text?
Somebody at work doesn't like my new business card:
I've just updated my professional profile on LinkedIn. Connect with me and view my profile.  #in
This is what the Notre Dame campus looks like after last night's storm:
My hotel room comes with its own iPad.
87% of all women who have ever been alive have descendants who are alive today. For all the men who have ever been, that number is only 34%.
BTW, nobody wished me a happy Father's Day. I will exact my revenge. :-)
Granted, the Son of Man has this quality that causes everyone to narcissistically project (how they want others to see themselves) onto Him.
You who feel Christ's message was Socialism: when he tipped over the money tables, was he pouring half the coins into his garments? Serious.
The European Diaspora can go back to Europe for a good education, also.
Yeah, I guess the wristbands WOULD be easier to tote. I might even embarrass myself and forget to take them off! :-)
Here's my #pompously #wordy #indeed #resume -
Yeah, I think Humility is closer than Agreeableness
Are you referring to agreeableness, one of the Big Five personality traits? If so, there is research literature on the aspects you are tweeting about.
It’s 4 p’s: Perspectival, Participatory, Procedural, and Propositional
How do the Three Transcendentals map onto  ‘s Four Knowings?
Yes, there is something inside that needs time to work its way out, and the complexity of the project gives you that time. Coders do this on their larger projects also, by playing with new tools, etc.
When you tackle something so complicated everyone leaves you alone, you can enjoy the artistry. Otherwise, you just revel in your craftsmanship.
Data Science seems more artist than craftsman.
What matter does in the present is constrained by the fact that it must evolve into the Omega Point, the Final Singularity, which is the First Hypostasis of the Cosmological Singularity.nnTipler, Frank J.. The Physics of Christianity
I think the fact that you can reliably emulate someone in your head to the point where they take on a life of their own inside there, where authors can work out how their characters react by just kind of watching them, means we are all hauntable.
Not everyone who says to me, ‘Lord, Lord,’ will enter the kingdom of heaven, but the one who does the will of my Father who is in heaven.
You are taking the correct approach, but remember this is from the perspective of a non-Christian. What is the utility of acting like you believe in Supralapsarianism over against believing in Infralapsarianism? That’s where the marginal utility comes in.
Propositional and Participatory are two of  ‘s four Knowings, the other two being Procedural and Perspectival. I would argue that the intrinsic value of human life is more participatory than perspectival in that involves a dynamic interplay between Agent and Arena.
A good candidate for the first unit is the intrinsic value of human life. If I act like I’m worth the blood ? of God’s Son, then I’m acting like human life has intrinsic worth. But don’t mistake this for propositional knowing; this is participatory knowing.
By that I mean a marginal behavioral revolution. And by “marginal” I’m thinking of diminishing utility, meaning that the first unit of the Christian belief endowment yields more utility than the second and subsequent units, with a continuing reduction as we get into the weeds.
It’s a recognition of the “marginal revolution” that Christianity has wrought on the world. Apparently it has to be pointed out to Christians by non-Christians, because Christians are too entangled in doctrinal complexities to see it.
If you could separate, for the sake of argument, Romans 10:9 into two parts, the “confess with your mouth” would be the talk-the-talk part and the “believe in your heart” would be the walk-the-walk part. Atheist Christians act like they believe, though they are not confessors.
Data Science and replying with Bible quotes that can give your tweets a fire-and-brimstone vibe.
Here is what it does to the cumulative cases. Granted, the Navajo Nation is partially in New Mexico and Utah.
What am I missing here?
Here are the Navajo numbers as reported in Wikipedia:
Arizona normally looks like this:
I'm suspicious that the wobbles in the real-time basic reproduction number (Rt) are due to the slow-reporting sections of the population. Here, I removed the case reportings of the Navajo Nation from the Rt of Arizona:
I don't see any correlation between how fast each of the US states locked down and the number of deaths they ended up with, whether or not you account for population density.
"ironed out from the system due to their shoddy performance and long learning curve" - Oh! THAT'S what's happened to me.
Having to keep track of wristbands? How is that better?
Another report from the defense industry: "so compliance focused that the system just doesn't reward future thinking."
Yeah, it doesn't make any sense. A Bitch is someone who is so in love with you they obey you.
If you'd quit abusing 3AM...
My favorite!
So it only slightly correlates with the Dollar Index, but acts more like a replacement for other commodities?
I see fiat vs Bitcoin as a kind of Nietzschean Master/Slave morality where the resentment of the lower castes results in a value inversion.
I need a women to die in my place. We need to be in a lifeboat situation where there's children involved.
I've come to the conclusion that Bitcoin is "My Little Pony" for anti-central bankers: it's a collectible into a prettier world.
"However, a complete theoretical elucidation needs further investigation." Basically every cool idea I've ever tried to explain to someone.
If you take FBI data for the homicide rate for Blacks, would it cluster with UN data for European rates or African rates? Nature or Nurture?
I buried a secret image in here using Steganography - anybody found it yet?
Another example of the funny math proofs in machine learning: a PAC algorithm is a Probably Approximately Correct algorithm.
Maybe we can measure the WOW factor off this graph and model it with a network.
Ambulances, cops, fire truck in the parking lot - what's up?
What exactly is going on in the parking lot?
Our house is surrounded by drones. HAHA! FOOLED YOU! They're just bees. :-)
I'm listening to Music to Code By on Pandora n #pandora
Because you can't move money through Bitcoin without leaving a permanent trail.
Look at them in a hex editor.
There's no comparing a bitcoin to the global enabler of terrorism and drug trafficking - the US one hundred dollar bill.
Without the ability to steal money, states couldn't exist.
If I tell you the powerful are oppressing you, you’ll call me a progressive. If I tell you who those people are, you’ll call me a Nazi.
Cigarettes now cost $4.73 a pack. We're spending the equivalent of forty cents a pack on vaping supplies. SUCKERS!!! :-)
The present participle of lose is not loosing.
Politics: the sick game of pretending that YOU aren't doing the corruption/damage/subversion/co-opting, only THEY are.
What about the scenario where a state sets up their own crypto-currency with its own legal tender laws?
We uninvited the Russians to our Counter-IED Conference.
Fierce competition among the local caterers to get our business: got a free lunch out of it!
It's actually a misspelling of the word "centrality".
Some anarchists reject the anarchism of anarcho-capitalists, so I suspect there is something faith-based going on there.
I now have 128 microwheatons on twitter.
Mt Gox is sick:
It also means masturbatory. Sorry.
My lab humps the air to the beat of a certain song.
Capital Gains tax on bitcoins sold in 2013: $666.
Violence is the universal language.
Barley and Buffalo
My answer to How would an anarcho-capitalist system be run?
Screenshot of  running on Vesk in the Citrix Receiver running on my iPhone:
A women should say to a man, before any advice, "I am incapable of imagining how the world must look through testosterone-soaked eyeballs."
I can sell mine, but the price is up from 3 days ago.
Another stock bubble on they way.
Full on snow storm in Williamsburg.
Jon, are you more of an introvert or more of an extrovert?
Even if we went back in time to where we were Iron Age kings, we would still have it worse. We have toilets! That must count for something.
The Vape kits:
I wonder what would be the equivalent entrepreneur fee in a Bitcoin-based dominant assurance contract in this case.
I've put up a "baby monitor" next to my wife's sick bed: Face Time on both iPhones while I work in another part of the house.
I'm sick of this punky wood! The only decent way to get firewood around here is to wait for hurricane to knock down a giant oak.
"Its not that pointing guns at people is wrong, its just that you have to point them at the right people!" - statists
A consensus is building to delete my Wikipedia article on Decentralized Autonomous Corporations because of a lack of secondary sources.
For High Time Preference Friday we stocked up on some vaping equipment.
One bitcoin is now worth more than one ounce of gold.
My coworkers kids tell her "I love you times the Deficit" because "that's more than infinity" - cute.
Any sufficiently advanced incompetence is indistinguishable from malice.
Envy
No way, unless you are mining Litecoin or something. The difficulty is too hard for mere desktop computers.
Bitcoin now transacts more per day than PayPal.
Gold/Bitcoin Silver/Litecoin?
Healthcare used to be an ecology of deeply interdependent charities; you've turned it into an isolated machine in constant need of "fixing".
My TTS app reads "chi^2" as "chee-square" instead of "Kai-squared". Mmm... cheese squares!
My son tells me there's nobody "vulgarizing his utterances" at the homeschool coop like they do at public school where he went last year.
Ace and Pistola!!!! #Halo4GC
I'm interested to know where you got that statistic from - is there a margin of error to go with that?
Every week or so, somebody on  posts about how they or some bitcoin business were hacked.
Moving a private key off digital media = moving a wallet offline where hackers can't get to it.
You can continue to move bitcoins to your offline wallet because every ledger will recognize the public address.
When you put bitcoins in "cold storage" you are just moving the private key of your wallet off the web.
It's better to conceptualize Bitcoin as NOT a coin, but a transaction system with all having the same ledger.
Jeffrey and his interviewers have a few misconceptions - multiple btc stored offline means stacks of papers, etc.
I rated Les Misérables 10/10  #IMDb
I think I'll take the summer session off.
So, accidentally sent 4.4 BTC to an address on a wallet on a hard drive I no longer possess. Whoops.
JiffyLube's top-off service is the best way to take care of old, oil-burning vehicles at minimum inconvenience.
Thx for the link - I put it up on
Are the Pakistani manufacturers stepping up anyway? B2B would enforce SOME standards, surely.
You are fake.
Every week or so, I  write these passive-aggressive snippets of code that get discovered in code review. WHY U DO THAT BRAIN?!?
Integer NEQ Int(Integer) Craziness
Earthquake near 23011
Contrast Rebellion - to hell with low-contrast fonts!
Walmart is warning of "serious" inflation ahead in the US market. Thank you, Federal Reserve.
Flipping off a reporter from the back of a police car: you can't teach that. (My son the admirable rascal.)
Jason Segel's humor has taken over the family: now instead of "curse you, tiny toilet!" it's "curse you, tiny Massachussets!" or some such.
: Back in the day, you could sue a railroad for soiling the laundry you hung out to dry. This extension of prope...
A Murder of Crows ~ Full Episode | Nature
Add the Twitter Joke Disclaimer —  — Because you can't be too careful. #twitterjoketrial
Random Script Archive

Statistics Competition: Chess ratings - can we do better than Elo?: Statistics Competition: Chess ratings - can we...
LOL!! Same here.
What's grooveshark's iPhone app called? Pandora's is called "Pandora".
It's a misinterpretation on the part of the infoworld quotetaker: Bill Mill was just wining about hopping IDEs is all.
HTML5 imagines a world without plugins - so the dev is staying in one IDE.

what service is the elite tied to and what's your asking price?
America is the 5th most free nation in the world. Or better.
Israeli students plan counter-flotilla.
Ugly girls often give birth to pretty girls. Check out the mom of the girl you think is pretty if you don't believe me.
Everybody Edits! Great multiplayer flash game.

Chinese report documents human rights disaster in the United States : Indybay: The United States is the only count...
The Cultural and Spiritual Legacy of Fiat Inflation - Jörg Guido Hülsmann - Mises Institute: These effects are 'es...
Close to the same color scheme?

High fructose corn syrup worse than sugar? | The Money Times: High fructose corn syrup causes more fatness than ta...
Engrish Generator

A completely new form of entertainment.
I wish there was a good Chinese buffet near Hampton, VA.


JSConf.US 2010 -- Swashbucklin' JavaScript!: JSCONF is currently sold out. We are working with sponsors and speake...




Critical Issues Commentary: Colossian Heresy Part 1: Bondage to the stoicheia comes in forms that are cleverly dis...

Academics fight rise of creationism at universities | World news | The Guardian: A growing number of science stude...
Christopher Blizzard · HTML5 video and H.264 – what history tells us and why we’re standing with the web: Christop...


wonders if a Republican uses the word "black" in a sentence and a liberal doesn't hear him, is he still a racist?
Fun $10 puzzle game

Is Owning a Dog Worse than Owning an SUV? - GOOD Blog - GOOD: Is Owning a Dog Worse than Owning an SUV? - GOOD Blog...


28 Rich Data Visualization Tools - InsideRIA
Gateway Pundit: Gateway Pundit: "Jimmy Carter: Abuse of Women Including Genital Mutilation is the Fault of Catholic...
Found a voting attendant that asks you if you want a Republican or Democrat ballot and then calls you a traitor if you choose Republican!
The Fiction Of Climate Science - Forbes.com: The Fiction Of Climate Science - Forbes.com:  Al Gore thought he might...
The sovereign Lord of the earth and sky Puts camels through a needle’s eye. And if his wisdom see it mete, He will put worlds inside a tweet
2012 had a clear message: if you pray, you die.



Seriously thinking about making my S-Corp completely controlled and owned by my wife so that it qualifies as a minority owned business.
Recipe Puppy is an ingredient based recipe search engine.














farcry-jumpstart-20090306.pdf says name="apowers" so that's the way I did it.
Regex would be easier than something like ListFirst(ListLast(aString, '('), ')')
Whenever I create a new object in FarCry with an array field, the MySQL table is missing that "a" field. I have to add the field manually.
filled in all the fields but it says I missed one.

Where?
We love burnout paradise here! Sound like a good exchange.
I had that happen with an IDE. Had to go back to the website and download the version I originally bought.






The temptation to milk the series for revenue is too great for a prompt, Seinfield-like ending.



and don't forget "short".
It's all moved to Facebook. :-)
reply

Is having a central bank what you are calling capitalism?

I'm getting an "unexpected constant #2 102" error when I try to access /CFIDE/administrator/index.cfm - any ideas?




The HP Photosmart Premium gives an unknown error when trying to print from the browser of an HP laptop. And bombs the spooler elsewhere. :-(
Yes, I stopped using those after a few years due to the cursings of my name and the yelling. It had to stop.
Working from home for too long - I need some Keow Teow Goreng, a coffee stout, and the company of intelligent programmers. :-)




LOL!
I'm working on some CF for SFA.
there you are!




Great graphs! Check out  also.
RIA CFML Flex Flash: Do Coldfusion programmers need to be object oriented gurus?: RIA CFML Flex Flash: Do ColdFu..
SitePoint are having another #twitaway. Get your free book here!

Just uploaded all the photos from my senior yearbook to Facebook - I'm exposing my friends to the jokes of their children all at once! :-)


"bleak, bald, sad shorthand" makes for a good tweet, no? :-)


Even better: send in McDonalds!
Anaface - Facial Beauty Analysis - Score Your Face -
9
You're a FarmTown widower and the dishes keep piling up because of it. :-D
Same here. What is it with those games?
Nobody!
Looks like a great cat toy. :-)
Last time I went to the Grand Canyon I fainted from lack of oxygen. Been living at sea level far too long.
Arriving in Flagstaff around 3:30pm on the 21st of August.
We would all cheer you on if you could hook up with a rescue mission and give it to them to distribute.
Software Is Hard: Software Is Hard: The developer is God of a virtual world, and it's hard work being God. Not a..
Violent video games linked to child aggression - CNN.com: Violent video games linked to child aggression - CNN.c..
I shall do the same. :-)
I've discovered you can get unimplemented functionality out of CF Builder by borrowing .project files from Eclipse!
It was on a VAX, I think. If that makes you feel any younger. :-)
I remember using this same algorithm in the 70's.
It says I "will need to produce and logically explain code samples during the interview" - I hope that means my own.
Great! :-)
Just like some drinks taste awful when not cold, some music sounds awful when the volume is not turned up enough. This might explain why those nearby don’t like your music.
I think the more appropriate term here is “dodo bird”
"This sort of work is best done by the insurance sector. Insurers employ modellers and data scientists, but also employ managers whose job is to decide whether a model is accurate enough for real world usage."
For only 9.6 pounds you can have one of these babies

4) Participatory knowing involves a complex interplay between agent and arena in a creative and enacting sense. I think this is what is meant by "believe in your heart that God raised [Jesus] from the dead" Romans 10:9.
3) Propositional knowing refers to knowing via language and mathematics. It includes facts and logic and allows you to argue on Twitter.
2) Perspectival knowing is done through embodied perception: knowing your place in the world and your own point of view.
1) Procedural knowing is having the muscle and sequence memory to enact a procedure. (I never do routines the same way twice: this includes the morning routine where I should be tying my shoes in a certain sequence.)
maps human knowing via the following four "p"s: 1) procedural knowing; 2) perspectival knowing; 3) propositional knowing; and 4) participatory knowing. As a memory aid (I'm bad at alliterations) I'm going to try to explain these.
We turn to do an end run around the entire Industrial Revolution
Now, the question is, would the trigger-happy Clinton have made a better preparation for the pandemic, or would she succumb to the "fear of the virus is racism" narrative that the Woke were pushing?
"Instead of finding these [our own institutional] forms, we have applied our skill and invention in such a manner as to give a fresh leash of life to many of the obsolete capitalist and militarist institutions of the older period." Mumford, Technics and Civilization, p. 267
It explains 26% of the *log* of the cumulative deaths!

's paper is out!
Could you give an example?
All Industrial Age institutions are rotting away; the woke maggots are just getting the process over quicker.



"Mrs. Clinton had refused to talk to the president for eight months after the Monica Lewinsky scandal broke. She resumed talking to her husband only when she phoned him and urged him in the strongest terms to begin bombing Serbia; the president began bombing within 24 hours."

Still unable to find ColdFusion work - falling off the cliff at the end of the month. :-(
I just took "What's Your Bible IQ?" and got: Bible Scholar! Try it ?
I just took "Which television series do you belong in?" and got: Grey's Anatomy! Try it ?
Found you through . Is there enough ColdFusion work in Phoenix to consider moving there?
You didn't have a chance to tell him that you are the "cracker" not the cheese, I take it. ;-)
It's got 53 diggs, so far! :-)
Oh! I forgot about that.
HAHA! I like how it's a php form (complete with JavaScript errors).
Jordan Chandler “I Lied for my father, i’m sorry Michael” | Fresh News: Jordan Chandler “I Lied for my father, i..
heard a funny T9 (predictive text): thumbing in "Zach Schortmann" causes my son's phone to suggest "Wack Painstoan"! :-D
#freeflexbuilder3 from
Celebrate 10 years of Moonfruit and win a MacBook Pro  #moonfruit
Thanx for the tip! :-)
All American Investor: Real Unemployment Jumps to 16.8 Percent (Statistics, Graph): All American Investor: Real ..
Now if they had let the airlines protect their own property...
The beginnings of schizophrenia? Onset of symptoms typically occurs in young adulthood.
Sorry - that was me. Sorry. lol
Get a free iPhone from #squarespace if you can remember to go to their website.
I lvoe taht aoubt wrdos and how qickuly we can raed tehm.
What does your hosts file look like?
DON'T GET THAT COLLEGE DEGREE! - New York Post: DON&#39;T GET THAT COLLEGE DEGREE! - New York Post: The four-yea..
Could you describe this "typing issue" of yours?
China Bans Gold Farming -- InformationWeek: China Bans Gold Farming -- InformationWeek: Trading virtual goods fo..
Just came out of PetCo to this "tourch and pitchfork" crowd around my car where I'd left my dog, not even panting she was so ventilated.
Yes, now we can go back to our comfortable delusion that the regulatory agencies really protect us.
By stuff you mean bank accounts?
Will some ColdFusion expert please spend some time on Wikipedia cleaning up the CFML articles?
Loyal beer drinkers fetch higher margins in the bar, but that doesn't mean the end of drinking at home is near.
What operating system are you using, specifically?
Is Windows Vista supposed to be like this? Everything is slow and buggy.
Bailout Costs vs Big Historical Events | The Big Picture: Bailout Costs vs Big Historical Events | The Big Pictu..
Funny! :-)
Kristen Schofield's Blog: Analysts at Gartner Praise CF: Kristen Schofield&#39;s Blog: Analysts at Gartner Prais..
Public Bugbase!!!! Track your own gripes ladies and gents.
Bolt public beta soon; public release in the year 9.
Supposedly Bolt is going to be more like HomeSite than CFEclipse is.
Mmmm... using Excel as a datasource with cfspreadsheet. :-)
cf:mail without the rote #coldfusion code.
Creativity over Convention.
Evans Data Corp says the number of #coldfusion developers have tripled since the year 4.
The next ColdFusion code name is Niff!!!!! jk
Besides that, how do you like it?
Oxford is trolling for comments again.
The Beatles Rock Band - “The Beatles” - Passion Pictures: The Beatles Rock Band - “The Beatles” - Passion Pictures
The years 1999 and 2000 were also SciFi-like dates that had me weird-ed out for a while. :-)
What does RTM stand for? Is FreeRealms "christian" enough for my socially conservative Presbyterian community?
"Can you send me the URL of your blog again?"
Wow! Just like HomeSite! ;-)
LDAP is simple but very quirky - impossible to master overnight.
...LUCKY :-)
I'm speculating that the majority of these are people searching for definitions or futher clarifications of the term.
EVERY techno-term becomes "not specific enough" with its integration into society as the division of labor diffuses the interest.
Not a specific enough term. :-)
Great times with my 12-year-old playing video games.
Fascinating! I love these tools. I miss Google Sets, especially.
The New Socialism: Global Collectivist Society Is Coming Online: The New Socialism: Global Collectivist Society ..
I waded in a river, too. But I'm holding out for the Pre. :-)
The monkey URL.
What's the URL again?
java, javascript, actionscript, coldfusion Job Trends | Indeed.com: java, javascript, actionscript, coldfusion J..
I'll have to test it on the 18 year old - he grew up with this stuff.
Recommended wordspy 'you can learn new tricky phrases by following wordspy.'  #TellMrTweet
Recommended cfjedimaster 'he is a highly responsive ColdFusion/Flex experimenter.'  #TellMrTweet
Are you weighing yourself on the same scale?
Are they fixing the telescope?
Unemployment numbers worse than projected | Les Jones: Unemployment numbers worse than projected | Les Jones: Th..
He'll make sure it's three days in a row, silly! :-)
"I get Access denied" "You are not authorized to access this page." even though I'm logged in to XML Today.
Playing with the Look-alike Meter
An interactive map of vanishing employment across the country. - By Chris Wilson - Slate Magazine: An interactiv..
Freddie Mac CFO David Kellermann found dead - Apr. 22, 2009: Freddie Mac CFO David Kellermann found dead - Apr. ..
I wouldn't be surprised if it was older than that: a similar phrase is mentioned in the Book of Isaiah.
Onsite?
Babbittize me!
Are you coding a virus, by any chance? ;-)
I assume someone has made malicious or knowingly false statements about said beverage?
pretty fun! :-)
Did you tell him that no bacon lung is being served at said restaurant? ;-)
Kind of pricey. :-)
Sometimes we hang out with couples twice our age! ;-)
I don't think that'll get me the job, but I'll be sure to mention it in the intervew. :-)
This is going to be the worst depression we have ever had.
I joined twitter 772 days ago -  ?
Just discovered I didn't e-file my taxes when I thought I e-filed my taxes. I am in e-trouble! :-((
I upgraded to XP professional for the win.
LOL!! That's hilarious. Does it also tell you "Your making a wrong turn."?
- Very impressive! (My cat only stands on the keyboard.)
Another week without work.
Yes, but we're too lazy to re-type the whole thing when we could just click on it if you had formatted it correctly.
Try asking again and prefixing your URL with http
But knowing that cucumbers work better kind of pops the bubble. :-)
6.1
I hate having to maintain CF servers - would rather ignore them.
Just what we need, another government encroachment of our internet liberties.
Sounds like Austrian economics
That was an interesting post but it made the word "bitch" pop into my mind uncontrollably.
Complaining about being overworked to the unemployed is like making them listen to a skinny person complain about their weight problems.
How did you go back to the 1500s? Research in Europe?
Complaining about being overworked to the unemployed is like having to listen to a skinny person complain about their weight problems.
The key words are "doubtful notability". LOL!
Successfully set up a second wireless router in client mode!!!
Successfully set up a send wireless router in client mode.
I think she is just obsessed with you. ;-)
I think all my ajax/web 2.0 skills have been ruined by working for this one company for three years. :-(
5:1 on a slight head cold. I just went through a similar thing: wife/bad cold, son/strep throat.
Why is that?
Can you give a cfug class on making a facebook app?
Turns out no. Very similar to your experience though. The wolves must be getting hungry.
Having configured my facebook app, I can't figure out how to proceed - any good videos out there?
My spammer is Amy Fitch @ 800-829-6468 Ext 1241 (but don't be mean or anything)
I just got one, too. Makes me sad that she is prostituting herself like that.
Converting a Javascript OOP project to ColdFusion so that it will work as a facebook app.
No it was actually the temp directory on a server that I couldn't get control of for political reasons.
No, the access rights to copy files to folders. Also the network was do slow for some reason.
Haha! I knew you were going to say that. ;-) I was unable to complete the automation because of a permissions issue.
Great! Send it to dave.org - I've had a few problems getting the thing automated myself and want to see how you do.
I mean are you going to right up your findings and post something I can read.
Some families are email and phone-challenged. If you show up in person you will get the real story.
Are you going to provide a URL for the journal entry?
Love it! If you're on Windows add Tortoise SVN to get the most out of it.
That's because of the new infusion of money from the Fed. ;-)
this kind of goes against the research done in "The Millionaire Next Door".
wefollow isn't case sensitive! Whew!
Just added myself to the  twitter directory under:  #ColdFusion #anarchocapitalism #communities
I've been cut back to 16 hours max a week at my largest client. :-(
is having tea with his niece! :-)
is getting download speeds 10x faster than with the old cable modem. Is this just temporary?
expects negative questions to be answered logically - and gets totally confused when they're not.
is dumbing down the definition of "it snowed" to add "and it was still there the next day".
is in denial that it's snowing right now. (Please don't pop his delusional bubble. ;-)
is proud of his son for getting all A's. Didn't know he had it in him! :-)
Is trying to write a custom struts filter to do the extended character encoding for his web site.
is playing scrabble with Barb and Mimi.
is at work so early that the coffee shop isn't even open. :o)
I'm looking at the Ginx Pre-alpha home page.
Can't get my WebDriver tests to run in TestMaker. :-((
Trying to keep my FFS pets from being bought out from under me.
We need, not a French Revolution, but an Austrian one. That is, one of Austrian economics.
I'm on the ground.
Taking the early train home to transfer the title to the car to my son.
Struggling with the buggy PushToTest TestMaker software.
Any body use PushToTest?
Still trying to find a good web test builder.
I should've wrote this test suite BEFORE I converted this app from ColdFusion.
I wrote a really sweet GUI test suit, found all the bugs, etc.
Does anybody know of an open source card game written in Flash?
It's a legacy of Prohibition.
Everything outside is covered with slick, thick, ice.
Nodding off in church.
This semester's Sunday School is Ecclesiastes
Spending all day creating TestGen4Web tests.
iuggtkod
Working from home again today. Too cold and snowy to bother driving in.
New goal: reorganize the basement.
I just realized it was the New Year 1 hour after the celebration was supposed to happen.
Going home from the party.
Hi Mimi! :-)
I always get goal-oriented this time of year:
Sounds enviable! :-)
Yeah, we had those monkey things flying around the cubicles a couple of years ago. They make great stocking stuffers.
Aren't we all? Let's just say he has a divine exemption from the Golden Rule. Or so he thinks.
How do I get twitter to message my phone? I can send an IM to 40404 but how do I receive one? Setting Device updates to "on" has no effect.
Let's just say he has a divine special exemption to the Golden Rule. Or so he thinks.
Still can't get a .jar file to run from a command line - I had to partially "explode" it.
Trying to get a .jar file I created to run from a command line. Never created a jar file before, never written in Java before, etc. :-(
Called my co-worker a "fucking hypocrite" at the top of my lungs. Now I have to live with the regrets. Who cares if he deserved it or not.
Brought home three thick Java books. Why? I didn't even look at them and have to drag them back to work again.
I also "joined" Blockbuster. I never even checked anything out - their selection was so underwhelming.
Havasupai has been flooded by a earthen dam breaking. My father was the tribe's lawyer and I used to go down there a lot as a child.
I've never quite got my "career portfolio" dressed up enough to take out in public.
, you just have "animal magnetism"! :-) I put a dog crate next to my desk so my pooch can crawl in there instead.
I'm working my way through Eben Hewitt's "Java for ColdFusion Developers" like I've never read it before.
There has never been anything like this olympic opening ceremony.
This floor show is absolutely incredible!
Watching the Olympics.
I'm looking for more ColdFusion work.
What's up?
ColdFusion
I'm driving right now. I will respond in a minute.
Typing on my computer.

And  ‘s “propositional knowing” vs “perspectival” or “participatory” knowing
AlsonnE. ChildrennF. People wearing masks
Which group is most likely to just enter uninvited into your 6 foot radius of personal space?
All these protective social instincts we built up over time (xenophobia, etc.), now so repulsive to postmodern sensibilities, turn out to have been guarding us from worse monsters. We thought Cerberus was ugly, but we didn't appreciate how he kept back the Hoards of Death.


Well, it's like, you know, "I will strew your flesh upon the mountains and fill the valleys with your carcass so we'll find a way to deal with this.
And aggregating demand! But maybe if you just aggregated supply and provided all the automatic filling-in-of-paperwork on the demand side...
Can I just say that human tribes have evolved adaptive social behaviors to survive epidemics? A lot of these are repugnant to modern sensibilities (xenophobia, etc.), but they are there, buried deep, not completely eradicated.
Right, but not confusing god with God.
Transition In Midlife: frenetic to exhausted
That last data point is an artifact
I just computed this from :
“Of all tyrannies, a tyranny sincerely exercised for the good of its victims may be the most oppressive.” C. S. Lewis
Coronavirus Pandemic (week of April 19): number of confirmed cases passes 2 million worldwide
Coronavirus Pandemic (week of March 29): global cases reach 500,000nOil Price War (week of April 05): price falls  to the lowest level since November 2002nCoronavirus Pandemic (week of April 12): death toll exceeds 100,000 globally
Coronavirus Pandemic (week of March 08): Italy places 16 million people in quarantinenCoronavirus Pandemic (week of March 15): WHO declares the outbreak a pandemicnCoronavirus Pandemic (week of March 22): worldwide death toll surpasses 10,000
Chicago Cubs World Series (week of November 06): end of longest championship drought in American sports historynHurricane Harvey (week of August 27): total damage reaches $125 billionnHurricane Dorian (week of September 22): widespread stench of rotting bodies 3 weeks later

Yes! All gods are contingent, God is not.
What's your take on  's "I act like God exists"?
What's a good way to trick/incite/reprogram yourself to use generators more?

There is much "we" can do, but it's most effective at the local level.
Even if you take into account a more quadratic measure of population density, there is no correlation between how fast authoritarian measures were taken and the cumulative deaths that resulted. Nobody in government is actually making you safer.
This calculation is so easy even I could do it
I'm going with the guy on the ground (who has skin in the game) and has tested 5,213 patients. Let's all develop strong immune systems (and stop playing into the hands of our enemies)!
We have been getting all our meat shipped frozen from local farms. The entire alternate system to Tyson Industrial Foods is already online and ready to ramp up.
Also, Debt Jubilee:  (cf. Leviticus 25)
A debt Jubilee is not a target (a scapegoat to vent our righteous anger on), it's a better way to live. It's not "find the bad guy" - that kind of thing is easily manipulable.
It’s worse: county data which weights the state data. So, only something as granular as cell phone data would work?
Is this pretty enough?
It's basically a measure of initial death surge. We should explore around the data to see how fast the coefficient of determination disappears, I guess.
Righteous anger is like a sword thrust. In fact, the problem with most anger is that it’s not righteous enough! It’s easily parried by manipulative forces to focus on the wrong object: the scapegoat.
What do you mean? Should we be taking a smoothed death count?
Because we’ve uncovered a law-like network effect?
Then take the standard deviation of those fifty-odd numbers.
State_Population / Land_Area_sq_kmnnSo, fifty-odd calculations you could assign to a 10-year-old.
The standard deviation for the county weighted density data is 1648.4. The standard population density std is only 892.5.
Imagine we suspect there is a Simpson's paradox where, when our measures of population density are combined at the state and country level, we have an 0.45 r2 trend, but this disappears or reverses at a finer measure. How can we test that the paradox even exists?
state weighted by county
CA as in Canada (not California)?
I think you would have to switch to phone data to get at that issue. But, how do you explain the similar correlations (at the national level and at the state level)? Is that just that the studies are of too similar granularity?
Yep, every tool can become a weapon.
About 45% of the variance in this particular death surge measure is accounted for by weighted population density. The rest of the 55% is accounted for by something else.
I am confident that if we had complete county data, the correlation would hold with even simple population density. That's 3,142 data points! But I don't know if that sufficiently addresses the p-hacking risk.
Okay, with a little help, I finally have verified the 0.45 with US states data:
Poor parents couldn't get much for their kids, but the kids could issue more stock as adults if needed.
Looking at statistical terms makes me wonder what even they were getting at back then. Coefficient of Determination? Sounds like something you'd put on a medicine bottle label in 1910.
I think it would get rid of the Motherhood Wage Gap if your mother owned all your personal corporate stock at your birth and sold it at need. What are the downsides to that?
Most of your tweets are already TEXT STRINGs at a TIME.
The invaders need to be repelled in a decentralized fashion anyway. Keeping the reproduction rate down in the area of each hospital below 1.0, etc.
Could you write this out in LaTeX?
I'm scraping all the county/parish/borough land areas off Wikipedia right now, but I'm thinking maybe the best/quickest measure of lived density for each state would just be the standard deviation above. What do you think?
The top five US states by standard deviation of county population are California, Arizona, Nevada, New York, and Illinois. So, yeah, NY State is a huge city with a lot of emptiness, but we got more extreme examples. :-)
So how should I computer lived density?
I'll work on a better measure of population density. (I used total state population divided by area in square kilometres.)
Here's the results for the US states:
Okay, not simply useless, but how fast you lock down has no correlation with cumulative deaths even if you account for population density.
Charles, how far are we from developing the ophanocracies to prevent the food riots that are staring us in the face?
The guns are what is equal, not the weight class of the fighters.

Ramadan was developed during a period saturated with epidemics and starvation. Enjoying the replies to this ignorant comment:
PTO at least
Specifically Exodus 23:11 "...you shall let it rest and lie fallow, that the poor of your people may eat..." - something like periodically cannibalizing corporations for redistribution to the poor.
Sabbath
All the terminology we inherited from the 18th century make you question what they were even getting at when the chose those words.
How are they distinguishing between guilt, shame, conscience, and stigma?

And we'll all be wearing breastplates, apparently.
I predict this crisis will end in 2029 (but only if you consider the crisis to have begun in 2008)
This is a bad take. Libertarians want a market for governance mechanisms. Any mechanism that prevents "fucking someone's life up" according to personal, subjective valuation would be included in that market.
I think it's because we live in a scientifically- and economically-illiterate era, where the only tools available assume that something is only true if enough people believe it's true.
I remember people's names if I see their names every day.
Our minds are still formed by the Industrial Revolution, and even though it has ended we still keep with our old ways. He could have said "Some people" rather than "Leftists" but you know he's in your mentions, so maybe he can talk for himself?
He's like a modern day prophet. He tweets to bring up stark contrasts.

He makes a lot of these.
I'm learning so much python just reading your code! Thanks for sweating the small stuff.
I riffed on something like this in a Quora question:  (It originally was in reference to dying but they merged it with the "vanish" question.)
I see you as a hair shirt, locust eating prophet:nnFor by people of strange lipsn    and with a foreign tonguenthe Lord will speak to this people,n    to whom he has said,n“This is rest;n    give rest to the weary;nand this is repose”;n    yet they would not hear.

Promise us that you will stay with us for life. Show us a plan where we can be continually improving and give us a personal trainer.
The temptation, though, is to build a Tower of Babel and bring in too much of the periphery to be self-sustaining.
Yeah, but which one of the officers is going to take credit?
Are there any decentralized governance mechanisms (ophanocracies) that can help with the coming food riots? It's one of my goals this year. Maybe one of the cryptocurrency communities has something ready?
Who led the digital transformation of your company?
Yeah, just let them out for crowd-sourced beta testing!
The word isn't Anglo enough.

Their in-ICU numbers peaked on the 15th.
Technically, these are high density intervals (). I'm having more and more respect this this. Thank you for sharing this.
His confidence intervals are super huge at first, but get really small in the end. In fact the more wiggly the line, the quicker they shrink. But look at them here, they're still +-50% or more:
Here's the R_t of all the states that are being "scrutinized":

It’s his Bayesian approach; totally different methodology
Yeah, those error bars look fake; I’ll show you mine in a bit
I was getting the same absurd result with my own calculations. I thought I was doing something wrong.
We have to figure out some way to break the chokehold. Constitutionally, becoming a link in the infection chain by assembling is not "peaceable". So the state should only be demanding washing of hands to and from, and wearing masks during? It looks like there is no plan to end it
That was a lot of fun to work through the Jupyter notebooks. Thanks for doing that.
output reminds me of a politician parrying an interviewer. Maybe we could train it on political interview data and throw it back in their faces.
It's like a politician in that it steers the conversation to content it knows about. Still gives you rhetorical ideas, though. It will expand on your original idea for maybe one sentence before it veers off, hence the need to generate 5 to 10 times for each sentence.
This should work well in Grievance Studies assignments
"On the basis of knowledge of other coronaviruses, the main route of human-to-human transmission of 2019-nCoV is probably through respiratory droplets."
Okay, but that ruins my Ezekiel 32:5 reference.
There is no correlation between how early US states locked down and cumulative deaths, even when you account for population density

This is what the chart looks like if you account for population density:
It's probably just a precursor, but, yeah, the CCP has definitely leveled the playing field. How would we clean up the mess created by the lack of defense insurance agencies ()? This is more like an act of Nature than an invasion.
That doesn't make any sense. We do have a control group, but even if we didn't there should be some correlation.
I can't see any correlation between how quickly states locked down and how large a pile of carcasses they ended up with. Am I missing something?
We adopted a kid out of a broken home and home-schooled him. The guy has waaayy too big a vocabulary for his job as a mechanic. He used to complain a lot about how none of his coworkers knew anything, now he only works with older ones.
The easy part is downloading Anki or SuperMemo to your phone. The hard part is breaking down the skills and getting them in the app.
Every time I try on the business computer I have to get the local tech to restore from backup and then listen to a lecture about how I'm not supposed to just delete everything that says "CUDA driver".
Same
True. "The only real way to know how effective shutting down has been is by comparing two similar situations in which one shut down and one did not."


One dimension: Coding, Audio podcastsnTwo dimensions: Web page layouts, Youtube videosnThree dimensions: VRnInfinite dimensions: ???
Fractal localism?
Foreign adventurism (which is practiced by both Democrats and Republicans) would fit nicely into that 3rd axis.
This can happen; we just have to get the ophanocracies to minimum viable product.
We walked around to the far corner of our quarter section (360 acres) to catch the bus. So about a square root of a mile.
Just bought one
Question: There is an argument that the number of deaths attributed to COVID-19 is wrong by a large proportion. Okay, if the number of deaths is doubling every few days, that means the number of wrongly-attributed deaths is also doubling. What is causing those deaths to double?
Isn’t this a function of your own clarity?
Is Cuomo a doctor?
This is as clear an application as you've ever tweeted.
What you are doing is conspiring to forge a chain of infections that ends in unnecessary suffering and death. (I am not even going to get into the logistics of sharing the Eucharist.)
Can I get something off my chest? Celebrating Easter in a crowd without everyone wearing masks and washing their hands to and from is not "peaceably assembling" and is not constitutionally protected nor striving "for peace with everyone" in accordance with Hebrews 12:14.
Something unexpected that throws into relief how badly we prioritize.
“God chose what is low and despised in the world, even things that are not, to bring to nothing things that are, so that no human being  might boast in the presence of God.” ?1 Corinthians 1:28-29
We should, in concert with Ottawa, London, Brussels, and Tokyo, repudiate our debt to them. China is holding more than a trillion dollars worth of US Treasury bills, for instance.
China fumbled a precursor in their Wuhan bioweapons lab so they decided to level the playing field by 1) lying about human-to-human transmissibility and 2) playing on the "fear of the Chinese virus is racism" narrative to infect the rest of the world.
Thanks! I remember (and apparently have completely forgotten about) I used to use this when it first came out.
How does one create a custom search engine? I swear I need one of you kids to sit me down and explain this stuff to me because I don't have the social finesse to figure it out on the fly.
I think we need a clear definition of "make friends" that would work both in the miasma and in the ether.
This is a reasonable definition of "peaceable assembly".
"Whoever does not bear his own cross and come after me cannot be my disciple."
Born in 1961. I wish I had saved for the future more: bought more stock in Apple, etc. I wish I had "known" how to trick my short-term impulses into long-term advantage. People in their twenties listen to me more and take my advice.


I'd like to see a graph of book-feet of regulations for each of these.
And because it doubles every few days. HIV used to do that. The seasonal flu is only seasonal. Car accidents did when cars were new.

I have made a habit of doing this. I admit that I’m not a cogent thinker, and this habit is pretty saddening.
What gives is that it’s a self-defeating prophecy. Once you allow the existence of those kinds of things, your ability to visualize dynamic systems improves.
So, a GenXer, not a Millennial?
"At the end of this, there will still be Goldmans and Reeds, people who admit errors and those who will stick by their guns, humble minds who will see that there were better ways and arrogant fools who will keep screaming that setting the world on fire was all we could do."
Cool!
I'm from Flagstaff - the same savage philosophy reigns up there outside of NAU at least.
Should have looked more closely at his bio. ?
I didn't know he was from Arizona!

They are in a close social network distance from the Mardi Gras 2020 crowd
Trump's Biggest Failure
Because their cronies would lose the benefits of the Cantillion Effect
I think you have a point here. Both His physical laws and His moral laws are an expression of His nature, but, in contrast, "the world was made through him" John 1:10. But, yes, unless God is everything there is, God does not exist.
So His moral laws are an expression of His nature? Why aren't His physical laws an expression of His nature? That sounds like a Gnostic heresy: His physical laws are corruptible but His spiritual laws are incorruptible. Explain how this is not Gnostic.
Can God bend His moral laws, then? For a moment, to prove a point?
I unintentionally map them to the streets or paths I'm walking on. Like, I can go to a spot I haven't been to in decades and the same shower thoughts appear in my head.
Such a god would be untrustworthy, me thinks.
Okay, so then we agree. We are looking at this from our incomplete knowledge of natural law.
The reason Muslims were never able to get science going was that if you implied that God had eternal laws you were implying that God wasn't free to change His mind and you were therefore a heretic. Can the scientific observer trust God?
Humean, as in the eighteenth-century philosopher David Hume.
An electroweak quantum tunneling mechanism? Accomplished by directing a neutrino beam created just below Jesus’ feet downward? I’m in the same position you are, but I’m going to stick with the God of the Bible whom I can trust will always abide by His own laws.
That’s Humean Deism. The word "miracle" comes from the Latin word *miraculum*. The Greek word - ????? - just means "that which evokes wonder or astonishment". The Hebrew word - ??? - just means "ensign" or "banner namely an event that indicates something other than itself.
Okay, so just your own personal philosophy then, nothing to do with what the Bible says about it?
This sounds more like your parenting style than something out of the Bible. Is there a reference to this suspends-natural-laws-a-little-bit in Scripture?
It seems to me it would mean something if you survived multiple churns.
The Church has always held that there is no distinction between moral law and natural law and has always attempted to derive moral law from natural law.
I think  is taking the right stance: if God’s physical laws aren’t eternal, then how can we do science, and if He can suspend them, we did He go through all the trouble of torturing His Son to death and resurrecting Him?
Chess is mutual puzzle-solving in the presence of adversaries.
I think acting like God transcends both existence and non-existence and whose physical laws are eternal (so science can be done) is on a converging path with, and today’s most important corrective to, Christianity.
What is your take on crushing the universe? Something like quantum-tunneling in anti-baryons from the many-worlds, driving down the magnitude of Higgs field to produce a negative cosmological constant, allowing us to use gravitational shear as an energy source, etc.
I think this is the best explanation I have ever read that takes the sting out of determinism.
You are dealt the cards you have to work with, but the other Visas get dealt other cards, all possible combinations. So at least one of you has nothing to complain about. :-)
What's your take on the Many Worlds interpretation of quantum mechanics? The linear superposition of Visa?
I assume you introduced her to God’s “cancel culture” (Psalm 39)? What was her reaction to social inventions that have solved this before and have withstood a hundred generations of testing?
Imagine trying to forgive all Whites and Jews for the way they got your family into this country and rationalized it as no big deal.
And web hosting?
Thanks for the explanation and the link. Sorry about spreading false information.

Screenshot of the all-causes death graph of Madrid for the past three months. Notice that so many people died who would have been treated during the grey band that the line went lower than normal afterwards.
Laws have been over-complexified and are now almost always written for manipulative ends. There is no simple justice for the simple: they see wealth and intelligence can get you out of anything.
The inept have been betrayed by the lying and manipulation of experts.
I would prefer you define non-"peaceable assembly" as not wearing masks during, and not washing hands coming from and going to, a social assembly. Instead, you'll have some ham-fisted authoritarianism where you chaise down masked joggers and such.
China said is was okay, why are you tattling on us?
Racism and xenophobia are evolutionarily adaptive mechanisms to fight pandemics on a tribal scale (and are therefore hard to remove).
So Blacks were 10x more concentrated in that crowd (than Hispanics), and so seeded the rest of their networks at 10x the rate.
From
By close I mean closely networked. Do Blacks from each of these places go to and from the Mardi Gras crowd each year more so than Hispanics?
Distance from Mardi Gras  - there was no equivalent crowd that close to the TX cities.
Dad jokes are often assembled on the fly.

Have you tried saving it to Pocket?

A stream of revenue large enough to finance armed groups cannot be extracted by any legitimate nonviolent enterprise? Enter the Warlord Entrepreneurs. A categorical imperative cannot pronounce an action "as good in itself" no matter what the result? Enter the Moral Entrepreneurs.
The larger demons have been let loose in the world. (The smaller demons of Xenophobia and Bigotry, who like Cerberus, have been guarding the gates of the Underworld to prevent them from leaving, have been cleared out of the way.)
In this era of crisis, where cause/effect relationships are not perceivable (and where hindsight biases our post-accident assessments of human performance), our collective lizard-brain mode is going to kick in.nn?? ACT ? SENSE ? RESPOND
From "How Complex Systems Fail" ():nn8) Hindsight biases post-accident assessments of human performance.nnand most importantly:nn10) All practitioner actions are gambles.nnEven successful outcomes are the result of gambles.
And phone.
This also bleeds into the theological concept of sanctification, whereby becoming less addicted to sin increases your options to choose righteousness

How about putting out a projection with the warning "this is a self-defeating prophecy"?
All tools can be made into weapons.

Context:
What if we just annihilate as many baryons as you can so we can force the Higgs field to its absolute vacuum? Then we can cancel the positive cosmological constant and force this universe to collapse.
Are death cults self-exterminating?
Yes! That would even be easier!
How would you rebuild if there were no surface minerals to mine?

This is the first time I've ever heard of "Tiger King"


It's possible that in each saeculum, some percentage of the culture moves up another color on the spiral, usually conceived of during the 2nd turning and achieved during the 4th, but I'm not familiar enough with the spiral dynamics theory to describe it well.
I've been working from home for decades but my wife has not. She is having a real hard time self-motivating, but has finally turned a corner, I think. :-)
I made one out of a t-shirt
So, yeah, during a High (the 1st Turning), we want to maintain the status quo, because we've solved the problems of the last 4th Turning by then.
According to Strauss-Howe generational theory, the social motivators are different for each Turning: for the 1st Turning, it is Shame, for the 2nd Turning, it is Conscience, for the 3rd Turning, it is Guilt, and for the 4th Turning (the one we're in now), it is Stigma.

It turns out that "the FDA just approved swabs for tests taken from just from the front of the nose through self-collection, instead of deep in the nasopharynx."
I am positive this is an esthetic improvement
I got lazy and used staples
I sewed a ? in the nose bridge for structural support

Here’s one of the sleeves and the collar cut out
I plan to sacrifice my ISS shirt for the cause!
One thing I have a lot of to make DIY PPE with is t-shirts!
As long as they are wearing masks and washing their hands to and from gathering together in His Name, they are “peaceably assembling” and have the constitutional right to do so.
As long as you are washing your hands and wearing masks, it’s “peaceably assembling”


How to catch out lying bureaucrats

Crowds are  good way to infect other nations
Well, I've discovered that the heartburn that completely disappeared on my carnivore diet comes back whenever I eat pizza.
Treatment As Elder: likednHow It Is Nurtured: overprotectivenHow It Nurtures: underprotectivenPositive Reputation: caring, open-minded, and expertnNegative Reputation: sentimental, complicating, and indecisivenEndowments: pluralism, expertise, and due process
Reputation As Child: placidnComing Of Age: unfulfillingnPrimary Focus Coming Of Age: inter-dependencynYoung Adulthood: improvingnTransition In Midlife: conformist to experimentalnLeadership Style Entering Elderhood: pluralistic and indecisivenReputation As Elder: sensitive
The Artist ArchetypenGenerations: Humanist, Parliamentary, Enlightenment, Compromise, Progressive, Silent, and Zoomers
Negative Reputation: unreflective, mechanistic, and overboldnEndowments: community, affluence, and technology
For the Prophet generation, the slap has an inner-world focus, and for the Nomad generation, the slap has a self-sufficiency focus.
According to Strauss-Howe generational theory, the "life slaps" are different for each generation: for the Hero generation, the slap has an outer-world focus, for the Artist generation, the slap has an inter-dependency focus, etc.




"Given Chi's speech, is the novel coronavirus outbreak in Wuhan an accident occasioned by weaponizing the virus in [the Wuhan P4 virology] lab?"
Can you you get the all-causes death numbers? The spike will still show up there
As a habit, I used to place my forehead on the desk and read from my lap in Nuclear Power School. Some midwit on a power trip came over and yelled at me. I was so disgusted I faked like I was asleep even though everyone around me could see me turn the pages and blink my eyes.
Happened again this year.

Does this group suffer the Dunning-Krueger effect the most?
Are "midwits" the same group as the  "IYIs" or Einstein's "intelligent fool"?

Collectivist societies adapted to higher pathogenic density have an easier time implementing mask-wearing norms than do individualist societies
I think #skininthegame is going to transform the worldview of our leaders
So what you're saying is the homeschool industry will expand into certifiably virus-free in-house tutors/baby-sitters or boarding schools?
Did they set up the WHO to be ruled by a bunch of presumptuous and ruthless Boomers?
Can we actually have a removal of regulations against tests and masks production?
This is what I get from the Wikipedia data:

The conspiracy theory is that the Wuhan biolab fumbled a precursor so the Powers operationalized the plan earlier than expected
The US is overtaking South Korea today in cumulative cases per capita today.
The Plague Gods are rising up to devour humanity
Same with "Capitalism". And "Socialism" for that matter.
"For I will pass through the land of Egypt that night, and I will strike all the firstborn in the land of Egypt, both man and beast; and on all the gods of Egypt I will execute judgments: I am the Lord."
Who are "the people"? A certain religion?
Have the freedom to take on as much responsibility as you can.
The Italian-heavy New York is also disproportionally affected. The viral monster took the Spice Road (China, Iran, Italy) and then on to the Italian diaspora.
From How Complex Systems Fail (): "Hindsight biases post-accident assessments of human performance."

They should have studied past pandemics:
The Lord's Prayer packs in a lot of information
Same old Boomer solutions: centralized governance mechanisms need to be tweaked
From Wikipedia: "The existence of heteroscedasticity is a major concern in the application of regression analysis,... as it can invalidate statistical tests of significance that assume that the modelling errors are uncorrelated and uniform..."
It turns out that every middle and first name of all my father's children were due to conciliatory political maneuvers with the rest of my aunts and grandmother. Mostly Catholic saints, famous Catholic politicians, and revered ancestors.
The line between the West and the rest is the "doubling every four days" line
In this "land war" all the Asian trajectories are looking good:
Now as they were eating, Jesus took bread, and after blessing it broke it and gave it to the disciples, and said "Take, eat; this is my body".
Why not, if you can afford the losses?
China fumbled a precursor at their Wuhan biolab and The Mandate of Heaven will reveal all.
Why did the robot spill the beans? Did I naively set this up years ago?
It's my #Twitterversary! I have been on Twitter for 13 years, since 17 Mar 2007 (via ).


"and forgive us our debts as we also have forgiven our debtors." Matthew 6:12
Yeah I know mate; I was trying to make a funny. Miasma, humors, plagues, dark humor (translated through a stultifying medium across orthographic distances), etc. :-)
Lying Boomer propagandists
What I don't get is your spelling of the word "humours". Typo? ;-)
This is true; you have to have time in there. I'm taking the daily counts and using that in place of the 1 and the 2 - those were just place holders.
growth_rate = (2-1)/2ndoubling_time = math.log(2)/growth_ratenSo, every 1.4 days
The Hammer should come down on my paycheck-to-paycheck renter, who won’t then be paying his rent, etc. Should I just preemptively bring the Hammer down on the mortgage company, and do the legal Dance with them as they try to foreclose?
I’m now playing out, in my head, how to perform the Hammer and the Dance economically in my personal life, as I’m expecting my renter and my employer (and my renter’s employer) to do the same.
When I see myself in CCTV or video conferencing software I get this unnerving feeling of horror. Anyone else can’t shake a feeling like this? I don’t think it’s vanity. My father used to get this when they interviewed him on TV. And my adult son also dislikes his own visage.
All Beltway Bureaucrats need to get tested ASAP! They are probably all infected.
I'm hoping this becomes Trump's slogan: Late to the party, rusty as hell, but in it to win it.
Late to the party, rusty as hell, but in it to win it.
?
Boomers stopped being born in 1960.
Christian Fringennnnn
From centralized, expert-based sense making to decentralized.
Stay home, wash your hands, or watch your hospital run out of ICUs and ventilators.
Ability to remember numbers: 1/10
They’re experts at manipulating the system to benefit themselves at the expense of the Millennial and the GenXer. Can they use those skills during a crisis to help them?
‘s “I act like God exists” put the empirical and mystical parts of my brain in sync. My epistemological framework (“treat every gun like it’s loaded”) is evolutionarily adaptive.
If you look at the Wikipedia data () it's still doubling every 6.8 days.
The cumulative number of deaths in the US is doubling every 4.3 days. By May Day, overfitting to the curve, we should have twenty three million.
What’s Pax? My son makes his own vape juice and has given me a two-year supply.
I get 23,133 cumulative confirmed cases today if I (over)fit using this curve: 4.973015146971752e-28 * pow(dayofyear-25.757876721495872, 18.169473089691355) + 19.20401172686062 * dayofyear + -951.4666661532988
We have more boots on the ground here in the US with their ingenious methods of data collection.
Well, the Italy curve was dead simple
The US will have 22,703 cumulative confirmed cases today. It is doubling every 2.7 days.nThat 5.023837062129045e-27 * pow(dayofyear-24, 17.46226102772738) curve shown in red is fitted to the data.
Italy will have 52,473 cumulative confirmed cases today. It is doubling every 3.9 days.nThat 0.06408845635961201 * pow(dayofyear-48, 3.8955894642728226) curve shown in red is fitted to the data.
The data is from
This curve is unexpectedly hard to fit - got any suggestions?
If you fit the curve the total confirmed cases doubles every 2.4 days (if I’m doing the log 2 thing right).
If you supported regulations on hospitals that require them to only use medical grade masks, you are the reason masks are not available, not Trump.
It also has the property of being consciousness-raising, as the next time they look in the mirror they will see all the smudges on their face.
Idea: coat the hands of the people who enter your home with a non-toxic, (possibly) delayed-visibility dust. It makes it easier to see where they left their fingerprints and where you need to wipe down.
I recommend a non-violent underthrow starting with local replacements, given the relaxation of local law enforcement.
I know a lot of us on Social Media like to debate ideals, but it's time to admit that our institutions are completely eroded and are not going to come back online. And so there is a need to found new institutions and champion the ideals that work for all of us.

Do you know actual reason central banks don't favor helicopter money as a monetary policy? It's not the inflationary effect or the unwise spending. It prevents their cronies from benefiting from the Cantillion Effect and maintaining their elite status long term.
Are you also stocking up on anti-baryons? Together we could shave off a billion years! :-)
I re-estimate it at 14,587.
2020 Goals:n1. Glorify God and enjoy Himn2. Flip the Cosmological Constant with my stock of anti-baryonsn3. Get humanity through the next Great Filtern4. Prevent a WWII-like memetic contagion from happening this saeculumn5. Found ophanocracies to ameliorate wage-slave riots
Curfews do the job of concentrating people together (temporally). Nice to know what side the bureaucrats are on.
Based on the dataset from  I estimate that there are 4,910 confirmed COVID-19 cases being ventilated right now.
Here's the choke point: the number of people trained to operate medical ventilators.
Statistics is littered with these, to the point that it's almost impossible to understand what they were getting at a century ago.
Remember it was the experts who told you "don't panic". We need to develop decentralized governance mechanisms (ophanocracies) that don't need experts to function.
I think he's including the sentimental, complicating, and indecisive Silents in that designation.
I think that's a side effect of not being data- or math-oriented. The geeks have long shut off the part of their brains that would listen to the rumors and just concentrated on the doubling numbers themselves.
And BCH specifically?
What should happen to the price of crytpocurrencies? Shouldn't they be going up?
The company should go full anarchocapitalist and loudly dare the FDA to punish them for shipping
“The reward for work well done is the opportunity to do more.”nJonas Salk
Americans don’t panic, their ingenuity just kicks in. These narcissistic, presumptuous Boomers lack a Fear of God and have wrung all the resilience out of the system in the name of efficiency. Now the sentimental, indecisive Silents are trying to mollify us with lies.
Exactly. A spike in the demand for toilet paper will be followed by a dip in demand. We aren’t doubling in the number of butts.
Not that funny: my wife has biogen employees’ children in her building
We politely inquire at the entrance of our home (the mud room) about the health of our guests and their housemates, then direct them to the soap and water in the adjacent restroom to wash their hands.
We need a consumer market in decentralized governance mechanisms (ophanocracies) like  's Futarchy.
Frozen beef, fish, and chicken. It's unlikely that we'll lose electricity during the months of viral siege. We have been having it shipped to us and handle it (and the dry ice) with gloves, so the procedure is ready-made for this.
Walmart: toilet paper aisle
That could be true.

Yes it is
We were on a 12 hours on, 8 hours off schedule in Nuclear Power School. You got to the point where you could stand at parade rest before a double chalk board in front of a review board and draw electrical diagrams, nuclear diagrams, and piping diagrams from memory.
New data makes it more infectious than SARS:
According to Strauss-Howe generational theory, the negative reputation of the Artist archetype (the Silent Generation) is one of being sentimental, complicating, and indecisive. That's basically who runs AARP (and every other institution) now.

According to Strauss-Howe generational theory, the life slaps are different for each generation: for the Hero generation, the slap has an outer-world focus, for the Artist generation, the slap has an inter-dependency focus, etc.
Also other cultural upgrading services: literacy, etc.
I quit a Reactor Operator career in the 80s to become a Bible Translator (basically a field linguist who provides alphabet design to preliterate people groups).
Meaning they predict the environment will select for them and then turn out to be the culling agents themselves?
I’m “West Side Story” years old.
Iran?
I'm guessing Iran
What is the URL to her screenshot?
“human beings possess cognitive adaptations designed to cause them to ... avoid contact with those who are differentially likely to carry communicable pathogens.”

I had the privilege of voting for Vermin Supreme in the Massachusetts primary last night.
Architecture. Everyone agrees to follow the rules of physics.
Hostile/Silly? That you to be called perverse in the 1800s, I think.
“As he went away from there, the scribes and the Pharisees began to press him hard and to provoke him to speak about many things, lying in wait for him, to catch him in something he might say.” Sounds like Twitter.
I predict the final results will be in the shape of a bird flip


Okay, so it's just as infectious as the Spanish Flu, though not as deadly. The death toll from the Spanish Flu is estimated to have been 40 million to 50 million, and possibly as high as 100 million, making it one of the deadliest epidemics in human history. So, bad, very bad.
So, presumably, the orange band is "bad" and the red band is "very bad". What is the label we are to give to SARS? Forgive my being too nit-picky.
Doesn't look like it to me. Here's the  graph squashed so that the 1918 and 1968 points line up with the high ranges at
Does this work for you? I don't know what the areas in that other graph even mean.
I made one but can’t handle the visualizations so I use it sparingly
"After this many of his disciples turned back and no longer walked with him. So Jesus said to the twelve, “Do you want to go away as well?”" John 6:66-67
Twice I have realized the day after that I missed my birthday somehow. Did I join the ranks of the adults that first time or just the wage-slaves?
Dude, I literally only remember my birthdate, and get other people to do the math. If asked how old I am, I say I was born in 1961. I know I’m still in my fifties.
Not as deadly as the Spanish flu and not as infectious as the Hong Kong flu
Are you assigning us homework?
Looks like another flu

My wife recommends Miele vacuum cleaners
If we can annihilate enough baryons, maybe we can force the Higgs field to its absolute vacuum and get the cosmological constant to go negative?
Que the global financial crisis:

The submit button for your "See a Free Sample Report" is unresponsive
Exactly. He should put more effort into using his downtime more wisely.
It worked on me when I was fifteen, during a time when subcultures were forming. I don't know if it works now.
Our universe is a random number generator for whoever is simulating us.
You have to split off an alternative universe and evolve it so that it is populated with interesting people.


This is what the traffic in Beijing look like right now. They are all doing the right thing and working/schooling from home:
Replied a few Bible references as examples for concepts you were musing on.
We’ll do this for 6 more weeks and introduce more choices in a controlled manner
Been on a strict 5-ingredient diet (beef, pork, chicken, salt, and water) for two weeks now and for the first time in 3 decades a rash that covered my skin from shoulders to feet is gone.
There is a mentality of internal apprehension that requires everything to be lain out unstacked where if it isn’t visible it might as well not exist. Do not behold the desktops of such minds if you want to avoid pain.
How many people does it take to sustain the computer chip industry?
You could “poke” the screen memory and “peak” at the keyboard buffer to create an infinite loop of white patterns across a black or green background
Is this an example of p-hunting (or is it something else)?
Divorce doubles the probability that children will be living below the poverty line. Every woman I told this to when I was younger thought their children would be the exception.
Is she aware that undermines her own atonement? If God could do what He pleased (meaning violate His own Laws), couldn't He have found a simpler salvation besides torturing His own Son to death and resurrecting Him?
It might be that the Initial Singularity demands a Final Singularity whereby there are enough intelligences evolved and spread across the multiverses to collapse each one? So we are pulled through the filter by the All-presents Singularity who is infinitely close to each of us.
Survivors die faster of other causes than their cohorts, much like AIDS.

That's a good riff on Federalist #51: "But what is government itself, but the greatest of all reflections on human nature? If men were angels, no government would be necessary. If angels were to govern men, neither external nor internal controls on government would be necessary."
With quadratic voting! :-) :-)
So let us found as many institutions that use architecture over laws as we can.
Actually, you are appealing to experience, not theory. Sorry about that.
"If hold this bug in my Tweezers of Theory, it starves to death! Therefore it's inviable in the wild." It's possible to set up incentive structures that are "races to the top" instead of to the bottom, and it's also possible that the new cooperative structures can out-compete.
"If men were angels" (Federalist #51) we wouldn't concern ourselves. So how about, instead, "angels" themselves? Specifically the wheel-within-a-wheel angels of Isaiah 1:16! Meaning some sort of decentralized governance mechanism as rulers - a kind of ophanocracy.
Governance by architecture. You can play versions of MineCraft, for instance, where it is impossible for other players to harm you or steal what is yours. Decentralized governance mechanisms (ophanocracies) are being scaled at this moment and will soon(?) be online.
A lot of these are due to having such a radical theological perspective that they confuse whatever political viewpoint you’ve taken and force you to consider each point on its merits.
The prophetic voices of  ,  ,  ,  ,  ,  ,  , and


There is a slim chance, something to pray fervently about, that we can found new institutions with decentralized governance mechanisms that disincentivize the oppression that triggered the riots in the first place.
It’s the kids grandparents we are trying to protect, not the kids. So let them peaceably assemble (hand washing, masks, etc.)
And the fact that they don’t even bother to find the stuff stolen from you reveals what?
The crucified and risen Lord.
Did they perfect it first in Soviet Russia?

There is one goal that’s almost trivial over a few billion years: crush the universe. Just annihilate enough baryons to drop the Higgs field to its absolute vacuum and cancel out the positive cosmological constant!
Confused it with “one-consonant”?
It’s as intractable as language: everyone is born with the capacity for it and will pick it up from their cohorts.
This is hard. You go through stages of grief when you find out they’re right. But if you keep going, you eventually come out the other side with a transcendent, holistic understanding that does more than just clean up your argument.
Jesus would have us to be secretly perceived as good, in contrast. Matthew 6:3, et al
I have a hybrid voice-code inner monologue with an instrumental background choreographed like a musical or television series.
I’d be happy to find one among the economic justice tribes (the Dirtbag Left, Occupy, the DSA) who understands this concept
Another example of partitive exegesis would be reading Matthew 17:17 and seeing Jesus [in his human nature] having run his empathetic battery dry.
“Surely vexation kills the fool, and jealousy slays the simple.” Job 5:2. It seems like most of the political energy out there is peevish envy. But, whatever you do, don’t let the fire go out completely.
Branson, MO
Both the The Era of Good Feelings (1820) and The Augustan Age of Empire (1720) have Nomads (Gen-X equivalent) as elders. I am the oldest Gen-Xer, and I won't be an elder until the next decade.
According to Strauss-Howe Generational Theory, the previous decade is more like the 1920s. The 2020s will be more like the 1940s.
I think that God cannot be contained in a metaphorical box correctly labeled “Things that Exist”. That being said, there is strong empirical evidence that acting like God exists is adaptive behavior.
Is it true that "Virginia is for lovers"?
When the ophanocracies (decentralized governance mechanisms) mature, supersede governments with quadratic voting and decision markets.
Okay, it was just who was mentioned in the summary. This was all done programmatically, so ymmv.
Here I scraped the Wikipedia "Calvinism" page and modified the SVG diagram on said page with the timeline of each person mentioned. Notice the gap? Looks like they entirely ignored the Puritan movement.
Is there a social network analysis/textual analysis one can do to come up with an anti-interest measurement?
An opensource timekeeper with wristband
MY VIRTUAL REALITY GLASSES THAT IS... HAHAHA!! No, but I can imagine the kind of culture shock we will experience as we become VR natives.
I've been working from home, living in social media so long I feel like Pinocchio half-transformed into a donkey. Indeed, I wandered around so long this morning with my phone in my face I didn't realize I forgot to put my glasses on.
SocJus is a spiritual descendant of Christianity, via Geneva Calvinism, the Social Gospel, et al.
Hopefully everyone realizes it's a setup.
Nobody's asking, but I would say the SJAs are positioning themselves to be the despised out-group.
Give them as a gift to your reptile- or carnivorous fish-owning neighbors or friends. :-)
As pet food for fish, reptiles, etc.
Here it is if you reorganize within groups to clean up the edge intersections and if you let the combatants push each other around the x axis. The top group is mostly sorted by how many combatants they have. (I had to move the SJAs way back to the right to fit into the view.)
I need to clean this up a little bit so there are fewer edge intersections:
How about connectionist/non-connectionist or survival/abundance political leanings instead? By "connectionist" I mean the idea that we are all in this together vs. the idea that we all have some space between each other.
It cleans up some of the combatant mess, though. It's mostly between the 7 tribes, not within them.
I identify with Sorters and Benedictines in private, I think.
So, give it your best shot: for each tribe, give a 0 to 100% authoritarian, 0 to 100% right-wing, 0 to 100% masculine or whatever data you think you can provide in numerical form. And I'll turn it into the correct layout.
...Hub more often?
What do you think of the strategy of alternating working on two computers, and therefore having to push to Git
Collapse the universe
Antisemitism is the sign your ideology has gone off the deep end. Standing in principled solidarity with Israel will get you through to the end.
Did post-WWII Germany spend billions on re-education?
Jesus wins?
2020 Goals:n1. Glorify God and enjoy Himn2. Build up my stock of anti-baryonsn3. Get humanity through the next Great Filtern4. Prevent a WWII-like memetic contagion from happening this saeculumn5. Develop the ophanocracies that would realize the dreams of both Left and Right
It turns out a lot of the recipients of these farming bills live in swanky New York apartments.
Can you explain the line on Mount Everest in economic terms? This is where I’m going with this inquiry.

Post something of “doctrinal import”
Also, like the line on Mount Everest, the shortage doesn’t have to be due to over regulation, but just the lack of  (or implicit ban on) a free market.
Okay, and the vertical line above the box could represent the line length, right?
Hot take from today’s sermon: God describes your spiritual condition the way your boss describes the condition of your employment when he says “you’re fired”.
Could the supply-demand curve be altered to visualize the transition?
So, does the bid price convert from dollars to line length?
What do you call the mechanism whereby, if the price can't move high enough, the lines get longer?
Also, when asked what I would prefer to be called, I confess I would love to be called "Babbitt". Apparently, being referred to by your last name is problematic and no one can quite overcome the social taboos against that.
In my fifties, that stopped bothering me. Looking at my patriline, there's not much recreational baby-naming going on, just a lot of recycling. The names of my ancestors are not "deadnames just a gift of their parents. Then there's nicknames, which you also can't give yourself.
When I was 16 I changed my name to Dave. All my documents - passport, social security card, except my birth certificate - say Dave (no middle name) Babbitt. My biggest problem? Sometimes people decide that I meant to spell it D-a-v-i-d.
I really loved that movie. It reminded me of growing up with my sisters.
This isn't speed, this is a different game design.  has been known to waste moves when playing someone hundreds of ELO points below him, but being able to check then mate destroys the analogy Peep was trying to make.
The Strauss-Howe cyclic generational theory has this era pegged at 2008-2029.
Traditional

What about funding by central bank currency debasement?
What's Hundoism?
Anarchocapitalisticly
The 1960’s prediction was that oil production would peak in 1970
I’ve heard the idea that Jesus is the one and only (or extremely rare) XX male. Somehow all the Y genes of his Davidic ancestors got fused into his mother’s X chromosomes.
Could you pull off the eye shape with mascara?
Just plus ones and minus ones. Things become positive or negative at different time scales and at multiple levels. Helping difficult people is both positive and negative, for instance.
The disagreeable introvert, on the other hand, can maintain concentration by refusing to verbally change gears, forcing the deft conversationalist to become a sounding board. 44
But to the programmer who has already got max balls in the air, catching a few more requires dropping the few they already have, then spending 15 minutes getting back up to speed, which lowers their productivity. 3
To someone who can deftly handle a conversation, relating to these programmers while they are working seems like it shouldn't be too taxing: they're just throwing them a few balls and expecting even less to be thrown back. 2
I think I know why the first great programmers were disagreeable introverts. I good programmer keeps, like, 17 concept-balls in the air before finally typing something out. Same with a good organizer, except catching and relaunching the balls requires conversation. /1
People like this neither know nor care how many people are escaping poverty every day (a 75% reduction in 32 short years). When they were looking into their brother’s food bowl, it wasn’t to ensure they had enough, it was to enviously complain if they had too much.
I recorded everything positive and negative that happened during the week for 2019. Here’s the cumulative score:
Maybe the threshold is heritable? Both my father and son and I have this thing where we are intensely interested in a person and their ideas. Until they start repeating themselves, then we unconsciously lose interest and halt relationship maintenance. “Why don’t we talk anymore?”
I like to agree with new atheists while they hate on Christianity, by matching from the Bible the sentiments raised in their “why I’m not a Christian” speech. It makes them seem like biblical prophets.
Sex is a deeply enmeshed and entangled part of the human condition: it’s directly connected to children, disease, and betrayal. Even indirect connections like gender identity and religious sexual purity laws are a hairball, with ample opportunities for the power hungry to harvest
You're trying to form a dynasty starter kit, and what you have to work with is rich relatives with big egos. You have them on board, say, but you can see a big stressor coming down the road and you don't want them to become independent and defensive, but to stay loyal to the fam
How do you get everybody on board with this? They're dealing with fear of ego loss, and you're trying to get them to fail faster.
You provide a twitter profile pic rating service?
Try Sunday School, I guess? We have questions from both Buddhist and Atheist perspectives answered there.
My holiday tradition is to put four uncut chestnuts into the microwave for sixty seconds on high
I too have been dwelling on this. There are two webpages I've come across ( and ) that made me think hard about it.
You need to give application examples, but I haven't seen any yet. Am I supposed to just stare at the pretty designs and just get it? Please, help me here.
This is *post* combo deal - he's waiting until he can afford one.
But that was enduring the Crucifixion, not the Ressurection, necessarily
“... who for the joy that was set before him endured the cross, despising the shame...” Hebrews 12:2
Gender... fluid?
This was so disappointing
Would everybody with antibaryons please annihilate as many baryons as you can so we can force the Higgs field to its absolute vacuum? We need to somehow cancel the positive cosmological constant and force this universe to collapse, baby.
I put MotT on my reading list, but since it was about 30 hours worth of reading, I never got around to it. I'll have to put it higher in the stack. Nice beard, btw.
Working out the logistics wouldn't be very hard - she would have the same phone number I'd put to memory and so it would be easy to get in touch with her. And the disappointment this produced helped me realize what responsibility towards her I was shirking in the here and now.
I have this stubborn retro-incarnation fantasy I've mulled over my entire post-junior-high life. It's established itself as an escape from all my big mistakes. I shared it with my wife and encouraged her to join in on the fantasy of going back to your childhood and repenting.
Confessions:
I daren’t
When you change your avatar, your mind gets erased
What’s your take on the Bible?
This is equivalent to what we do as programmers. I have a huge corpus of code that I need to search through to set up what I’m trying to accomplish.
Or even "Craig Wright killed Hal Finney, who was Satoshi"
What would you say for US religious institutions? Is it nearly pure market forces operating on them (or are they legal constructions of the government also)?
That's the predicted/mean IQ of the parents. You could also do one for the probability of the parents being Republican, for instance, for the US population.
Also more susceptible to Darwinian selection. We want our government to survive; we don’t care which particular corporations do.
Singapore
Anything that can go through a Darwinian selection process with respect to efficiency. This implies competitive non-monopolies.
Corporations are creations of the government
Ophanocracies, which are decentralized governance mechanisms. (It’s a play on the “if men were angels” argument of Federalist #51 using the “wheel within a wheel” angels - the Ophanim - of Ezekiel 1:16.) These can be adopted incrementally in the presence of adversaries
And more differences
So, is this politics-arguing phenomena we hear about from the media just a sampling from their own personal circles? I’ve never experienced it either.
Simultaneously “totally okay” (my inner anarcho-capitalist) and “totally not okay” (the sacred heart of Jesus)
The stated goal of every incel should be that they want grandchildren: that way all the secondary goals fall into place without unpleasant surprises
A side effect of our materialism
My phrasing for these is “if I were in the market for a wife for my son...”
I am thankful for:nn1) The world being “full of the knowledge of the LORD, as the waters cover the sea” in the form of Human Rights, Secularism, and other Christian inventions.
Sounds like the beginning of a distopic sci-fi novel
Couldn’t find you ever tweeting “ophanocracies”
*ideologues
Partisans, when arguing against a cognitively-distant ideology: "That will never work! It'll just create a hierarchy with sociopaths on the top, clueless ideologies in the middle, and losers at the bottom!"nEvery hierarchy:
The average American citizen has been to 12 states
Communication is also limited by the speed of light - that would effect galactic civilizations much more than global ones, no?
Yes 58
If any of you lacks wisdom, let him ask God, who gives generously to all without reproach, and it will be given him. But let him ask in faith, with no doubting, for the one who doubts is like a wave of the sea that is driven and tossed by the wind. James 1:5-6
Does he make a prediction later on in the text?
An important methodology for the Dynasty Startup Kit
Pretty good correlation as far as country statistics go. Data sources:  and

Thick with the fog of lies, too: virtue signaling, etc.
Now he went back to his treasure-house and carefully placed himself just as he had been standing when he tossed the marble away; then he took another marble from his pocket and tossed it in the same way, saying:nn"Brother, go find your brother!"
That 1897 novel by Irish author Bram Stoker reads like he wrote the last scene first.
My take on ideologies is that they are oversimplified models of how things work. They are internally consistent to the point of being inconsistent with reality.
For your next White Elephant gift exchange
Jesus answered him, “You would have no authority over me at all unless it had been given you from above. Therefore he who delivered me over to you has the greater sin.” John 19:11

Ophanocracies are needed everywhere on the edge, but is the technology mature and robust enough?
I basically rearranged my life in opposition to my father’s values, only to have the rug pulled out from under me by my failure to examine those values of his I admired
We are in a chrysalis stage with everything dissolving into cellular mush
We’ve gone from actually solving problems to “virtue beliefs” that signal at others’ expense
That could be used to eliminate the motherhood pay gap: she could sell her newborn’s future earning income as an offset
I in no wise disappoint my 18-year-old self. He just didn’t consider saving for the future as that important
I’m taking the plunge (cooking steak for my daily meal) starting tomorrow
I’ve trained myself to just use anyone who’s interrupting me from my reveries as a sounding board, regardless of their understanding of the terminology, and whether they’re responding appropriately or not.
Here I recommend five why’s to establish a minimum viable feel-desired-gesture to start negotiations with. Then fight it out. Encourage him to do the same.
The small things, because they are repeated so many times, are the big things. So I negotiated to get a little kiss from her every time she leaves to go to work. Makes a big difference.
Presbyterian: can confirm.
Will we get to the point where we morally condemn the drowning man for pulling down into the water those who are trying to save him? If not, will we get back to the point where we condemn the irresponsible ejaculation more than the abortion attempt?
I also noticed the more media isolated members of my circle don’t have these same misrememberings
The coolest quote is "The prefrontal cortex is represented by the Logos... while the paleomammalian brain is represented by the Old Testament God, and... the basal ganglia (reptile brain) is represented by the warring pagan gods." Brilliant!
Probably the lesson here is don't try to school someone on tangential details in a passionate manner. 4/
I think a better way to look at it is in Luke 22:35-38, which is more in line with the article anyway. 3/
Turning the other cheek is offering to be slapped a second time, but Garret Dailey () and maybe Steafan Fox seem to equate it with Ahimsa. He gives a scenario where this Ahimsa-by-another-name violates Psalm 82:3-4, and concludes he cannot call himself a Christian. 2/
The Adversary  via  is mostly well-written and a much-needed emphasis. Listening to it in the background got me triggered on a misunderstanding of the phrase "turn the other cheek though. So I replied hastily and got blocked. 1/
Accepting that I'm going to die and to stop wining about the poor choices I've made in life. (The milestone was a repeated dream of me dying.)
When you can sloppily drag a ball-like morsel along the surface and the angle causes it to get firmly anchored in your spoon or fork. (Pictured: my wife thinks this is a bowl. It's not.)
I've got to figure out how to turn my Dynasty Startup Kit into a DAO
I like to think these people just have their possibility spaces in curled-up dimensions string theory style
?
You looked for it's -checkpoint.ipynb sidekick in the .ipynb_checkpoints folder?
It's a brain-in-a-vat scenario, though, not a test of the simulation hypothesis.
The US government and the American electorate are designed to be worn as a skin suit every four years. So, yes.
It's a chummier, shoulder-rubbing Russia playing the war games with us
And ugly!
It works, too! Often, in the dream, I've run smack dab into the bug. And then I'm up at three in the morning fixing it and am exhausted by the time of the morning scrum call.
Something similar: when fully into coding and I sleep on a debugging problem, I often have a dream that I'm cycling through the code. If it's a loop, I'm doing a Ferris wheel-like movement; if it's matrix multiplication, I'm doing this rastering movement.
Is our POTUS celebrating currency debasement here?
How about, then, extending the Capitalism == "Selfishness" with Government == "Envy"?
I've had conversations with my father about how I would like to have a life that my grandfather's grandfather would be proud of. It turns out that my father is my nemesis and doesn't want that happening.
The blockage is you're treating the mouth like a (left brain) symbol. Try drawing a crumpled piece of paper, or try drawing the mouth from the photo upside-down, etc., in order to to force the right side of your brain to take over from the left.
Same: “Babbitt”, and “Dynasty”
Bitcoin implies omni competence
We need to nationalize the starvationcare system!
Great article! Really fills in the local detail.
So my dynasty startup kit is doomed to failure? How do I structure for longevity/survivability without completely abandoning social justice?
By my calculations bacteria ? have been evolving for sixty trillion generations since the dinosaurs ? went extinct. That’s a lot of free lunches at the expense of the fauna that evolved along with them. I don’t see how Jurassic Park could be viable.
Silent reading was a later invention than schooling, so maybe it's just a centuries-old carryover? (I remember getting corrected in third grade because I gave myself the challenge of reading out loud from the book turned upside down. Pretty fun, actually.)
I prefer my own made-up term: "ophanocratics". Ophanim are the wheel-within-a-wheel angels of Ezekiel 1:16 - a play on the "if men were angels" argument of Federalist #51.
It didn’t fully explain the connection
FOCTM: Fear Of Caring Too Much
But he said to me, "My grace is sufficient for you, for my power is made perfect in weakness". Therefore I will boast all the more gladly about my weaknesses, so that Christ’s power may rest on me.
Check Wikipedia?
There's a Ongoing events/Politics sidebar on  for you to get your "being comprehensive" crave on
The Gospels are a series of hard-to-fake virtual signals on the part of Jesus for his examination as the spotless Lamb of God
For the "I'm in the elite" signal to be honest (hard-to-fake), it must be costly, so as to price out the bluffers.
1) Budgetedn2) Saved for retirement
Less so than an economy based fiat currency debasement
More able to call participants in a potential scapegoating to act like God sent his only son to be the willing innocent scapegoat and, by opening their eyes in this way, to realize that they are regressing from this ideal.
So, instead of destroying valuable items in order to demonstrate your wealth and power, you destroy the lives of the poor with your persuasive beliefs. A kind of epistemological potlatch.

This rule violates scope and so I've made an executive decision never to follow it.
If you produce a lot of engaging content, you had better be completely honest, or the world will find out and your enterprise will come crashing down.
So I lifted my head and hands, and kind of paraphrased Job 42:1-6. But each time, at the start of my ramblings, I woke up. 5/
Yet here I was in the middle, like this was the plan all along, and the blackness of death was about to rip open to expose me to the Judgement of my Ideals. If such a thin veil separates me from Glory, I thought, shouldn't I reconsider all my complaining? 4/
To the right of me was a wealthy (but stagnant) version of me who had saved for the future and didn't suffer as I was because he was able to buy whatever medical science could offer to alleviate his pain. I felt great envy, self-pity and embarrassment just at the sight of him. 3/
To my left was a teenage version of me, not preparing for this future of pain by good diet and exercise. I felt such indignation I wanted to reach over and smack him upside the head! 2/
I had this dream repeated over a few nights. I dreamed I was standing in total blackness. In front of me was a 3D model of just pinpricks of white where the arthritis was attacking the joints in my hip and coccyx. The pain had a fatal element to it - I felt I was ready to die. 1/
This maps well to Alister McGrath's idea that orthodoxy grows as the church tries out heterodoxy only to discover that certain ideas begin to resemble Darwinian dead-ends.
During the daily scrum call, I recite the meaningful contributions I made the previous day. Does this count?
I did just that through  but am wondering if there’s a cheaper way
I made my own:
Can she expose the URL of each of them to me?
Can she program in python?
During an awakening, the sense of greatest need is to fix the Inner World. That is not what is happening right now.
The difference between compassion and kindness is this: if you get between a mother bear and her cubs it is her compassion (for her cubs) that would cause her to rend your flesh. It would be a kindness to just call a general retreat. Never depend on the kindness of strange bears.
Something that would trigger collective denunciation?
‘It was during that campaign that the Soviet catchphrase “ne chital, no osuzhdayu”—“didn’t read, but disapprove”—was born: Pasternak’s accusers had coined it to protect themselves against suspicions of having come in contact with the seditious material.’

I think about this scripture a lot.
“Twitter seems to exist primarily for the purpose of generating mobs—composed primarily of individuals who are hungry for the opportunity to taste blood and bask in the joys of reasonably risk-free reputation destruction, revenge and self-righteousness.”
Thank you for directing me this way. The Times article has tarnished my first impression of , and these blog posts have helped me climb down from that initial prejudice.
True compassion is always costly
What is your take on Strauss-Howe generational theory?
But what they’re organic potato chips with classic sea salt?
Let the fact-resistant remain fact resistant. (Interpreted as the era the prophecy is referring to is not one of spiritual growth, but of harvest.)
Let the evildoer still do evil, and the filthy still be filthy, and the righteous still do right, and the holy still be holy.nnRevelations 22:11
This is basically what happens when you send your kids off to college
Long bet?
A Comprehensive Reboot of Law Enforcement - Eliezer Yudkowsky - Medium
Google images gets whatever image is associated with that word in its latest web scrape. It probably was an image of the toppled statue. They probably manually fixed that in a way that caused the generic image to appear.
There also exist Crony Beliefs () and the propensity of dictators to force confessors to hold patently ridiculous beliefs as a form of humiliation.
“To be able to destroy with good conscience, to be able to behave badly and call your bad behavior 'righteous indignation' — this is the height of psychological luxury, the most delicious of moral treats.”nn? Aldous Huxley, Crome Yellow
“The surest way to work up a crusade in favor of some good cause is to promise people they will have a chance of maltreating someone.”nn? Aldous Huxley, Crome Yellow
“Of course God no longer intends to destroy the city once the foreigners have repented, and because the city is made akin to the fish and to Jonah’s three days, it is almost as if the prayer Jonah made becomes the prayer of the city itself by which it is saved.”
“And should not I pity Nineveh, that great city, in which there are more than 120,000 persons who do not know their right hand from their left, and also much cattle?”
So God relents, Jonah is all “I’M SO ANGRY!!” And God’s response is something like “is this the appropriate behavior?”.nnAnd then Jonah watches to see what will happen?!?nnThis is self-therapy. He has an unsatisfied tulpa; his inner  #burnbabyburn can’t be satisfied
I just turn on the Otter app and lay it down on the table during meetings. It catches most of the conversations
Every president has someone pointing out their corruption. But it’s mostly voices who are isolated from the last set of voices. Can we get the strident voices to yell in unison?
I have the urban dictionary app installed on my phone for just such purposes

I’ve been imagining doing this to Flagstaff, AZ since as long as I can remember
I have a father’s concern for you, and I feel frustrated that I can’t help. :-(
I have been caught unconsciously imitating Southern US accents many times.
I think of them as Zarathustra’s “tarantulas”
git: ‘gud’ is not a git command. See ‘git --help’
See? Transparency is required in a transparent society. "That level of secrecy is likely to have contributed to the decision to deploy them: with everyone refusing to acknowledge their existence, it might pass under the radar."
If I was only allowed...nnOne cuisine: Mexican nOne author: nOne genre of music: violin/EDM fusionnOne TV show: OffnOne place: Puerto PeñasconOne season: FallnOne city: FlagstaffnOne game: DnDnOne book of the Bible: IsaiahnOne movie: Incrediblesnn...how about you?
When we were younger, my wife and I used to take online IQ tests together. She would be all “This is so hard! I’m doing so terrible!” I would be all “No sweat! I got this!” She would consistently get ten points higher than me. ?????
Gitlab URL?
When I was younger, I fought against the common refrain that Republicans were the party of the rich by pointing out that all my rich relatives were Democrats
The “pocket-sized god” you can pull out when you want to complain about its logical inconsistencies, unwillingness to obey physics, etche
Oh, I imagine the worst sort of Mark-of-the-Beast-level corruption once these things get rolling, just not yet! ?
I dodge that bullet by advocating for decentralized governance mechanisms (ophanocracies) which turn out to be incredibly hard to code but promise top-down control without the theft and corruption.
"If you love servitude greater than freedom, go home from us in peace. We seek not your counsel. Crouch down and lick the hand that feeds you; May your chains set lightly upon you, and may posterity forget that you were our countrymen." -Sam Adams
What’s the cheapest and most convenient way to do that? Coinbase?
I just refer to myself as a ophanocrat, which hasn’t resulted in a discussion about decentralized governance mechanisms yet, because people don’t want to go down any rabbit hole where you’re making up your own terminology
With a reality-TV crew following you around?
High sensitivity to negative emotions is an aspect of one’s temperament. Are you referring to cynicism and resentment?
Galaxies too?
They do this in business meetings too. So often I've thought "I also did that mundane thing today" when listening to someone else during a meeting, but didn't have the gift of faith(?) to make it sound important.
So glad I found Ostrom through Twitter. We know Socialism doesn’t scale very well but Communism works at the nuclear family level. So somewhere at the local level, there should be some systems that don’t need property rights to function, but where is the science? Ostrom delivers.
Computer programming is moving from complex to complicated and no one understands the inner workings enough to remove all the bugs. Not to worry: farmers never had legibility within the inner workings of their crops, but we made it through the Agricultural Age just fine.
The malignantly narcissistic ride called the Town Hall Meeting
When workable solutions are located far away from what makes you feel like you care, and passionate signaling is directing the eyeballs away from what you really care about
I see growth of administrative roles in Medicine and Education as unmitigated evils. I see Big Government as continuous immiseration. And yet, as a programmer, every completed code project is another digital bureaucracy. Bit shuffling is not much different than paper shuffling.?????
Is that the color you are referring to?

The NPC kind of mediation certainly is.
“We need national mood day tomorrow” I’m all for a National Mood Day! Everyone could pick their own mood and dress up for the part
There are people, for example fictional conversation writers, who can create tulpas at will. It’s not a stretch to shoulder angels who direct your actions.
At work they have a web form where you enter your yearly goals. Every time I accidentally achieve something I add that as a goal for the year and then later fill in the details so it sounds like I’m making progress.
I’d like to get an X-ray of my own lungs for reference. I vape unflavored.
It’s an infinite progression budding yeast-like from God, the self-programming universal Turing machine with a literal infinity of memory
That’s how I developed my Dynasty startup kit
And both of these are adaptive traits that assure long-term group survival if kept in proper balance
I would create elaborate treasure hunts with a literary team for the clues and film both the fun-loving hunters and the creation process reality-TV style
Sometimes it’s nice to get a hit of data cleanup, too
What color red is this? It looks like a certain flower ?
Strangling moral panics with red tape?
There's also the interesting takes of  "I act as if God exists" and  "Unless God is everything there is, God doesn't exist"
During a ship overhaul metal boxes would often be welded to the floor. Someone from the next shift would invariably trip over these things. It got to be, whenever someone would trip for any reason, we would say "careful, they just put that there!". I still say that to this day.
I wonder if there is a rundown on all the theological arguments against the more unprovable Fermi Paradox solutions
For we have brought nothing into the world, so we cannot take anything out of it either. If we have food and covering, with these we shall be content.
, what’s your take on this application of Georgism to San Francisco?
It’s much easier to discover, especially if you are passionate, what makes you FEEL virtuous, than what actually helps other people.
The Minimum Christian Theology for this is that we are all the scapegoatees and God himself became our scapegoat, so why all the finger pointing?
Same goes for the free market.
That is why the Dynasty Startup Kit™? cultivates using reason and cost-benefit analysis (as well as a strong motivation) to improve clan members’ well-being, instead of just relying on feelings of warmth, concern, and care for them.
A mama bear is being compassionate by ripping you to shreds for getting in between her and her cubs. It would be a kindness if she just called a general retreat.
"I needed clothes and you clothed me, I was sick and you looked after me, I was in prison and you came to visit me."
People, especially passionate people, are often distracted by what makes the FEEL virtuous, and are missing the idea that they may be just conceited.
So the solution needs to be some kind of end-to-end service, where the immigrants pay traffickers for the housing too.
When you mention the Inquisition are you referring to the governance mechanism that saved countless lives from mob hysteria?
Don't forget Libertarians also DRIVE ON ROADS! ?
Here’s one thing I taught my son well: always get ahead of trouble by immediately informing your employer when you harm the equipment
I have an idea for a nonprofit service - where do I go to get these concepts mapped?
Do you know of any rappers that occupy the pole positions or who would exemplify these?
Avoiding premature optimizations?
I have enough
The abundance-with-signaling mentality (over the survival mentality) seems to be analogous here. The complex novel phenotype being Wokeism.
Tail your car through foggy rain in the nighttime without losing you
You get an /r/iamsosmart signaling effect, certainly, but at least you can automate the data gathering
You can scrape Wikipedia for the directed graph of influences from Plato and keep it limited that way
But you could use that terminology to stress its provenance, I suppose
Cunningham's Law
I think because its original means “postponement” in Greek  What are you thinking it means in English?
I’m up for the discussion of any hypothetical scenario you can come up with.
The only chance I get to watch TV is in a motel room, and by “watch” I mean with the sound off, until I find a movie I like, where I get to experience periodic interruptions designed by eyeball-harvesting sociopaths, which means the sound gets muted again, and I’m back on Twitter
There are psychometric studies that show openness to new information and conscientiousness to be the the most powerful determinants of your political alignment
Data should be exportable to something like CSV, where it can be analyzed later.
Here's to a great future!
I can really relate to this guy. He goes on a three-day "no junk food" diet, and in the end, it's his own wife that convinces him to fall off the wagon!

The relationship in Dracula Untold (2014)
There are entire institutions where no stake holder is pleased with the way things are going. It seems like the larger the institution the more Moloch reigns.
Another thing it (the high modernist aesthetic) produced was the legibility craze, where everything must be in rows and columns so that bureaucrats can understand what’s going on
Cyborgs instead of robots
I think “hate symbol” is being redefined as “I have hate in my heart that wants to be publicly validated, here is a convenient symbol”.
If I settle, do I get to bring my microbiome with me?
So, some intense marketing to come up with a really cool last name, get everyone in the dynasty to change to that name, then have everyone in the future who joins the dynasty change to that last name. Lots of photos of your clan walking towards something to express the brand.
In Japan, men who marry into famous dynasties change their last names to maintain the brand. I’m thinking of incorporating that into my dynasty startup kit.
I can envision a kind of ophanocratic takeover where the population is forced to make a choice to join a DAO or something
As a child, we were all about obnoxious aggression. When the girls tried ruinous empathy on you, it had absolutely no effect.
? The shorthand for “huh” doesn’t have that breathy stupidity needed to be extra annoying
We adopted a street urchin who was a nephew of someone in the homeschooling group because they were too old to handle his high energy. (We are now too old to handle his high energy.)
He is not a cuck, certainly
Endgame seems like something final and public for which you can be permanently and righteously judged.
“Nice weather we are having as I drink this... glass of water”
The Book of Numbers
Horse whispering, redoing electrical diagrams to a different layout, hugs
“Something similar happens in the humanities, where a famous (usually french) guy establish a methodology or rule, and the anglo counter-parts game the rule to produce concatenations of polysyllabic words.”
Whenever and wherever prices are not allowed to be set by auction (for instance where property rights are banned), if the price in money is capped the remaining price signal shows up in line length
They also give a clue as to what sci-fi special effects should REALLY be looking like
I created a graph for Jung in chronological layout, and it looks like a sail-less schooner with a mast at each saeculum:
I’d like to do an extension of the tribes graph, but following the forefathers back to their (mostly) Christian origins
Listening to books on tape, then CDs, then MP3s, and now mostly text-to-speech (TTS). I’ve listened to a mult-actor paraphrase of the Bible all the way through over 50 times. Really got a feel for it!
I don't know if you are getting anything out of this, but it is also worth the effort to do a word study on "Shame" (????????) in the Hebrew Bible. I hope for you the best.
That's a good segway from the original tweet, which was to try to parrot an opposing ideology in a kind of Turing Test. It's actually quite hard to do it.
Yeah, I'm lost when it comes to parroting other people's values. Lack of empathy. :-)
How do I do that?
I think the syncretized, and now atheized, descendant of Calvinism (passing thru the English Puritans to the New England Unitarians, Transcendentalists, Progressives et al) is at the root of this religious impulse. God is dead but humans evolved to fill the void with something.
I think you're assuming here that "failed" means for me that I didn't come to an answer that I wanted, though I used the right procedure. I failed because my math when aggregated on a national level gave me a wildly different number than what I know the national rate to be.
"I'm trying to disprove things with simple statistics - generally, Nazi pseudoscience about genetics and race and Marxist pseudoscience about the malleability of human nature." It's a simple problem with state-level numbers that need to be turned into nation-level rates.
I have this really simple math problem with some data that I can’t solve. Every time I show it on any social media, I get a religiously moralizing response.
You have a chip on your shoulder. Read the text in the link.

The first one is the only one I've actually researched using FBI and UNIDOC data. So not very lifelike, eh?
The US homicide rate by race correlates with the continent their ancestors evolved on, so probably other social measures also correlate with genetics, therefore their probably is a superior race.
This is a Turing Test in a tweet, so my game is to guess just from this tweet if this is indeed from the ideologue or is it from someone just parroting. I would bet it was just parroting based only on the lack of moral or emotional tone. Avoiding regressive game theory, of course
By that definition Liberalism has eliminated a lot of evils
I think the angsty teen phase is a biproduct of the factory model of schooling, or at least just the government schools. There are certainly edge cases and transitions, but I’ve never seen it among K-12 home schoolers.
Regardless, sufferers find that addressing the disorder at the archetypal or theological level produces the best cure.
Surprisingly, what you have is a form of PTSD. PTSD happens when your naïveté comes in contact with (usually your own) capacity for malice. In your case, I suspect it’s a sin of omission rather than of commission.
It’s important to get the story straight, because you have to act like it’s true. Here’s my attempt at a minimum viable theology of cringe: Existence itself is shame. God knows that, but because He is Love, He came down to experience it fully Himself. He identifies and forgives.
recommends writing down the event, just killing it with the details. Every time it comes back add more detail, different aspects, etc. From there you can apply the two great inheritances from Christianity: Irony and Forgiveness.
Build a dynasty out of your clan. Get everyone schooled and trained to budget and invest in the future. Set up an ophanim that financially rewards motherhood. Establish an agile project management methodology for social, technical, and spiritual asset accumulation also.
“And I will make mere lads their princes, and capricious children will rule over them, and the people will be oppressed, each one by another, and each one by his neighbor; the youth will storm against the elder and the inferior against the honorable.”
Micah is a rich source of musings on the applicability and juxtaposition of Christianity to modern philosophy and scientific concepts
Isn’t naïveté, not evil, what you would call lack of knowledge? How are naïveté and evil ? related?
This brings to mind how the sperm is stripped down so as not to bring any viruses ? or other foreign DNA into the egg
I like how she tries to put it back together at the end
Yes, I have seen this too. The training in skepticism is a multi-step process.
How much data do you have in evidence of this?
It’s funny, we tracked our homeschooled kids socializing and compared that to the stated numbers from some public school source, and we came up with better numbers! Also, the standard deviation in their play group was about 3 years.
Does this marriage-dependence-in-the-pursuit-of-social-standing-and-security genre have a name? The only other examples I can think of are Fill the Void and The Wedding Plan.
2) Actually, no. More like a less flirtatious version of Henry Crawford.
1) Anne Elliot 2) Captain James Benwick?
Given a large enough distribution of people wracked with guilt who cannot forgive themselves, you are going to get a mob projecting their collective guilt onto a scapegoat.
Here it is: “By definition metaphysical beliefs cannot be directly adaptive, that is, they cannot by themselves create an incentive to alter the real world in ways that improve the belief system’s ability to transmit itself.” He’s talking social memetics, not biological.
I think religions are not 100% memetic, but he's saying the amount biological adaptiveness they contribute is insignificant, so, pretty close.
I spent $10K on training, and then lost my job, my house, etc.
He says that theism has "no adaptive significance" - what is your take on that?
That's my excuse and I'm going to stick with it! :-)
"...only in epic poems are heroes humanly attractive. More usually in real life their dedication makes them unrelenting; their courage makes them overbearing; they are out of scale and therefore not amenable to ordinary mortal intercourse."nn~ Henry Kissinger
I tried aquaponics and discovered I was too lazy to build my own and too poor to buy one
You don't see the same things happening to our starvationcare system, for instance.
I think it started as “How do we bring Catholic Democrats over to our side?” But your link probably explains it better
Kind of like GoT, where the large-scale circumstances eventually breed the moral failings, and hardly the other way around
Like “instrumentalize” or “weaponize” words, redefining them to suit their own purposes?
“A big challenge for progressivism is wrapping up a century-long messy divorce with Socialism.”
Why can’t I retweet this? And isn’t a lot of this temperament-based (as in “openness to new experiences”)?
I use the  app to look up key words and tricky phrases. My children share inside jokes and explain them to me.
What did men in the previous century wear before they started wearing slacks? Taughts?
Flight of the Valkyrie
Where does the motivation for explicitness come from? I'm thinking the "legibility" craze by centralized bureaucrats with high modernist aesthetics.
I've come to the conclusion that if give UBI wealth and social status to those who would otherwise be poor you will be rewarded with malignant narcissism for your compassion. Like that insufferable rich aunt, but on a universal scale.
What’s your take on the Crucifixion story?
How about central banks going off the gold standard causing the separation of productivity from wages causing the increase in two-earner families? That’s fairly wacky and vulgar, but I think it’s at least testable
A good example of a film that was better without spoilers was the Matrix. It kept your curiosity alive for like an hour. Glad that wasn’t spoiled for me. Most films, though, I watch for character development, not plot
Reddit, Twitter, Quora
So, the problem is the “ant farm” is too big here on the planet now?
I remember when HR departments started switching from asking your sex to asking your gender. If a text box, I always put “Masculine”. Gone are the halcyon days of yore!
How about converting your family into a dynasty? I'm working on a starter kit.
Suffering is really knowledge of the true price of something. Willingness to suffer is truth seeking.
Man! These are great!
I have a strong association between road parts I’ve traveled on and concepts I’ve thought up. Rethinking the concept brings the spot on the road to mind and traveling the road brings the concepts to mind.
The Bible, as in, someone who has read the things multiple times and has a good grasp of the various hermeneutics.
"ophanacric" economics, from "ophanim" — the wheel-within-a-wheel of Ezekiel 1:16
Reading this, I was hanging on to not spelling "lose" "loose" and not spelling "you're" "your". Good job, everybody.
It's the result of the data that they trained their recurrent neural network on, specifically their encoder-decoder. Your face turns out to be an edge case for their data, most of which happens to be Asian. They don't have enough examples of what your face would look like younger
Pure and undefiled religion in the sight of our God and Father is this: to visit orphans and widows in their distress, and to keep oneself unstained by the world. James 1:27
Imagine what getting off a debased currency could do.
The skill of unstilted writing (and public speaking for introverts) then would be the skill of creating an inner fan club of tulpas, which is rather like the skill of manipulating your own dreams, in the sense of pulling out that which is at the border of your own consciousness
When you write you semi-consciously create an inner circle of listeners. Are these possibly tulpas? Stilted writing due to creating the hostile or judgmental sort?
Concur: unschooling is by far the most demanding of homeschooling methods. You have to be a “scholar whisperer” with the power and flexibility to bring in the appropriate resources at the moment of greatest motivation.
I love the Southern US “gratitude culture”: may it grow in power and flexibility.
Eating at Chicken Salad Chick! There’s a board on the wall with  ‘s name on it.
Everyone has an inner circle of listeners that they half-subconsciously set up while writing or recording speech. If you pay attention to it, you can catch yourself switching them out for a more or less critical circle. Does it help if you were sincerely listened to as a child?
Thanks. I feel the need to conquer my lack of impulse control first as earlier attempts at debt reduction didn’t work.
I need help. I have $50K in student loan debt, mounting medical bills, maxed out credit cards, and have given myself over to the pursuit of short term pleasures. Where can I get dedicated attention?
It could attract graffiti
You could encase it in a greenhouse and do away with the need for exterior insulation
What makes taxation not theft?
Did you do a search through your own code before you went on Stack?
Probably those who struggle the most to write with clarity have some misconstruction in their inner listeners
From my point of view he became more and more libertarian, so a downward drift
It’s your inner circle of listeners modeled after the squad you hung around with as a teenager

Could someone explain to me what an EA is?
The Great Depression &amp; World War IInThe Civil WarnAmerican RevolutionnThe colonial Glorious RevolutionnThe Armada CrisisnThe War of the Roses
Have you ever read P. D. James' novel The Children of Men, or seen the movie?
What’s its name?
Early stage fascism? Transition between Strauss–Howe generational theory saeculums?
Maybe there’s more to it than that? E.g. in the movie Starship Troopers there are two female characters with an equal amount of good lines. On the screen, they are both strikingly beautiful, but only one gives a compelling characterization. The other is a distracting mannequin.
You are my man, Saad! :-)
I would encourage actions that demonstrate skin in the game
Yes, but I think that Gen Z wants something more than what the Big Other is offering, hence the reason I am deconstructing arranged marriages.
Can you then explain your Checklist and Peer Review in terms of status, assets, and claims?
This object lesson is lost on him, though, as he tries to get God to kill him when the shade is taken away. Finally God calls him out: “Are you really that angry?” “Yes! I’m angry enough to die!” “About a plant that you didn’t plant, that grew in a day and died in a day?”
He then leaves the city and makes himself a shelter, waiting to see whether or not the city will be destroyed. God grows a plant around it, giving him shade from the harsh sun, much like the city of Nineveh gives protection for the children and animals behind its walls.
The scene after the repentance shows the second contrast: Jonah doesn’t want to be made wrong by God’s mercifulness. Jonah wines that it was inevitable that God would turn from the threatened calamities, that’s why he went to Tarshish!
The king goes all out in sackcloth and ashes and decrees a fasting, sackcloth, prayer, and repentance lockdown (comically, even with the animals). The entire city is humbled and broken. God sees their repentant hearts and spares the city, for now.
What should I visit in Vermont?
God again commands Jonah to travel to Nineveh and prophesy to its inhabitants. Finally, he goes, wandering around the city crying “Forty days, and Nineveh. Shall be. DESTROYED!” By the time Jonah has walked across the city, the people begin to believe his word and declare a fast.
While in the sea monster, Jonah prays to God in his affliction and commits to thanksgiving and fulfilling what he has vowed. “When my life was fainting away, I remembered the Lord, and my prayer came to you, into your holy temple.” God then commanded the fish to vomit him out.
“The comic aspect (as Jonah goes to his extremes) [is that] he in fact anticipates the movement of Christ down into Hades, then back up and then ascending to Heaven, but he does so almost despite himself, whining and complaining as a parody of the actual meaning.”
I want to go off here on a tangent, given the extensive iconographic history of this story as a symbol of death and resurrection, the significance of the three days, and how the years 2020, 2021, and 2023 are going to be swallowed by their own monster.
Jonah is miraculously saved by being swallowed by a sea monster, in whose belly he spends three days and nights. “For just as Jonah was three days and three nights in the belly of the great fish, so will the Son of Man be three days and three nights in the heart of the earth.”
In contrast, Jonah just wants God to push the Divine Smite Button (on himself in this case). The sailors refuse at first and continue rowing, but all their efforts eventually fail and they are forced to cast him overboard. This calms the storm and the sailors offer God worship.
The scene on the ship shows the first contrast: the pagans are desperately trying to find a god that can save them, and don’t want to sacrifice someone, even if he is no kin of theirs and claims responsibility for the calamity.
In an elaborate, seemingly artificial plot twist, Jonah boards a ship to Tarshish to get far away from Nineveh as possible. Caught in no ordinary storm, the sailors cast lots and determine Jonah’s to blame. Jonah admits this and that if they cast him overboard, the sea will calm.
The Book of Jonah is a contrast comedy about a prophet who is repeatedly trying to kill himself and refusing to own up to his own responsibility. The central figure is called upon by God to travel to Nineveh and warn its inhabitants of impending divine wrath.
“People who shut their eyes to reality simply invite their own destruction, and anyone who insists on remaining in a state of innocence long after that innocence is dead turns himself into a monster.” James Baldwin
“And calling to him a child, he put him in the midst of them and said, ‘Truly, I say to you, unless you turn and become like children, you will never enter the kingdom of heaven. Whoever humbles himself like this child is the greatest in the kingdom of heaven.’”
My thoughts are more participatory tulpas than propositions and when in the process of writing them down I get caught up the ideologies of the tool and end up kayfabeing them.
I hear you. I used to tell my children they took it away when I was in the Navy (“non-judicial punishment”).
Which subcultures have high fertility rates? Mormons? Muslims?
The tax and regulatory structure disincentivizes that
I think to put that much work into it they would have to gain some amount of social status (“Yes! It was our family that arranged that shack up with the movie star!”), or acquire some kind of social asset, or be able to make additional social claims. It’s hard to see this working
The purpose of arranged marriages was to acquire in-laws as a kind of social asset. It was left to the would-be bride and groom to balance duty, loyalty, and romance. So the wedding night was like casual sex with a stranger. What if the families put that much work into hookups?
This could also head in the direction of arranged marriages, with what (algorithm) or who (crowdsourced) replacing extended family for the arranging and various -amories possibly replacing marriage.
Try switching it off with a MAGA hat for research purposes
How do you say (in cat language) “I don’t speak cat”? We’re having this extended conversation all the time ?
I remember worshiping at one of the smaller megachurches there (1000+ people) and being struck by every single hairstyle you could imagine, randomly sorted, in the pew in front of me.
How do you go from binary sharing (all or nothing) to something in between? Can there be a market for social assets (or claims, I guess) that can send signals that this is the community you want to join, this is not?
So, what are its spiritual(?) assets, if any?
How do these floating cities handle their trash and sewage? The cruise ships certainly don’t do a good job
One time I stuck my head in a large reactor plant control box and inadvertently moved too close to the high voltage probes. The shock launched my head into the probes on the opposite side and I ping ponged like that until gravity got me out of the danger zone. No permanent damage
Reminds me of the two famous Buddhas of Bamiyan which were destroyed by the Taliban. Is the mural also regarded as idolatrous?
Is that the kind that lives in clonal colonies and spreads by means of root suckers?
As a matter of fact, cameras in the face would prevent a lot of shenanigans
The process of creating and the process of playing both lend themselves to reality show coverage
An extensible treasure hunt game which involves written clues and driving around. The clues can extend to LARPing and the clue sites can be enriched using GPS and local establishments
I have this idea, but the funding for it will probably involve crowd sourcing
Justin Raimondo, the last of a now extinct breed
This is what it looks like when a destructive egregore takes over a school board and each member streams their own particular melee.
Yes you are, but I'm hoping you can find yourself to a place where you don't have to be interviewed by someone from HR. Possibly a gig?
My contacts in aviation say that this issue is too complex to get a name like that - there are too many considerations for self-naming.
You’re an entrepreneur with a good balance of business, coding, and writing experience
The “It’s turtles all the way down” phrase is older than Hawking
I find paperwork excruciating! I put it off to the last possible minute and have mental blocks about it when discussed in detail. It’s an API to these indeterminate “servers” which require I follow poorly understood protocols with complex feedback cycles
The point is to “act like you believe in God”. Are we saying that doesn’t apply downstream? What about survivability of the congregation?
Case in point: If you are a minority and you speak outside of the role the rich white girls have set for you, you will be made to suffer.
Statistics
Every time I smoke cigars, my cat feels the need to lick my beard clean
Is today Juneteenth?
Everything that ends up surviving over multiple generations by getting copies of itself made is in the infinite game.
Okay, so now I’m thinking that overcentralization exposes an economy to political risks.
“I act as if God exists.” Jordan Peterson
Happy Fathers Day twitter.
The 10K and 100K mark will both happen twice
He can definitely hold his own against her theology degree, but I have to stop them occasionally and summarize each position when they start talking past each other
Why are you preventing property rights from extending to the air, water, and ocean? I could sue the hell out of somebody who polluted the breathed-in air I homesteaded
The more layers in the stack, the more this will be true. I fear we’ll eventually program our own terrible gods to sacrifice our children to.
This is my Fathers Day: my son and I drink porters while he and my wife discuss theology and classical education
Are you an Anarchocapitalist/Volunteerist?
I think by “unanimously” she is referring to the fact that all the distributions overlap, which is a non sequitor.
How about this: if you don’t go broke doing it, then it isn’t political.
This should be taught at the beginning of every grade school class in mathematics
1) Reproducen2) In such a way that your children admire you
What's your funding model compared to these independents? Is there long-term financial viability in any of them?
I wonder if we can make a node-edge graph visualization of the way tribes formed into Westphalian nation states and transition that into the memetic tribes graph.
I see the Christian groups as mediocre versions of the transition tithers you speak of, but it's hard to lug around 2 billion people when you are making generalizations.
What was his reaction?
The baseline is created by dividing by the frequency of the word “and” for the same time periods
It’s a play on the “if men were angels” argument of Federalist number 51
The word “ophanocracy” which means “rule by decentralized governance mechanisms” has at its root the “ophanim” - the wheel-within-a-wheels of Ezekiel 1:16
Similar problems (502 errors waiting for local webservers) except it was happening with 74.x
, what’s your take on this application of Georgism to San Francisco?
What was your safe space when you were of college age? Mine was the USS Carl Vinson carrier group out in the Indian Ocean. I was able to incrementally overcome all my fears there
Is there a service out there for desperate people willing to live in prison, which can provide a means of conviction for these stupid crimes without being legally answerable? The entertainment value alone could provide a source of revenue
What do you prefer most in a politician?
This mechanism, but the fog of lies that causes social media players to coalesce into digital tribes
Not spend all my parent’s money so that there is nothing left for their grandchildren
Metaphors as Schelling points?
I come from a family of cattlemen and learned a lot of campfire songs when I was young. My aunts eventually wrote them down. Did I teach them to my children, though? Just the funny ones
The nape of the neck always surprises me (with its its attractiveness) when the hair is up.
Using Reddit is like traveling through a jungle trying to avoid the wandering troops of monkeys. And, yes, their howling sometimes sounds like “That’s racist!” but mostly just sounds like “Your stupid” “No, your stupid” with grunt-like downvotes
Statistician. That way you can deflect and still discuss what you’re working on
Finally, someone not forcing their values on the homeless and calling it compassionate
Imagine a scenario where you could retro-incarnate into your teenage self. What question would you ask your elders? How useful do you think their answers would be? I remember asking my dad (who was busy liquidating my grandfather's fortune) if I should save for the future? Nah!
The difference between a “ship” and a “boat”
Embedding the tweet
Can I use this image in a blog post entitled "Venkatesh Rao's Automation Death Trap Effect"?
Yeah, that’s what I was thinking of - negative convexity - so the value add is relating it to the forgetting curve
Yes? But it would take a long time to prove it.
Idiocracy is not just a funny movie, it’s a real threat
The concave shape of the human capability is like that of the projected forgetting curves of the spacing effect. There’s no way to cram for an emergency.
The military trains constantly on loss-of-technology scenarios for their own infrastructure. Are you sure that civilians don’t?
So, what is a more realistic plot to the 2006 Idiocracy movie?
I bought a copy and need to get it back in Voice Dream to finish listening to it. How do I go about doing this?
But it's getting a little weird: some of these guys literally believe that every gun is loaded! You, on the other hand, know this is not true and you let them know. They respond with “But ! Isn’t that nihilistically reckless?” Now, is the enactment still true, though?
Imagine a hypothetical scenario, though. Everyone around you is doing whatever it takes to provoke enactment of "treat every gun like its loaded". This is working out fine: they've survived many generations this way.
Your commitment to the truth is admirable.
What’s your take on charisma? Is it a necessary component of competence? Does that rule out Aspie-adjacents who cannot inspire devotion? Asking for a friend
What’s the date stamp for the “I am not Dorian Nakamoto”? March 6, 2014? Wasn’t he already under arrest at that time?
I’d say that all new endeavors start out that way. Don’t the more competent pioneers accumulate power even before the settlers arrive?
We need to get Christian concepts such as the stain of sin, purity and innocence back into the vocabulary of the analysis of identity politics
No stop sign is dismissible. Each must be inspected for mud spots and bullet holes
No, but there is a temperament that doesn’t like to be lathered in complements
What’s gives people a license to express themselves this way? Does modern feminism give social approval to brutality?
Skin in the game on the part of everyone who makes the decision to let them in is good. Perhaps a city-to-city packeting system like the one proposed by  with measures like crime and income permanently associated with the city officials?
This scenario works well for me also. Why is it that driving works best for me and plane flights work worst, though? I am sitting for both of them.
lists the Vulnerability Type for Meltdown as CWE-200 (Information Leak / Disclosure). Maybe they should add Bug Class to the Technical Details
What’s a perfect way to mark those tweets where someone else just has to talk about something... even if the person on the other end of the conversation (in this case you) doesn't care at all? Not necessary, it’s already twitter
Like a sparrow in its flitting, like a swallow in its flying, a curse that is causeless does not alight. Proverbs 26:2
That fits nicely in the multiple virtual worlds scenario. Your social self can be partially encoded. Your data exhaust can be permission-pushed. The legal legacy of the West can be designed into Ophanocracies. (Anyway, that’s where I was heading with this.)
Maybe it’s better conceived as (or it will become more salient when) each of us, or the dominant of us, creating a virtual world that is less inhabitable by those complaining about it. That keeps the personal identity conception loose if you’re forced to enter and exit often
What subpart of the self is it that is doing all the bashing into each other? The egos?
So, the survivability shows up more on the cultural or religious level. Do practitioners of Eastern religions give up on naive conceptions of personal identity?
Because it doesn’t enhance their evolutionary fitness?
Sounds like you have the humility to see well enough to pull the treasure out of the ashes and pass them down as an inheritance
Then sure
It’s possible that if you ACT like God exists - like Christ saved you - that that is enough (to provoke enactment of the manners and morals referred to). But probably not for enough people to make a difference.
Is this “thing” a person, commitment, or activity?
"You're slipping closer toward an abyss!" "No you are!"
Yes! Make a plan to visit Porcfest () and ask that same question in person.
I think they’re on to you
I think we've moved beyond plot into character development. You don't need to be ignorant of how a story ends to enjoy it.
I do now see the utility of keeping a group of friends that you made when you were young together for the rest of your life - kind of how they did before advances in communication and transportation technology ground that to powder.
I think I would need the second-order help of a deity or sage to understand the optimum grouping. My wife, though (my only permanent friend due to travel) is both highly sensitive to negative emotions and highly conscientious.
So, if you could retro-incarnate back to your halcyon days when the storms of life were calm enough for you to pick your companions, who would you pick?
Shouldn't burning-with-desire be hyphenated?
I recognize this as a virtue signal to other atheists.
What 40000 Videos Tell Us About The Trending Tab
View my verified achievement from CompTIA on Acclaim:
God is not the species of any genus, not contained by any container. You could say we’re evolving our understanding by coming up with gods as attempts at containment.
Very encouraging thread from a fellow PCA member from Nebraska:
Integral Theorists?
It sounds like, in this area of argumentation, that self-righteousness is a clear and present danger: how to attack someone's ideas without attacking the person themselves!
Mediocrity knows nothing higher than itself, but talent instantly recognizes genius.nnSir Arthur Conan Doyle
When you let people into academia based not on their merits, this low-IQ group will eventually produce all the resentment-based attacks on open society, civil liberties, and science that we see today.
Ironically by retro incarnating back into my junior high school body and making space for myself in the social scene
I was born in 1961 and by a series of dreams the last few nights have shifted my perspective to that of a wizened old man - so count me in
I was just imagining how, in the mid 70s, I’d have to explain to the guy who runs the big offset printer how to print out blank spreadsheets that I could use to collect tabulated data.
I remember being slightly surprised by certain lispy pronunciations when I was there - is that the Southern accent?
The south of Spain doesn’t have an accent different than the north of Spain?
They are in alphabetical order, of course. I think if someone did a cluster analysis of all the theology podcasts, yours would be located in a small, isolated cluster.
Are you thinking more Joseph Campbell’s Hero’s Journey or more Strauss-Howe generational theory?
I just had this conversation with my wife: she keeps her theology books in case her children might want to read them.
This is also possibly true if you respond to the wait staff with “whatever is convenient for you” when they recite a shortlist which you’re indifferent to, but I’ve always had a positive experience doing it that way.
Why in the world would I tell you? How about what’s my top signaling opinion?
How about letting them work or hire people for less than minimum wage?
This is unfair nitpicking. Everyone else reading your tweet thought you made a valid point, though.

Moving from service provider to moral fashion police has been a bad move for Twitter
I'm applying to the  registry! My Ethereum address is 0x1c758bf0c7421800675bd54825024e559de1841c
There's also the complication that Capitalism isn't a political architecture - the "ism" is more like "mechanism" than ideology. And you can't switch from using deductive logic to determine number of deaths for Socialism to using non-monotonic logic for Capitalism.
I’m a Cancer ?? and that’s why I didn’t know what to do with it
I still remember in the seventies its excuse for losing money was that there was TOO MUCH demand!
Governor Little should start a podcast with his take on each chapter, explaining the political motivations of those who got them on the books
This word makes me feel small
Are these regulations more than just attempts to appear/feel compassionate?
In what way? Has the average IQ or median age has gone down or something?
“To the weak I became weak, that I might win the weak.” To the those who believe in an objective reality, I respect the rules of engagement by arguing for the objective reality of God. “I have become all things to all people, that by all means I might save some.”
I think we just optimized our evangelism to the rationalist environment. I imagine we’ll develop an anti-rational response to this anti-rational attack. Note, though, how the moral landscape is now more similar to ours than it used to be.
?? discovers that the void created by driving Christianity out of rational discourse has been filled by an anti-rational religion and that he actually has a lot in common with his old enemies
No he’s correct: if you are cartoonishly hating there’s usually a shadow projection involved
It worked great for me at the after-high-school-reunion party. I came in to the bar, found the waitress, said “this $20 bill is for you, I know you will do a great job” and introduced her to my entourage. Even though the place was packed she was very attentive.
Ophanocracies should be designed to overcome inherent human irrationality
There’s this new technology called “robo calls”
He could move out a decided-before-hand number of satoshis from each of his wallets without revealing the private keys, simply. We could all publicly observe this, no?
No, you can actually link to it:
The Univariate Fallacy explained and explored in a thread:
Can we develop a measure of cumulative-to-date testosterone?
I have the word “Scientist” in my job title - is that sufficient? (Because I struggle with being rigorous and with cognitive biases and I feel a little like an imposter.)
Software that discovers vulnerabilities in your rivals’ software and exploits them for malicious intent. Mess with their fridge, etc.

Hilarious thread
Fake linear regression model fit == Fake News
My answer to How do we address the lopsided distribution of wealth or capital in the U.S.A when the top 1% own upwards of 70% of the wealth and capital in the country?
Those burning questions I have that I can't google an answer to I post on . I have a vast treasure-trove of them just sitting there, not being answered.
The problem is, if you hadn't had that tragic arc, you might never have become the person you are (and we wouldn't have benefited from it). You are a Christ-figure in this sense, taking on the iniquities of the world, being crucified for the benefit of the elect.
This needs some thunder-like sound effects
My dog has performed his first “herbal cleanse” of the year where he eats grass then throws it up
Imagine a future scenario where NLP machines are able to fool an ever increasing number of journals. What criteria would you need to add to stop the misqualifications?
cc
My son makes the finest quality vape juice money can buy
I added a notation for the most evil country:
But 30% more than 15% would be 40.5% by this calculation.
How about 80 + (100-80)*0.3 = 86%?
What's 30% more than 80%?
I play dozens of games of chess simultaneously. It generally feels like mass seduction (with the occasional fist fight). If the prey is too weak, it becomes a mop up operation. If too strong, I end up admiring their beauty.
There are literally billions of problem-solvers on the planet with enough wealth to focus their attention on the problem. I’m hoping the virtue signallers can be distracted from emboldening the tyrants long enough to give the engineers space to work.
The Book of Isaiah
It really should be cumulative lifetime testosterone as the measure.
"We knew Hitler was a vulgar and ignorant little cad, in addition to any other defects (or the source of them); but there seem to be many v. and i. l. cads who don't speak German, and who given the same chance would show most of the other Hitlerian characteristics." JRR Tolkien
I wrote something up about it in /r/Polycentric_Law:
It’s a conceptual hook for “rule by decentralized governance mechanisms”. The word is a play on the “if men were angels” argument in Federalist #51 using the “wheel within a wheel” angels (the Ophanim) of Ezekiel 1:16.
Hopefully ophanocratic technology will soon be mature enough to facilitate this.
I didn’t start watching until the flag was obliterated. But it came back as a stronger symbol.
Right. So at first you have non-symbolic images of low complexity: the void, the lines. (The blue is a special case of this because it highjacks “corner” as a symbol.) Next come the emoticons, etc.
You could even categorize according to local vs global cooperativeness, compressibility, and some political or spiritual aspects.
Yeah, with the lines as well: they deliberately went under things and crisscrossed to integrate as harmoniously as possible.
This is a good point! He just took what little scripture they held fast to, and used only that to refute them.
Find interesting patterns and insights in data and use that as a starting point with a subject matter expert to develop a valid simulation to answer some “what if” question they always wanted to answer.
How would you characterize the line and heart communities? (It seems they would be closer to your “asshole” designation.)
I can also see doing this with an image output that can take lots of configuration input, like a matplotlib graph. Want to know what style that scatter plot is using? Create a bunch of training data by combinatorics and use that as training data for your CNN.
I had an idea to do something like this, as you can produce an unlimited amount of perfectly-labeled training data from LaTex itself for the CNN to train on.
Weather porn is mostly composed of videos of weather doing things that would get your heart racing if you were there to experience it. The salient aspect is that which fills your senses.
Hence the motherhood pay gap: you’d have to do something like incorporate the child and have it pay dividends on the child’s earnings to monetize motherhood (and get rid of the pay gap).
Calf FlankernBusboynDishwashernReactor OperatornCouriernWeb DevelopernData Scientist
Speaking of , the two are going to be debating. If they are confabulators both, wouldn’t the mere act expose the BS?
“What’s your degree in?”nn“Predictive Analytics”nn“What’s that?”nn“I can code better than a statistician and do statistics better than a software engineer.”
Trads are by temperament not creative
I think there is a level of intelligence below “dumb” which is less capable of being foolish. Smarter than a rock but not commutative enough to be ascribed more than a stoic personality.
If you could lay out the nodes on the x/y axis, I will recompute the graph. (All these great ideas - the dynamism, the complexity - take data to model. I'm just working with what I've got.)
How about along the connectionist/deconnectionist and thrive/survive axes? Or pair up the left/right axis with the authoritarian/libertarian axis?
What would your slogan be?

I think I'm going to transfer my allegiance to the Sorters and Benedictines.
Since Satoshi's white paper, I've been dreaming of ophanocracies, decentralized "wheel within a wheel" governance mechanisms. It looks more like we are developing "nephilocracies" - monstrosities that appear right before a catastrophe as evidence that something is wrong.
The Memetic Tribes Google Spreadsheet has added more combatants!
It's a futile attempt to wrest from the minds of the Marxists, who invented the word, the definition of Capitalism. It's basically whatever they don't like about mixed economies.
This is what John Vervaeke (@ vervaeke_john) refers to as “salience landscaping”
*poignancy
I am using it in a wrong sense. Imagine a person who is really good at a video game. Is it the best way to describe that person by reference to their beliefs about how they think the programmers coded the game up? No, it’s their at-one-ment, not their doctrines that are important
Alchemy gave birth to Chemistry. Astrology gave birth to Astronomy. You can view this hairball from the doctrinal end, but you are just going to see the contradictions. Yeah, I don't like the "Noble Lies" term either. Maybe "intentional salience landscapes"?
These are complex things with a large attack surface, so I'm going to try to limit them to talking about practitioners of confession, repentance, contemplation, meditation, etc. Belief is a canard: you can believe that porcupines throw their quills and still remain safe thereby.
There are two possible dimensions here: 1) how fleshly/platonic the subject matter is, and 2) how loose/tight the writing style is. Can you map pitch, roll, yaw, tilt, pan, etc., to something (and not just elevation)?
It turns out that a religion that highly values truth eats itself in the end. It gives birth to Science, and Science points out where it believes in Noble Lies. But the very believing-in, the acting-as-if-it-were-true, is what is making it survive in this post-enlightenment age.

Does this explain the constant redefining of words? Some groups are pulling the rug out from under public with this tactic.
Thought outliner? I find that the process of getting my thoughts organized enough to put in outline destroys them. They are more like tulpas than propositions.
Do you have a link to the discussion page? This page has a marketing brochure smell to it and Wikipedians don’t like brochureware.
Yeah, it’s already gone. What reasons did the delete Nazis give for that?
Add Spotify and the genus is platformware
needs their own Wikipedia page
According to Wikipedia, Notion is collaborationware. But maybe I’m losing the thread and we’re actually trying to give a genus name to platforms, not apps.
How about something with the “ware” suffix? There is more to these apps than that they only come alive when used by more than one user (fax machines, Bitcoin), but what is it, exactly? That special something is what we suffix the “ware” to.

Does everybody take it for granted that the All Presents Singularity that connects the Initial Singularity with the Final Singularity is infinitely close to all the multiverses? Because I don’t hear a peep from anyone about it.
Guess who’s going to pay for their own protection AND for patrolling the neighborhoods where their would-be perpetrators are forming?
I wasn’t thinking of shadow projection when I said “opposite” - more like a different species of the same philosophy genus
This sounds like the plot to Atlas Shrugged!
Describe what you ascribe to in a two-word, mutually-prefixed way
What is the opposite of Neo-Marxist Postmodernism?
Presbyterian fractal-localist Ophanocritopian Anarchocapitalism
According to Liddell and Scott, a creed (like the Nicene Creed) “was called in Greek a ???????? (symbolon), which originally meant half of a broken object which, when fitted to the other half, verified the bearer's identity.” Sounds like public key cryptography!
I added them to my Quora answer
What would prevent us (or at least the super intelligence) from collapsing the universe (maybe by quantum tunneling in some antibaryons and annihilating them to force the Higgs field to its absolute vacuum to give the cosmological constant a negative value)?
Have you thought of the landlord angle, where you buy a duplex and pay the mortgage with the rental income?
Anyway, back to the Lie. Our ancestors have acted like God is the threat, that living in fear of Judgement is the beginning of Wisdom. They have used this to work hard on removing self-deception and self-destructive behavior. They have told the truth as much as they were able.
There is another way, of course: by any means necessary, ban all guns. But because the Will to Power is always present, it's possible that more people die this way. All totalitarian governments that have engaged in mass murder have banned guns, for instance.
Take the statement "treat all guns as if they are loaded" as an example. This is a Noble Lie. Is it not true that every gun is loaded. But if you act like it is true, it will keep your progeny alive longer. So you teach it to your children, and they teach it to theirs.
Okay, so let's posit that an ancient enemy (say, Satan and his demons realized as social pathologies, self-deception, and self-destructive behaviors) is the alien invasion. Is the fog of lies too great to battle through?
Wikipedia editing is in interplanetary space but the talk pages dip down into the blue of atmospheric flight.
My entire life has been working out this fantasy in my head. It’s been continuously morphing over the decades, as I make realizations and meditate on them.
My answer to Can you explain the downfall of Bitcoin?
The nations: "God, you're in danger! We will knock you off your pedestal."nGod: "LOL! No, I'm actually pretty safe."
My great grandfather had a railroad car load of books sent to him, and I got to check out some of the titles as a child. One explained, with great seriousness, the basics of nutrition were Oxygen and Nitrogen and that baked potatoes had every atom a body needs to stay healthy!
“But you, O Lord, laugh at them; you hold all the nations in derision.” Psalms 59:8
It's my #Twitterversary! I have been on Twitter for 12 years (since 17 Mar 2007).nWhat's your #TwiAge?
This is March in 2019 - what happened to rainy January?
Agent-based simulation design for ophanocracies
You can throw a random group of guys into a mild survival situation, and within a week they will be laughing together and having fun. What happens when you throw a random group of gals into that same situation?
, RE: the gender wage gap, points out that it's mostly a motherhood gap, and that monetizing child rearing is hard. I think you could adapt the idea presented in  by  to this monetization problem.
Maybe these are popular because they have some course-grained validity, like ancient religions.
It might become the case, with an increase in the ease of deep fakes, that not only can one not can trust a broadcast, but reaching to the extent that one can only trust and receive information from a Dunbar's-number's worth of contacts.

I'm serious: the US minimum wage is classist. The union method of locking out the lesser-skilled is more decentralized.
Let's adopt Norway's 27 percent corporate tax rate, lack of government-imposed minimum wage, and low levels of protectionism.
Someone just posted on facebook: "My action through college channeled Donald Trump into the presidency." Is it contriteness? Or a call to violent action?
Better think about having kids:
This happens to everyone with an ability to remember details as they are growing up. You were younger once, didn't that happen to you also? (It's possible that you can determine the age of someone on the internet by observing this.)
It's possible that sexism or misogyny is not meaningfully falsifiable:
My answer to Why are so many young people attracted to socialism when all if the evidence shows it to be a failure?
does an excellent job interviewing people of various religious ideologies to the point where you forget the differences and are enthused about the meaning-making

Have you checked out Voice Dream?
Why is this necessary and how does one convert them?
Archangel, you don’t understand the concept of regulatory capture.
“Remember for my good, O my God, all that I have done for this people.” Nehemiah 5:19nnNehemiah was a high-energy, massively productive individual who signaled honestly and costly his worth to the community. Was it selfish to seek a reward?

I guess the difference between RPT and CDS is the thickness of their links? Something like CDS couldn’t happen randomly because of the lack of popularity?

Inb4 Ophanocracies

Ophanocracies? They are turning out to be very hard to design, though.
I would search around for something to get excited about that turns out to be lucrative, ride its ups and downs for the remainder of the year, then when I come back hopefully I still would be excited about it and prepare myself to take better advantage of it.
Does that make doing science harder?
It’s a lateral move my brain made reading your post. But I’d like to know your take on it.
When you do Science, to what extent do you have to assume an all-seeing deity outside of the universe?
Give every 14-year-old boy a reversible vasectomy and a coupon to reverse it to be redeemed when they can prove they can be responsible parents
I would love to see some examples of that. Also, do you consider “statist” a technical term or a pejorative term?
I think that’s actually a reference to the Kathy Newman interview of   so, inside joke where you’re supposed to enjoy the silliness
But when the disciples saw him walking on the sea, they were terrified, and said, “It is a ghost!” and they cried out in fear. But immediately Jesus spoke to them, saying, “Take heart; it is I. Do not be afraid.” Matthew 14:26-27
I bought it today and am using Voice Dream to convert it to audio. Are you the reader?
Do these four have similar personality traits such as the big five?
A text-to-speech app for mobile. It lets read while you have “ear time” literature stored in PDF or other electronic formats
It takes five and a half hours to listen to in Voice Dream
That’s what happens when you try to read a data-dense book like the Bible. You kinda “tunnel” through it.
I am reminded of how the cigar rollers used to have a speaker read political philosophy to them while working together.
Almost anything in the Western canon can make a good “ear time” activity. Even a group activity (though care must be taken to find what works for everyone). My wife and I listen to the New Testament together.
Said neesh when read and nitch when talked about

I think I'm more of a sorter. I like to listen to  develop rhetoric on-the-fly, and the other tribes don't do that so well.
A lot of these assume people won't be playing long-term iterative games where one needs to constantly straddle the boundary between order and chaos. In other words, they ignore common sense.
And they rose up and drove him out of the town and brought him to the brow of the hill on which their town was built, so that they could throw him down the cliff. But passing through their midst, he went away.
How do we monetize motherhood?
"In any case, to wear an improper expression on your face (to look incredulous when a victory was announced, for example) was itself a punishable offense. There was even a word for it in Newspeak: facecrime, it was called." (Orwell, 1984)
Infinite will to power
Finally someone got the font right.
When I took the poll, exactly half the people voted on each side of the question. Perfectly balanced commitments.
I used to get those when I started developing a sensitivity to caffeine.
50/50 was the most surprising result I could ever expect.
How do I increase my output? I am vastly open to new experiences but am really lazy. So I flit around like a butterfly ? but don’t hatch much.
What about ? Does he rush in blindly? Does he have the antidote?
Caveat: TODAY'S relevant tasks. The humans(?) of 2028 will find different tasks, relevant to the economy of 2028.
The lesson taught is to always tattle to a higher authority and never show moral independence
Is this CNN-based artistic style transfer?
Good to see you on here! We need more conservative voices.
What do you think of using the word “ophanocracies” for decentralized governance mechanisms (like the holacracy method)? (It’s a play on the “if men were angels” argument of Federalist #51 with the “wheels within wheels” angels of Ezekiel 1:16.)
The beginning of whatever YouTube produces
I know: I thought we could have a laugh together about that quaint phrase ?
"world-renowned" even! Isn't that everybody on the internet? :-)

What if they want to work for $3/hr? Why deny those not worth the minimum wage the dignity and personal agency to negotiate for themselves (or at least letting their unions do it)? This is not loving poor people, this is just hating rich people.
Religion is highly structured 24-7 BDSM. The pain comes from you doing it wrong. They have centuries of lessons learned to back themselves up with.
The universe exists in a metaphysical environment in which consciousness is a part?
How about “consciousness” is a part of the environment that we are optimizing to?
It's friendlier toward neo-Platonism, but imagine an infinite number of these gods, budding yeast-like:
I mean - you know - the designer outfit. :-)
That's simple: the outfit helps your dazzling face to fit in.
He distinguishes a right as a “special” privilege (at other people’s expense)
A lot of people in their twenties like to listen to classic rock - what was Top 40 when I was in high school. This is like a bunch of people from my generation listening to Bing Crosby and Perry Como in the eighties. But, "To Each His Own" (Eddy Howard).
Never forget what a robust business model BestBuy has
How easy is it for donors to set up a monthly donation?
Are you singly connected to payment processors who can?
Is Patreos itself a gatekeeper?
Is Alexander Blum still on Twitter?
Macaroni and cheese (globs of cheddar, really), street burritos, coffee stout
And with all the bottom rungs in the ladder to success removed in an economic oppression masked as compassion.
The famously monolithic "Mexican Climate"?
How about "I invented a new word" as an answer?
Yeah, sorry. That was unfair nitpicking.
We need to engineer a better method of keeping crypto projects on track than the current twitter blowups among team members. I propose duels ? which would be the cryptocurrency equivalent of the arm-fighter time contests in the In Time (2011) movie.
The duels ? could be the cryptocurrency equivalent of the arm "fighter" time contests in the In Time (2011) movie
I remember it, but could you link to it? Dueling might be a better method to keep crypto projects on track than the current twitter blowups among team members.
The king, the Messiah == modern breeding techniques?
Exactly! What's the going rate for someone to surf the web for you?
Did Alexander Blum get off Twitter?
Merry Christmas! Christ is born! May the smoke alarm trumpet the massive amount of cooking you are doing. ?
That full moon is STILL looking awesome! I feel like I’m in a J.R.R. Tolkien tale.
There is a theory that they are just White supremacists with guilty consciences. But why would this particular stress bring out their shadow like that?
2019 Goals:n1. Glorify God and enjoy Himn2. Get humanity through the next Great Filtern3. Prevent a WWII-like memetic contagion from happening in this saeculumn4. Develop the ophanocracies that would realize the dreams of the Left and Right without their authoritarianism
Thanks. The code's at  if you want to look at it.
In the Intellectual Explorers Club podcast on December 5th, you mentioned wanting to see a graph of the Memetic Tribes' combatants. I made one:  It's laid out for readability, but it would be great if someone could order it on 2 axes.
Wakami and beef broth
TL;DR: mythopoetics, metaphysics, and art
If you’re already a post-Christian Atheist, think about becoming an Atheist Christian. Dig through all the dogma/stories your ancestors evolved with and pull out stuff that will help us now. The antidote to memetic contagion is the Suffering Servant who willingly gets scapegoated
I think social media has reached the stage of Dante's Ninth Circle of Hell: each one gnawing the nape of the other's neck. Treachery. Don't believe in Hell? Act like one exists especially for you, and you may escape suffering from it.
Me: “Getting civilization through the next Great Filter”
How about letting banks get in on the dollar lottos? Everybody gets a chance to save for retirement while they are betting.
As a programmer, subject matter-specific apps that help non-programmers speed up what I do by hand are fine, but when someone suggests to me that I use it, it's like "here's what someone smarter than you made to help you do something you're too stupid to figure out yourself"
Decentralized blockchain solutions like fitcoin are coming online which allow the data owner to have the models come to them instead of the other way around.
This is unfair: women have to work more than eleven years to earn the same number of fatalities that men can rack up in just one
Can you give an example of both for the same concept?
Okay, correct me if I’m wrong  but Uber drivers don’t set their own rates, and the user accepts the price before the drivers even know they exist. So, how are you getting ripped off?
Uber fares are predetermined before you even accept! How do you imagine that they’re ripping you off?
Yeah, it’s hard to pick the right word here. It’s more the off-road additions to what you can communicate through the app that I was trying to convey
We need to reverse engineer what LOB is an acronym for so that it means the opposite of “mob”
That violates scope. Lots of programmers, for instance, refuse to punctuate in that way (because of it)
I’m in a Lyft vehicle right now, said that very thing, and tweeted this message with my headphones in. No hard feelings, he just put the radio on.
For decentralized algorithmic governance, I prefer the term "ophanocracy" over "algocracy". Ophanocracy is a play on the "if men were angels" argument of Federalist #51 using the "wheel within a wheel" angels - the ophanim - of Ezekiel 1:16.
Smashing religion is like smashing any other innate thing (like language). Language has so many contradictory elements and it poisons everything! So let's try to prevent people from using it, et al.
Not while their talking, at the end of my instructions to them.
“I’m putting on my headphones now” works for me. Then I put them on and don’t listen to anything
I, on the other hand, hate a dull stylist who does no talking. I really appreciate the cheerful banter of a cute voice: like the daughter I never had who’s pleased to see me and catch me up. We need to develop a system for this so that it’s part of the contract.
This is so rich!
The  interview with Kathy Newman comes to mind:
In their FAQ, Filecoin states that “if the product is not launched within 5 years (July 18, 2022), Protocol Labs is obligated to repay investors” - does this decrease their risk?
Who would do the forcing?
Also: psych nurses. My adopted son’s biological uncle has to daily deal with aggressive, obese mental health patients who won’t cooperate. He has stories.
Battle-hardened soldiers:  , et al
These techniques assume fast eye-refocus time. I remember my grandmother enthusiastically getting myself and my cousins into this in the ‘60s. Couldn’t pull it off then, can’t do it now.
To the critics I say “Thank you for acting like the moral axioms of Christianity are true. You spread the Gospel by your consistency and further the Kingdom by your responsibility.”
Also confounded by reading them instead of hearing them in context
They are the Ophanim, the wheel-within-a-wheels of Ezekiel. :-)
What is your take on Ophanocracies - decentralized governance mechanisms based on something like a blockchain? (Kind of like braces for the bio social teeth.)
Do you wear glasses? (I'm imagining there is a point in the transition where you would consider we are still not cyborgs, but you can see that we are heading in that direction.) What is the hill that you would die on in order not to become one?
It looks like SubscribeStar is just as vulnerable to the kind of politics that banned Milo and Sargon. Hopefully we will all be able to settle on a decentralized solution if need be.
Why is Christianity rapidly declining while Islam is rapidly spreading in western Europe? Will western Europe become a Muslim majority region? by Charlie Gabriel

Right, so take Chapter 1 of 12 Rules for how limited it was meant: a biological refutation of the claim that hierarchies are the result of Capitalism.
Here’s my attempt: freedom is the property rights, including personal, necessary to take on as much responsibility as you can handle to manifest the Logos in your personal life, your family, and your community.
The ability to voluntarily take on as much responsibility you can handle
You must wait until you are middle-aged, then.
Sorry, this is the oppressor olympics. You’re losing here.
Okay, the lowest score I could rig was 1:nPerson of Color: 29nGay: 11nFemale: 16nTransgender: 9nPoor: 6nYounger: 3nOlder: 3nDisabled: 8nEnglish Second Language: 4nBorn Elsewhere: 8nLess Educated: 5nNot Christian: 10nDevout Muslim: 8nDevout Jewish: 4nIt's high-school math, now...
Got you beat: 4! Haha!
Jungian egregores? Judeo-Christian angels?
Then the Lord God formed the man of dust from the ground and breathed into his nostrils the breath of life, and the man became a living creature. Genesis 2:7
How many Machine Learning Engineers does it take to change a light bulb? One, but she needs at least a million well-labeled examples to achieve human-level accuracy.
You could do some sort of multi-method multi-trait construct validation to see if you got the stack ordering right. E.g. sumptuary: who's trying to maintain the prestige of their victim caste by limiting the food and clothing choices of those lower on the oppression scale?
How about a more comprehensive tort framework against computationally hacking our biology?
Implicit is the desire to not let in people less resourceful than yourself.
This sounded ugly at first, then the second sentence let the beauty shine through.
And if envy and hatred of the rich wasn't championed by leftist ideologies, this would be sufficiently exploiting your talents for the betterment of society.
The problem is lack of shared context. If you all live in the same town, worship together, etc., you’ve already shared all the morbid stuff, the political stuff, et al, and you get to just enjoy each other.
It’s possible they’ve segregated their interests in separate accounts to avoid the distraction
It's a matter of getting into the head of an eighteen-year-old with low ambitions and a childlike assessment of what's important in life.
Taking this pole had an unexpected effect on me: poised to give myself a low grade, I realize that my 18-year-old self would think all the things I've accomplished over the years was "totally awesome" and would consider me a hero! I'm suddenly feeling really good about myself.
Because as Americans we have succeeded so far in keeping governments impotent enough that it doesn’t matter who is elected
The scientist vastly simplifies the test compared to the centuries of use. It's possible that for certain genetic populations, it works with the least number of side effects that could be expressed over those centuries.
You want the handle that’s unthinkingly grabbed - the privileged handle - to be the one labeled “didn’t wash hands”. You aren’t able to punish these people, only yourselves.
They ARE in the Fish clade.
I do this for my wife, but try to get creative.
Do markets need free arbitration and enforcement markets adjacent to them in order to be defined as free?
“What I know, is all I need to know.”  Milton’s Lucifer
Wearing black face in public is a taboo
It’s possible that the wave is subsiding. The surfer is still hanging ten
You could argue that we added necessary complexity, but they would perceive the violations
A young man walks into a noisy bar, orders a beer, sings a note in contemplation, then walks over to the upright piano and belts out a complex, danceable tune.
Pitch black, and I had to follow around a pitch black dog and pick up his poop. It takes expert tracking skills!
Jordan  Peterson
Absolutely!
If given space, I used to just write “Masculine” like it was a linguistic term or something. I think I’ll switch to your technique
There’s a conspiracy theory/religious ideology out there claiming these mass likings are designed by Satan to keep the non-NPCs from advancing spiritually. How would you describe the path you are following?
Yes, and the first computers were automated looms
More precisely the process a data scientist goes through to get an automated solution. I looked through what maps like yours I could find, but didn't see anything at that level.
Are there any topographical examples of the predictive analytic sort where you are navigating through various machine learning approaches?
Programming can be like that. Except what you produce is living and active - like knitting a lightning storm - so the crisis is not prompted
You keep him in perfect peace whose mind is stayed on you, because he trusts in you. Isaiah 26:3
How much has religion/moral axioms driven our evolution? Has the Indian genome been optimized to Hinduism? Has the European been optimized to Christianity?
NPC == Kaczynskian oversocialization
The honeymoon is over, the culture shock is upon me. I’m surrounded by Progressives.
I text-to-speech (TTS) myself whatever I can fit in in a car ride.
I used to own a LAN party starter kit, complete with about half a dozen laptops. I would host just my sons and their cousins. Great times!
You would have to have a lot in reserve to voluntarily become the scapegoat, I think. So, maybe those deleted tweets count as reserves.
So, what’s the Girardian way to handle bad takes then - become the scapegoat?
“When a prophet speaks in the name of the Lord, if the word does not come to pass or come true, that is a word that the Lord has not spoken; the prophet has spoken it presumptuously. You need not be afraid of him.” Deuteronomy 18:22
Haha! The edges of the graph are connecting the combatants. :-)
Victim-virtue seems like a bastardization of Christ as the ultimate virtuous victim.
Are there any anti-communist, pro-USA, pro-capitalist #Antifa forces left? We could use some.
nn in 25 years
Clans are the scope at which humans are adapted to handle egregores. If that egregore is not mult-generationally adapted to clan survival, it’s written about as morally bad in Scripture. Global communications have disintegrated that ecology, opening Pandora’s Box.
Is this a good definition for fascism: ?
“Winston disliked nearly all women, and especially the young and pretty ones. It was always the women, and above all the young ones, who were the most bigoted adherents of the Party, the swallowers of slogans, the amateur spies and nosers-out of unorthodoxy.”nnGeorge Orwell, 1984
A man who despises himself nonetheless esteems himself, as a despiser. --Nietszche
You do it the same way you prevent them from using $100 bills
A message of hope for you Democrats in your gun-controlled cities with your immune-from-prosecution police: the Army has centuries of experience distributing food and water in the presence of adversaries.
is like a magnet for critics. You get too many of them together and it’s like a murder of crows cawing in the luxury of their anti-JBP beliefs.
How will it take my descendents to faithfully simulate all possible versions of me down to the quantum level such that I’m effectively resurrected?
I was unaware of this; thanks for introducing it to me!
, sorry
Brings to mind  ‘s negative homesteading theory
The stock market is where most of the central bank funny money heads first.
Pretty women are higher maintenance and have a sense of entitlement to your revenue and time to use for their own self-expression. At least that’s what I’ve noticed among the Boomer women my dad lusted after.
I don't know what to say.
Yeah, these are definitely lockdown riots
You could write some programming language that would compile this
You seem much friendlier in this video than in some of your recent podcasts. I wish I’d have seen this first; I wouldn’t have been so faint hearted about getting all the way through them. :-)
At five dollars a pair
I had some fun with the spreadsheet and posted a bunch of random draw-lines-to-match-up-rows-across-the-columns-type quizzes on Facebook. Some objected to the fuzzy nature of the tribes (and compared it to naming clouds as they flowed by). Post Rationalist/Integral
/r/atheism is dominated by these types. It’s impossible to get them to discuss non-Materialist atheists, for instance. The only point they can get across is how stupid you are for bringing it up.
The United States has a guns per 100 residents 7.2 standard deviations above the mean, but a murder rate 0.2 standard deviations below the mean.
Hence the need for minimal governance
Is acting as if something is true a belief or a practice?
Couldn't they have been ornamental or ritualistic at first, then make their way out of that space to practical use? Instead of a lunatic, a shaman, in other words.
It appears global centralization is a non-starter:
Integrity then leads to dependability and trustworthiness, (or just predictability)?
The Southwest has its additions, but Hawaii is completely unique!
This is true most of the time. It heavily leans on tribal survival tactics, which only slightly rely on IQ and integrity.
The labor of robots is power
That does correlate with IQ and integrity.
Will the Left foment a revolution, then?
It’s a technique developed by activists to provide verbal directions in a chaotic noisy environment. Here it’s being used for more mundane information dissemination.
When red-pilled, seek out a grey-pilling experience
Converting it to a PDF fixes it
Why?
Love your app! Bought it long ago. I was playing with the Sort Order popup and it switched to Longest First and won’t respond to taps to change it back to shortest first. How do I fix that?
Similar
Incels are black-pilled, but this may give their lives some meaning. It’s a little like getting the resentful poor to agitate for the downfall of Capitalism, though.
Well, you ruined my joke, but okay. :-)
Why is Hell considered a bottomless pit?
The better name could include something about forsaking the slightly greater, fleeting pleasure. It would emphasize personal responsibility and give young men a new purpose in life.
Instead of picketing abortion clinics, where should they picket? What would cause the biggest bang for the buck?
If the Christian Right initiates an aggressive campaign against irresponsible ejaculators, would Feminists join? Would incels?
If the Christian Right spearheads this movement, would Feminist groups join in?
I hope you're right. I hope that humanists get such a reputation for helping others that they have to set up control measures to avoid running out of resources.
You could change "helped his clinical clients manage the triumphs and catastrophes of life" to something like "amassed XXXXX hours helping...". Anyway, the choice of the verb isn't important, but the #skininthegame IS!
Those who know that they are profound strive for clarity. Those who would like to seem profound to the crowd strive for obscurity. For the crowd believes that if it cannot see to the bottom of something it must be profound. It is timid and dislikes going into the water.nNietzsche
Conversely: go with the flow! Is it possible to evolve p-code (as there is no biological equivalent of source code) to make it faster and leaner? It could become the only viable way to maintain super-complex software. Say goodbye to source code, though.
Needs to be a decentralized creation mechanism with the ability to remove the "bad drivers".
Which is to say: software is becoming as complicated and messy as religion. And nobody complains about how we need to straighten out the biochemical mess we evolved through.

I just published “Towards a less ‘marketing speak’ sounding word than ‘Futarchy’”
I just published “These are the combatants in the noosphere according to Peter Limberg and Conor Barnes’ memetic…”
We need to resurrect the concept of “iniquity” so that we are actually afraid of creating structures so crooked we become trapped in them

So, dwarvish smithies?
You could also add that language is on the move, that “fascist” as a term has one end stuck in its Industrial Age roots while the tidal forces of social media rip its meaning to shreds
When  tweets:
"Language is always picking up grime as it moves with us through the world - biases, misunderstandings, etc." The atheist not believing in "God" as a linguistic grime rejection from a truth-seeker of high disgust sensitivity.
What's a"moral efficient horizon"?
Hopefully cryptocurrencies will remove that monopoly.
I propose the term "ophanocracy" for a decentralized governance mechanism (GM). It is a play on the "if men were angels" argument in the Federalist #51 with the "wheel within a wheel" angels of Ezekiel 1:16.
Sure, if you are referring to paying customers as the ruling clique. There is a high turnover among the 1% as they succeed then fail to follow its dictates
Gender pay gap, minimum wage, et al
The orbifold moral dimensions that don’t scale well past the family level? Socialism?
A Critique of Stephen Hicks' "Explaining Postmodernism"
After spending a few days on a business trip at a fancy hotel I always get the sensation of being trapped in a King Midas-like hell, forever isolated from family and home-cooked meals.
He does have a Masters which he got in his early twenties, though! (I know this because I got one in my early fifties and he made a crack about it. ?) Love you man!

It’s just another example of how Logic and English are confusedly separate things
Taxi drivers have worse fatality rate than miners, almost as bad as cops
I just tried that line on my wife and she wanted to know what the first question was
Me: Can I ask you a second question?
A much simpler definition then the trench-as-verb attempt I was working on. ?
What is a “trench sharer”?
“Yet once more I will shake not only the earth but also the heavens.” This phrase indicates the removal of things that are shaken—that is, things that have been made—in order that the things that cannot be shaken may remain. Heb 12:26-27
"You can't script the life of a genius from the outside. It must be built by the individual himself or herself, and in ways that inevitably defy the norm."
I'm not talking about something facile achieved by legerdemain. Those would be anti-Christ. I'm peering through the fog of the singularity where I see recapitulated every superstitious notion mankind has ever had.
We need a technological savior to take on the burden of our accidental complexity - some sort of abstraction to hide the infinite information from ourselves.
Word Study:  I wonder how this Avon/Anomia concept relates to the Software Crisis and the overall complexity of the development process. Perhaps eternal hell turns out to be just us trapped in a crooked technological singularity of our own making.
The word “God” (or “the Good”) has been around longer than Jesus also. I’m not understanding what your point is here.
You must’ve got married in your mid thirties or had more than two kids ?

It seems more like a parry to me as the Balrog “leaped full upon the bridge” before that. Perhaps a better equivalent would be the stone-trolls in The Hobbit?
“I am a servant of the Secret Fire, wielder of the flame of Anor. You cannot pass! The dark fire will not avail you, flame of Udûn.” Where’s the trickery in that?
Every project I work on I have to go relearn some math and while coding I have to google how to do basic stuff.

It’s probably their social stance: closed on Sunday, etc.
"meme/gene network blockchain extreme Austrian economics ideologies with religious paint" - sounds troublingly like myself! That's why I stick with you, bud.
Happy Marginal Utility Day!
Musical virtuosity? I figured it was something more complicated
I use VoiceDream, which has a wide variety of ingestion methods, including the clipboard
Sifting through the new stuff to find the going-to-be-big stuff.
Don’t sociopaths inevitably stab them in the back or otherwise out-cool them and exploit whatever they’ve created? I guess that is more harvesting than sabotaging.
Charles, that's the best gold digger quip I've read in a while, er, crypto digger?
Looks like Algeria has dialed it up to 11 there.
Smells like Thiel envy, but I want to let you in on a revenge secret: the blockchain-based governance mechanisms will mature into socialist ophanocracies.
Is that anything like Estonian?
Based on my personality traits, my secret nationality is Estonian. Find out what yours is at  via
My dream is to retro-incarnate up my patriline to the point where my tribe reacts like my ancestor has been bewitched
"It is difficult to get a man to understand something, when his salary depends upon his not understanding it!" Upton Sinclair
"It’s like the rush you get when, as a kid, you’d say a bad word out loud in public."
Confirmed. Various ideas in my head are also associated with street corners and trails in the woods, even locations I haven't been to since the '70s. If the idea comes up in conversation, that venue flashes back into my mind.
Grace, I listened to your podcast the first time the other day, and I have to say you are one of the least muddy, most scientific minds I have ever encountered.
What is the total government cost per year of our starvationcare system?
“The extreme greatness of Christianity lies in the fact that it does not seek a supernatural remedy for suffering but a supernatural use for it.” Simone Weil
Hence the word “gradual”. Don’t assume you would be any different in the same circumstances.
What did aesthetic used to mean and how are people misusing it?
It’s a technique to ensure you’re hearing it correctly and it was spoken to you correctly
It also sounds a lot like taxation: the average-performing human in a system that is judged to be Totally Evil (Capitalism, because people end up stuck at the bottom) ends up being taxed at a pro-rata share.
Possibly you could think of Noah and his family as the only ones receiving pro-rata punishments.
I have been thinking about your tweet all this time and I don't think Christ as a symbol of the self is sustainable for some communities without a grounding in the physical resurrection. Perhaps some medical or neurological technology will make this viable again.
High school for me too. It was a world where everything made sense.
There is some of that average-performing “eating and drinking, marrying and giving in marriage” human activity going on, but none of the incremental punishment.
Meting out pro-rata punishments sounds Modernist (and maybe these evils are all outcomes of a Rationalist esthetic) so maybe this the opposite way that God does it.
How is this related to the concept of original sin? It sounds Noahic.
There's a reason that justice should be simple.
You are a multi-billion-year-old cosmic evolutionary process becoming aware of itself: what is the first thing you do?
Don't forget the ophanocracies being developed with blockchain tech.
"Who, in the days of His flesh, when He had offered up prayers and supplications, with vehement cries and tears to Him who was able to save Him from death, and was heard because of His godly fear, though He was a Son, yet He learned obedience by the things which He suffered."
I've almost finished The Genealogy of Morals. Each sentence is beautiful, but hell-if-I-know what the whole book was about.
Bingo
What’s the reference to citation 21 in the photograph?
When did Sloterdijk write this? It sounds like he is paraphrasing Dostoyevsky.
And we've had centuries to test out the modifications.
Dostoevsky describes it best: "Drown him in ... happiness, so that nothing but bubbles of bliss can be seen on the surface; give him economic prosperity, such that he should have nothing else to do but sleep, eat cakes and busy himself with the continuation of his species..."
We called them Rent-a-cops growing up.
Yes! (I added who pays for it as a prebuttal.)
Local police should be replaced with private security paid for by the neighborhoods who have the most to lose from the lack of policing.
With a claim of a certain semantic radius around the generated name so that no one can claim through the same mechanism some name similar.
Unschooling is the most difficult of teaching methods as you have to be constantly on top of your motivations game.
Then it is up to today's hero to rescue what is of value from the past and reintegrate it into the present. It's possible that reasoning with the god of your fathers will help you to sort those things out.
It depends on how long the deity has been in co-evolution with the man's ancestors. If it has helped civilization survive for thousands of years, then whatever blind dependence on it must have survival value.
Yes, they reason with their gods in prayer. They work out what the right thing to do is: what is good for their families, and their communities, for the future.
It's only a super power if it can be used for evil.
What do you think of the mystery of reality from Roger Penrose's "The Road to Reality". It comprises three irreducibly distinct aspect mysteries (physical, mental, and platonic/mathematical):
How many deep learning researchers does it take to screw in a light bulb? One, but they need at least ten million well-labeled examples to achieve human-level accuracy.
#ophanocracy
True, but I still love when dreaming that all the servers are cartoon characters talking you through their interactions ends up exposing the problem you had to a beautiful solution. These kind of dreams are the most lucid and satisfying that I end up remembering.
I just woke up from a dream where what appeared before my eyes was some really beautiful code that I understood very well and was excited to implement. I am satisfied that this was just random stuff I imposed structure on because it fixed a bug.
I thought, maybe, no, but then I read the titles. I must have the electronic versions of all of these somewhere and have put them down to memory. :-)
Don’t forget the supply/demand denialists
Interesting take on Medieval feminism:
You might try penalizing the "enhance" command in a harder version. Nice!
Our first meetup!  #Meetup #Concord via
Trust in the One who voluntarily takes the place of the scapegoat, or disintegrate into mimetic violence.
I think that if there were property rights at play here, the animals would be as likely as chickens to go extinct.
Yes, it’s a real danger that /r/JordanPeterson fights every week. But, again, unverifiable.
It’s information overload: it’s more than enough work for one head to merely contain the map.
I was discounting the unverifiable writing. I can’t tell if they are trolling or not, so I restricted my sample to bylines and in person interviews. I have seen hysterical pro-Peterson comments there, though.
I fitted a curve that just touches the bottom points. It flattens out much quicker.
I don’t know if it’s equal. I never seen in print or in person pro-Peterson hysteria.
This is a good metaphor for the  phenomenon.
Chris Albon has a pretty nice version at
I've been thinking about this article all day. My inner 11th-grade libertarian is telling me that adding more bureaucrats to a problem caused by bureaucrats is NOT better than the free market. But people fall through the cracks of any system we come up with.
What are the dark secrets of crypto? by Marius Kramer
The Kaluza–Klein theory of political space: empathy and compassion are real dimensions, they are just curled up in orbifolds. They don't scale well past the family level.
We slowly evolve the vocabulary, though, so eventually enough people are framing it in close enough terms that you can google it. This happens in programming as the libraries get more popular.
“And I, if I am lifted up from the earth, will draw all men to Myself.” John 12:32
Me too! What’s causing the increased sensitivity? Diet? Disgust sensitivity increasing? Overexposure to electronics?
Updating using OAuth authentication via Tweepy!
Growing up, they were also how my siblings and I addressed our parents.
This is what it looks like if you color the nodes based on language (magenta=English, green=Italian, sky blue=Spanish, etc.) with the label sizes of the top three followed proportional to their following:
This is what it looks like if you color the nodes according to Botometer's probability that it's a bot:
This is a good way to look at it sans character.
"Get back on the plantation!" is basically what their message is.
Imitate Christ, in other words (John 3:16)
Yeah, but what about the kind that make statements about statements?
As if we weren't vulnerable enough, assassination technology gets better, faster, cheaper.
Honorably flirt with my wife
I was a massive consumer of those in my teens.
How did they do it? How did they end up reaching pre-modern, pre-traditional levels of imagination?
About 99% of us would, if the social pressure was great enough.
I like how you quickly summarize what Jordan Peterson would spend many pauses describing (e.g. no, he doesn’t believe in the Resurrection)
There a lot of Demand/Supply Denialists out there
Joel Simon has Evolving Floorplans:

That’s in Gephi. It looks like crap in a matplotlib plot. The edges are too thick and the nodes too big. I’ll see what I can do, though.
You second-order twitter graph looks like a mimetic bicycle
With thousands of nodes (as in your case) I also use Gephi
Yeah, it could definitely use some downstream data.
Thanks. It’s interesting how the influences come in generational spurts.
I use networkx and other python libraries
The technique of the great teacher ??? who dangles the insight in front of the student within easy grasp, if they’ll just reach out.
I've got a time.sleep(60) between my t.friend_ids(following_id) calls, but I'm still getting WARNING:root:rate limit exceeded!
len(set(t.friend_ids('MimeticValue'))) &lt;= len(set(t.follower_ids('MimeticValue')))
This dovetails nicely with Jonathan Haidt’s observation that conservatives see liberals as good people with bad ideas, and that liberals just see conservatives as bad people. Perhaps Late Stage Capitalism is just this accumulation of bad intentions.
This is basically me watching people make small talk
Single quotes work!
Testing various escaped quote techniques:nnhttps://t.co/OWXa8Z3flg
Testing various escaped quote techniques:nnhttps://t.co/5cQ0H3wib0"Not%20helping"&amp;src=typed_querynhttps://t.co/5cQ0H3wib0"Not%20helping"&amp;src=typed_querynhttps://t.co/o2NbIfDVPpnhttps://t.co/xL65govQD0
Unfortunately she never mentioned the power of property rights to transform poachers into ranchers:
"The individual has always had to struggle to keep from being overwhelmed by the tribe. If you try it, you will be lonely often, and sometimes frightened. But no price is too high to pay for the privilege of owning yourself." Friedrich Nietzsche
It's called "sufficing".
"I have found that, to make a contented slave, it is necessary to make a thoughtless one. It is necessary to darken his moral and mental vision, and, as far as possible, to annihilate the power of reason." Fredrick Douglass
We started a Jordan Peterson Meetup in the Boston Area  via
Jesus Christ: the Solution to Mimetic Violence
And preaching!
I can't find "thoticize" in google search. That's impossible! My whole world is crashing in.
Rule #8 Tell the truth. Or at least don’t lie.
Similar to cognitive behavior therapy for intellectual disability: simplicity and repetition. And patience! :-)
Singing. Apparently when you are on hallucinogenics you meet beings that sing things into existence.
With the purified you deal purely, and with the crooked you make yourself seem tortuous. 2 Sam 22:27
Twitter, obviously.
I hope they listen to you, but it’s a favorite phrase of some
More generally, things that make copies of themselves
You could also add to that ophanocracies - decentralized governance mechanisms
So, with that misdefinition, is it even worth looking at?
Well said.
I notice you've tacked on another word after "rights" (which is hard enough to define) - you've got "voices". How do you define that? What's the next word you'll tack on? How do you define "campaigning"? You're already down his finger-jiggling track towards "the worst sort".
You can add theology to that list.
I replace the term “view-from-nowhere” with “from the view of that all-seeing deity you assume” when talking to Materialists just to be provocative.
Being the poorest in a status market that values displays of disposable income is what drives the aggressive to desperate measures in a dignity culture
The meek shall inherit the earth.
I think my cat is reciting some sort of cat poetry: he is taking various poses during his vociferations
Whoever thus serves Christ is acceptable to God and approved by men. So then let us pursue what makes for peace and for mutual upbuilding. Romans 14:18-19
There's also the concept of "this" Wednesday as opposed to "next" Wednesday. Who owns the Wednesdays, the week or the day? If it's the day, then "this" and "next" are the same Wednesday. If it's the week, then "this" could be in the past.
And what about wanting decentralized governance mechanisms, then? Only the one design will work?
I just want to apologize for putting off working on Goal #5: Found ophanocracies to ameliorate wage-slave riots. We're basically at the "Riots go Brrr" stage and that's not going to stop until people feel like doing nothing is okay again.
What about other currencies that are there primarily for their value as infrastructure for higher-level functionality (like decentralized governance mechanisms)?
What is your take on this Urban Dictionary definition?
What would you do differently?
Okay, imagine, for the sake of argument, if it all went to UBI. Would the stock market maintain that level (or would you see something like an increase in menial labor costs)?
Where do you think the central bank money goes?
The two forms have an incentive to find and agree upon a third-party arbiter.
Maybe after the $USD implodes?
I think  is getting a handle on a lot of the public good concepts and will be incorporating them into the various ophanocracies that he’s working on.
It turns out it’s double counting
Private cops are a lot less violent. I hope everybody understands why: because they can be fired, because their companies can lose business. The government police agencies can never go bankrupt; they even get more money for their screwups.
Yeah, on the Dept of State site they promise to get it back to you in months
X: “I’m an atheist”nMe, the Loving Troll: “A Christian Atheist”nX: “God doesn’t exist”nMe: “Yes! Unless God is everything that is, God doesn’t exist.”nX: “I don’t believe in God”nMe: “You act like God transcends both existence and non-existence, and your message is important.”
I got those, but in the audio version. I force my wife to listen with me when we drive anywhere.
"Pneumonia death counts exclude pneumonia deaths involving influenza" but not Covid-19, apparently.
I should have read that more closely
Can you help me understand the pneumonia epidemic we are having in the US right now?
Could someone explain this? This is CDC data on pneumonia deaths in 2020. It's not counted as COVID-19 deaths.
The data is from the CDC. The charts are from me.
You can nicely fit a negative exponential curve to the bottom edge of the log price and predict when the bubble ends. They go up more steeply than they come down.
str(my_supposed_to_be_numeric) == ‘nan’
Happy Y chromosome day! Happy patrilineal appreciation day.
Do you suspect it’s mostly being gamed, then?
Further, it’s a form of sumptuary: trying to maintain the prestige of the (in this case) victim caste by limiting the choices of those lower on the oppression scale.
Is there a trade off you can imagine making between the Reliables and the Creatives? Suppose you had to choose based on only one trait for each? What would that trait be?
Guess what? Your personal temperament largely predicts your political ideology. So, how are you going to force your winner-take-all politics on everybody else if they each have their own mutually-incompatible ideology? There is a simple solution: border-less ophanocracies.
Yeah, that makes sense. For the creative job types, you want raw talent. For the job types that need reliability, you want grit.
This falls under "free beta testing" I think. The criminal element is helping to harden the security of and game-proof crypto because they expect to be lied to and scammed.
Like gods fighting over glory?
Also, a genetic algorithm with a non-deterministic evaluator to try to find the perfect set of parameters for a contour generator. It's easy to get sucked in, though, and exhaust yourself. So I'm taking a break to talk to you. See? I feel better already! :-)
Synthesize hundreds of thousand of images of well-labeled training data, retrain a object detection neural network on them, create a validation batch, and perform statistical analysis on the inferences from that batch.
I wrote four very complex, long-running programs from scratch and got them all to run remotely at the same time.
Then the righteous will answer him, "Lord, when did we see you hungry and feed you, or thirsty and give you something to drink? When did we see you a stranger and invite you in, or needing clothes and clothe you?"
It certainly makes your tweets entertaining
Kind of like an NPC?
The innate creativity of Chinese peasants naturally forms a Pareto distribution if you have a large enough sample size. I’m not sure why you believe this is due to Capitalism.
This part, at least, sounds like a face saving culture.
If the mercy is true, you must therefore bear the true, not an imaginary sin. God does not save those who are only imaginary sinners. Be a sinner, and let your sins be strong (sin boldly), but let your trust in Christ be stronger, and rejoice in Christ who is the victor over sin.
Twitter, where expert cake makers argue with those who don't eat cakes.
Among the rich countries, the US has double the dissatisfaction of the others. Why?
Better: "One, but she needs at least a million well-labelled examples to achieve human-level accuracy."
Jonathan, what programming languages do your people work in?
Looking forward to listening to this, Jonathan. ?
Freedom in general, skin-in-the-game in particular:
What do you think of the rigor of this test? You meet a person who is passionate about a subject, and has moral judgments about society in reference to it. You agree on a measure per year, and ask them what year it peaked. If they don’t know, they’re virtue signaling.
I’ve noticed a similar relationship between “sin” and “free will”: the more addicted a person is, the fewer options they are able to entertain.
I don't speak cat. But the cat thinks I do.
Why it’s important that the Reasonable Left identify its ideological limits (where the Left goes too far):
What do you think of this line of reasoning: White women make less than Black women (and Black men make less than White men) because of social pressure to be more agreeable. Assume all other factors being equal, and that Agreeableness weakens your negotiating skills.
Works that way in user interface design: labels are to be quickly understood and dismissed
Ophanocracies will enable this
There is no fixed supply of facebooks either. The same logic applies to social media platforms.
The fog of lies is so thick people are using mean shift clustering to figure out who the good guys are.
On the New York Times and “Enforced Monogamy”
Thread
The rich get richer and the poor get richer:
So, I was yelling at Twitter, when...
So, I was outside near a bunch of groundskeepers reading twitter when the leaf blower stopped and the guy staring at me said “what did you say?” I tried to correct his perfectly reasonable misunderstanding that I was talking to him. “I know.” Continues to stare at me. #busted
Calling James Damore a firebrand, ?.
TX is where coastal-aligned borders meet north/south-aligned borders. In downtown Dallas the alignment clash goes all the way into downtown, with the streets toward the southwest at a funny angle.
How does this contrast with the Jungian understanding? Do the top few levels in the hierarchy get their own names?
Let's hope  can pull it off.
Panchreston n. A proposed explanation intended to address a complex problem by trying to account for all possible contingencies but typically proving to be too broadly conceived and therefore oversimplified to be of any practical use.  via
I can't see peoples expressions when they are in sight of me, or be able to recognize them if they are forty feet away. Growing up, people just assumed I was unsociable. It did isolate me, but I count myself blessed that it wasn't this bad.
1234567890123456789012345678901234567890123456789012345678901234567890123456789012345678901234567890123456789012345678901234567890123456789012345678901234567890123456789012345678901234567890123456789012345678901234567890123456789012345678901234567890123456789012345678901234567890
"The disciples were called Christians first at Antioch." Acts 11:26. Purportedly by adversaries.
If someone not on the Far Left uses the word "black" in a sentence, and a member of the Far Left is not there to hear it, are they still a racist?
I like the irony of using appeals to authority in the third pane. But the phrase "well, the bible says" has made it through hundreds of years of intellectual fads: it will make it through this one as well.
Do White Supremacists pouring over genetic studies of race count? Does the jealousy of academia over the rise of Jordan Peterson count?
True. That's not what makes him interesting, though.
It took me a while to figure out what he's doing: he's judging philosophies by the actions of the group that adheres to them. He's being willfully ignorant of the details.
Hopefully just the rebuttals, not the hit pieces.
Nothing. You just say "refer to bar 1".
RE: the messianic risknnI think the way of looking at it is through the story of the frog and the princess. Kermit wants to bring the golden ball out of the muck and is in the process of convincing the princess to let him sleep in her bed.
This causes the "but what about Scandinavia?" reaction.
I should have mentioned that, sorry.
Men rate women's attractiveness on a normal curve and over-message the hottest, women rank almost all men as ugly and message the ones they think are slightly out of their league:
I think you are interpreting his struggle from a materialistic filter. He is trying to explain something that seems nonsensical, but that doesn't make it not real.
Cultures are, in 's parlance, "crash only" - meaning they can't be shutdown and restarted. WBT helps with the messy transition by creating a phonemic alphabet in the national script, translating culturally relevant sections of the Bible, and establishing a literacy program.
What does fairness mean to you?
Legislator: What just happened? nViscount Halifax: He mobilized the English language and sent it into battle. #IMDb
"The most improper job of any man, even saints, is bossing other men. Not one in a million is fit for it, and least of all those who seek the opportunity." J. R. R. Tolkien
Represent
What about ophanocrats?
"What is freedom of expression? Without the freedom to offend, it ceases to exist. Without the freedom to challenge, even to satirize all orthodoxies, it ceases to exist. Language and the imagination cannot be imprisoned, or art dies." Bhikhu Parekh
That's a false characterization and you know it. "reduce" is not the same as "eliminate for instance. Nor is "only" the same as "a good predictor of". The problem of inequality is worse than you think.
Verifying my identity on  0x564cd933d2dd8f8169541eefe1e0efe6e2902b00
Everybody's speculating about sex-bots: I'm looking forward to the advent of citizen-bots. The politically lustful will be able to force these bots to follow complicated regulations, imprison them for their innovations, etc., satisfying their Utopian urges without harm.
Pointing out the inconsistencies in a long-established religion is like pointing out the biochemical mess in highly evolved life. Yes, that protein was just split, then re-assembled, for seemingly no purpose. That doesn't negate the validity of that particular organism.
If you have tuition bills to pay you are in the 99.9 percentile of wealth.
"The State is said by some to be a necessary evil; it must be made unnecessary."nBenjamin Tucker
"Mediocrity recognizes nothing above itself." Sir Arthur Conan Doyle
The reason I don't put tattoos on my body (or even a bumper stickers on my car) is that I don't want to be permanently labeled with whatever idea I'm stumbling forward with in the present. And yet here I am...
I would say your “I’m a Leftist, what can I say” sentiments are in common with right-anarchists. (I can’t speak for the Authoritarian Left.)
I think Maher would do better having a one-on-one with Dr. Peterson using the presenting problem of “I despise my audience and find my panel a little too sycophantic”
Also retweet the importance of saving for the future
We need to re-evaluate what it means to be an expert.
Net Present Value?
My son used to spend hours on Wikipedia exploring various music genres and we would talk about it. He corrected so many of my misconceptions about the music of my own day that I've lost count.
I've submitted this to Reddit for critiquing:  - it started out well, but I ended up just riling up the mob.
Is hosting a potlatch an example of having blood in the game?
Given the relative weights by likes, it should be “Don’t trade your competition-escaped authenticity for approval.”
It better be good! ;-) Also, congratulations ?
I think in the 70s it meant that you wanted to let the dirty hippies in.
There are more private police than public police already, and their stats are a whole lot better. What's the latest line of reasoning against replacing all public police with private police?
They’ll grow up with even less empathy than their parents
This is bad economics also: “In all competitive markets, the price at which a product is sold depends on the cost to manufacture it.” No, it depends on the price people are willing to buy it.
I followed Tom on twitter because he spread the truth. I unfollowed him because he spent his time there on petty squabbles. Proximity is an issue you have to deal with when spreading your message, Tom.
Ophanocracies could manage that.
#ophanocracy
thread
Public officials and their unions also have financial incentives:
Agreed. It's a strange, decentralized opponent.
What makes #OwenBenjamin a good choice to select? Who would you remove from the list to be replaced by him?
I’d say that Pepe the Frog is a boogeyman of the SJWs, a mob-formed gadfly more than a fighter
I got the text for this example from  - a great place to find both sides of an argument.
Thanks! These are hard to make in MS Paint.
Good addition
Yeah, the other format implies a winner and a loser. This one merely implies that one side has the last word.
“All men are born equally free,” and possess “certain inherent natural rights, of which they cannot, by any compact, deprive or divest their posterity.”n—George Mason, Father of the Bill of Rights
This is promising: can we expand further?
Here is someone who put his money where his mouth is: Christ-like, prophetic, diametrically opposite of a virtue signaler. A living, breathing, social justice warrior.
The only entity in the household that informs me that the dog's water bowl is empty is the cat.
So F, U, V, W, and Y all came from the same Phoenician letter?
How about trite prayers? I swore to myself I would never repeat the "Bless us, O Lord, for these thy gifts..." that my father offered at mealtime. Now I just say the same "Thank you Lord, for this food..." every time. Sheesh.
Okay, I just went to  and I don't think the above Bible quote is at the same point in the timeline anymore.
"As was his custom, Paul went into the synagogue, and on three Sabbath days he reasoned with them from the Scriptures," Acts 17:2. This is a smaller-scale equivalent of you posting to /r/atheism your line of reasoning repeatedly. Are you our Hammer?
The denigration and denial reminds of something a 13-year-old would make up to establish independence from his overbearing parents. Historically, how have theists been overbearing (therefore)?
This is truly outrageous, but I predict mob justice won’t be channeled here because it can’t be leveraged by the power hungry.
OOh! I like that term.
Works great at scale, but look what happens when I do it:
Recall that religions evolved from dramatizing things that only theologians and only later were able to articulate. The moral landscape is mapped out without nuance at first. Reductivism's bad when trying to hang on to a map of the territory when the territory itself has changed.
When your ideology so reinforces your resentment that you have to start acting it out:
If by "dead silence" you mean the silence experienced by those who inhabit abandoned opal mines, then nobody likes that.
But you can see from your description how humans depend on the accumulated wisdom of their cultures and religions to make their way in the world. It's just too much to expect a reboot with every generation.
Well, I like the way you put it, though. :-)
There is also malevolence and betrayal to deal with.
AI is not irreducibly complex like humans are. We have developed ideologies in the past that had faith in the radical improve-ability of humans, but they resulted in millions of deaths and have been mostly abandoned.
Can the genius also be a good teacher who can bring things down to my level and also at an information flow rate that allows me to take it all in?
It's bad for society because it needs to continually adapt to a constantly changing world, and can't do that well without the incorporation of said 'dangerous ideas'.
Witness: the birth control pill.
How do you integrate religion into your life?
The "Magic rocks." pane is kind of puerile. What we actually discovered was the future - that we could make sacrifices in the present that would lead to a better one. The future to beat all futures became the Future, the ultimate sacrifice evolved into Him who... Best invention!
This quiz is purely a vehicle to throw ads in front of you. It was a lost cause to begin with: how many states (NY, CA, and IL come to mind) have multiple cultures within them? And you didn't even use pre-tested questions, it looks like.
Peterson has been attacked for not understanding Canadian law, also. Being an expert doesn't qualify you as a prophetic voice, though. You merely have to have an understanding that's "true enough".
A similar process is happening in subreddits. As they get bigger, the old group of humble merriment seekers is swamped by a group of pathological virtual signalers.
Listening to people discussing a topic couldn't scale past the theater building size. Then we switched to reading discussions in print, then on radio and television, and now a hours-long  video format of people discussing things has arisen.
This is search interest over time normalized so that the max is at 100. People are searching on Google for "facebook" less probably because they know how to get there now.
We need to defend our social capital more generally - including free speech and robust debate - as mutual trust is the most valuable thing our country has.
Their accents are slightly different than ours, also. Closer to the mid-Atlantic region. They were also in the last stages of losing the old theatrical style of oratory. It would be interesting if the AI could catch all of that, too.
Your article is almost neo-Platonic, in a Bostromic computer-simulation-within-a-computer-simulation sort of way.
That's the tendency of people to use government to socialize their loses, it's not an attribute of capitalism.
If we can get corporations to the vegetation stage, where because of technological automation we can just harvest their output, we can go back to an agrarian-like autonomous worker-owned-means-of-production... thingy.
Unscrupulous, really - not necessarily lazy.
I imagine a tight-knit hereditary community can take a “regret minimization” approach, where the population converges to a correlated genetic/normative equilibrium from not marrying stupid, lazy people. :-)
Conscientiousness is also 50% hereditary - another big predictor of success.
What are your thoughts on decentralized blockchain-based UBIs? Do they still have the perverse incentives (if not the other downsides)?
I’m technically thinking of “regret minimization” approaches, where you and your follows converge to a correlated equilibrium. I hope this is the correct term, anyway.
If you and all your follows became twitter refugees, what equivalent would end up as your Nash equilibrium?
Could we categorize everyone into three groups: Materialists, Religionists, and Spiritualists? (I have a soft spot in my heart for Christian Atheists and I want to honor both devotions for their truth seeking.)
Will a new kind of individual emerge from the chrysalis we are in now?
StackOverflow 2018 survey results:
It's #MyTwitterAnniversary! I have been on Twitter for 11 years (since 17 Mar 2007).nAnd you?
Peterson is outside (or at the hole in the center of) the spiritualist/religionist/materialist Venn diagram. Materialists consider his effort to “grow” science to Jungian maturity as so much Chopraian woo.
Is cultural constructionism the opposite of enlightenment?
I used to tell my children that the public school their friends went to was a “minimum security day prison”. At the time said friends were too blue-pilled to accept it.
Elves ???? ????
Alex, you’re the ultimate “trans-”: you don’t fit into anybody’s categories. Across, beyond, surpassing, transcending, in other words.
It assumes omnicompetence: the entire user base is expected to memorize and regurgitate long strings of random characters. The various workarounds (sans a trusted third party) don’t work for everyone.
Tulip against a backdrop of snow.
No, God and religion are irrelevant and aren't even discussed anymore.
So it’s only the values they are oppressing?
You jump around quite a bit trying to justify not talking about something that isn’t settled morally. Does this issue cause significant emotional harm within academia?
Yeah, it’s a shame the power hungry have to exploit this before we even understand what it is. But we are a tool-making species, so I guess that’s part of the discovery phase.
So, for instance, they would ban a stall that showed pictures from alchemy books. Got it.
Also, it’s the title of the article and the standard way he links to them
Today, from the Westminster confession, we read that a sacrament is a “seal”. The modern version of a seal is the digital signature (from the study of communicating in the presence of adversaries). Both seal and signature provide authentication, non-repudiation, and integrity.
Every time you use the word egregore I have to look it up again.
"I will feed your oppressors with their own flesh, And they will become drunk with their own blood as with sweet wine; And all flesh will know that I, the LORD, am your Savior And your Redeemer, the Mighty One of Jacob." Isaiah 49:26
Dershowitz explains how dangerous the alt-right is:  (forgive the cheerleading by the interviewer)
Government welfare is not charity:
How do I go about sponsoring one of these refugees?
Proof: would you rather have a million dollars or would you rather net $1 from a million customers?
Question: how many weeks of studying his writings does it take to get Jung?
Ophanocracies are a dream come true for anarchists, I’m just worried that the power-hungry sons of Cain will figure out how to twist them into a global totalitarian state.
Ophanocracies have the added benefit of being composed of game-theory aware governance mechanisms, so they’re less susceptible to corruption. Let’s hope so anyway.
It’s a roll-your-own kind of government: all the latest political fads (UBI, etc.) have been coded. (This realization was shocking to me, coming from an anarchist position.)
And hiring workers for a guaranteed wage/salary, while hers is not.
I try to be an agreeable person in business meetings, but every time I do I regret it.
People who are urgent in their intersectionality do not tolerate a cross-entropy greater than zero in their in-group
Will we recapitulate all our demons as AI also? Sounds like Purgatory more than Heaven.
Bouchell seems conscientious and intelligent: he doesn’t sound like he’s trying to perpetuate a lie. He’s doomed.
My black lab is completely unaware of the fact that other beings (the cat, the humans) might want to stay dry of dog slobber.
Time to homeschool:
doesn’t assume omnicompetence in memorizing passwords, is why. Lots of people need a trusted third party for that.
Ophanocracies to the rescue!
This caused me to be aghast at what she is getting at and might be of existential importance:
I would love to hear JBP discuss the metaphysics of Sophia (the mediator between humankind and God):  (I personally think Blum has the only critique worth its salt out there that hasn't been addressed.)
The world is made out of
An ideology is technically a theology missing half the archetypes.
"Falsehood advertises itself and seeks supporters. Truth is honored in  being despised, and saves those who are able to recognize its worth." Archimandrite Vasileios
Blockchain, in contrast, is all about the game theory
Deep Learning is showing itself to be easily fooled by adversarial data, for instance. Yet that is where most of the money is going
When you need a neck to strangle, humans are irreplaceable.
is thinking along the lines of ophanocracies, where the blockchain "ophanim" are doing the governing.
I just noticed it's above $10K again. :-)
Yeah, I just finished reading this. There is a big centralization blind spot in current artificial intelligence research.
“No scientist builds a theory from 0.37 standard deviations.” A practical study in the deceptiveness of long tails.
Having finally gotten a chance to start reading your article, I agree that it would take quite a hydroelectric engineer to channel THAT flood.
"I ask you to consider three medical miracles we take for granted:  X-rays, cardiac catheterization, and general anesthesia. I contend all  three would be stillborn if we tried to deliver them in 2005."
I'm unsatisfied with your answer as to why we can't attribute "white privilege" with at least a partial sign post to some greater potential.
Congrats, man! Were you able to put each interview question in your own words? How well do you think you did presenting the critique you shared on Medium?
The Universe continuously defeats the supply/demand denialists
Notes on the transfer from Omaha to Boston:nn1) Roads: Omaha has consistent width standards, orthoganality, etc. (Boston grew organically from cow trails.)nn2) I’m realizing I’ve picked up the habit of saying hi to strangers I walk by.
Which would you rather have?
So supply/demand denialism is justified?
I’m sold: you win the internet. ?
When I see “social construct” I picture some sort of persuasion going on. Are men on average that persuadable? Who would be doing the stopping? This seems socially unattainable.
I’m assuming here that ophanocracies programmatically/architecturally eliminate a lot of the rent seeking. Hence, the greater complexity.
Okay, let’s imagine rule by a decentralized governance structure - an “ophanocracy” - as the means that liberated more people more fully than a smaller structure composed of human beaurocrats. I would pick the blockchain-based ophanim over the humans any day.
I think the opportunity here is: can you be a Minister of Reconciliation? Can you ride the hundred-foot wave through the channel? Can you get us to the other side?
If you’re asking:
And religions undergo a Darwinian selection process. Sounds round-about to me.
Well deserved. Your reviews of popular movies like Logan and Moana are enthralling!
Racist? I'm getting the idea that it means you disagree with a disagreeable white man?
Can you explain the pneumonia epidemic that is happening at the same time?
My guess is that CCP spam-bots filled Google's anti-spam algorithm with trigger words they'd like to be treated as spam. It's not that hard. Google is weak on non-English spam and relies heavily on it's algorithms.
With Uber Eats you can tip the restaurant $2.
These effective reproduction numbers change daily. I don't see the Imperial College having any sort of last say in the matter.
Here it is with the colormap matching the Imperial College choropleth:
This is what I get from the numbers at :
What explains the Pneumonia epidemic?
I remember in the 80s their excuse for losing money was they had too MUCH work. Now it’s because they have too little.
The good news is Massachusetts had the lowest basic reproduction numbers in the nation last week:
‘s estimates have MA as most likely right now
The Global Financial Crisis (2008) was the beginning of the End, which will last until 2023.
Yes, but non-literal truths undergo further selective pressure over the generations and get baked into the culture. Introducing ideologies pollutes these delicate ecological niches and threatens the survival of the society. Best to stick with the small lies.
From our vantage point in Arizona, it was basically Northern Minnesota. Nothing as stark a contrast as the southern border.
A vector, starting at the center of the earth ?, and going through you.
America’s hat
Eschew highly processed food in favor of the diet your anscestors ate over the generations
My grandmother gave all of us grand kids lessons on speed reading in the 70s. It was the weirdest thing.
You also have to have fast-focus pupils.
Even if there were 600,000 already-infected Swedes, it would take them until 2052 at today's case rate.nnhttps://t.co/amB7edy7tr() + timedelta(days=int((0.6*10_230_000-600_000)/466))n&gt;&gt;&gt; (2052, 11, 30)
“Mr Giesecke reckons that Stockholm will reach ‘herd immunity’, the 40-60% rate of infection needed to halt the spread of the coronavirus, by June.” How is he computing this?
Can you suggest something for the seven text elements? I'll reproduce this without the text, but it would be nice to have something.
What is the text in the image on the right?

Every Rubin Report Ever | FreedomToons  via
Well, it turns out it’s just as easy to dismiss as any other pundits opinions.
They should gamify the compliance to make it a fun experience.
mentions this in his new book.
"For starters, he was literally Hitler, before that was common." ?
“Simon, Simon, behold, Satan has demanded permission to sift you like wheat; but I have prayed for you, that your faith may not fail.”
Hey Jeremy, what would you think of posting about Christian Atheism to /r/Atheism ()? You could practice by answering the Quora question "What is Atheistic Christianity?" ()?
Never hide unpleasant truths from yourself in a technological fog.
It would be great if you could cite a paper or two that demonstrates the inevitable destabilization of systems of competing creative agents. We have the resentful and the rent seekers clouding the issue.
The fundamental source of inequality is the natural laws that govern competing populations of creative agents: Price’s Law, Pareto (or Log-normal) Distribution of Productivity, Darwinian law of differential fitness, et al.
We treated our boys like crap during Vietnam and are trying to make up for that. But the consensus, including among our war fighters, is not that of unconditional respect.
Towards your critique: we can only reach the ideals of Marx by rejecting supply/demand denialism. We are not going to get to the Age of the Spirit/Logos/Sophia by denying basic laws of economics. Hence the promise of ophanocracies.
Can you link to it? Most critiques are that he’s out of his element in some trivial matter.
Arizona: a ray of sunshine in an otherwise bureaucrats-change-what-time-it-is kind of world
Good explanation, and I think you should add something about the primacy of evolution and the need to explore its logical consequences.
It’s one step down the road to totalitarian hell. As each individual is encouraged to make one small compromise, that next step will be that much easier, and the fog of lies gets that much thicker.
Well, this conspiracy HAS been on Reddit for quite a number of years.
He said it only accounted for 5% of the variance of a multi variate regression analysis. You can look up the other factors yourself.
Was it book-based or actually movie-based? Also, the trivia-answering skill is not the same as the trivia-knowing skill. Source: I’m on a prize-winning trivia team.
For example, one of the scenarios we can imagine for the future creates a black hole which sucks in the entire inner solar system for energy production. We continue to grow at the subatomic level.
The Adjective-Profession-Name formulation and “No Living Heroes” theory explained:
"But, unfortunately, I am not buying his signed doormat." I guess that refers to the book that he had brought up?
I can just hear the marketing department in the postmortem arguing against the in house outrage culture: “I beg you! We must continue these dialogues. They are going to catapult our ratings.”
So probably personal core integrity like not lying to yourself/others accounts for a larger percentage of long-term success?
Capitalists aren't selfish and greedy. They're empathetic:
Interestingly, thousands of years of Judeo-Christian religious evolution has resulted in the same conclusion, if by "worthless" you mean worth the Blood of God's Son.
I would say Cathy did an efficient and thorough job of bringing up all the points her viewers would.
"The woman IS life and not about life so that her mission is to return man from the form to the content of life." /2
Wikipedia says he died in 1983. Here is another good quote: "The genuine mission of women is to show the insufficiency, one-sidedness, and hence the awful harm and evil of the reduction of life to structures. /1
Dmitrievich Schmemann was an influential Orthodox Christian priest who kept a good diary. He taught in the late 50's.
From Alexander Schmemann: "The reduction of life exclusively to structures, impersonal and objective, is the sin of the male world." And further, "The main mistake of contemporary feminism is the acceptance of these structures: fighting for one’s place" in them.
A lot of things crypto assume omnicompetence - that the entire population of users can memorize and regurgitate numerous complex character strings at will.
I messed around with the data a little bit:   - I'll work on it some more later.
Watch: Cathy Newman’s catastrophic interview with Jordan Peterson
So, central bank-based bubble pop?
My app is not letting me message you - could you message me (and I’ll reply)?
The tribe had a Minecraft going-away party for us:
In the Skills-Dump.csv, I can't find any parent pointers in the skill dictionaries. How do you create a graph of skills from this?
When we went to bed, it was “a flesh-stinging cold and a bitter wind”. Now it’s just minus seventeen. No poetic descriptions possible.
Had to retweet and delete, but, yeah, I got it.
Check this #opensource #SkillProject by  and . Crowdsourced list of the dwindling skills humans still have!
Corp dudes: implement this
The dubbing actually helps me settle a disagreement with myself on the idea that Trump has always been great at getting results in the midst of concerted opposition.
How did he respond? That would’ve been hilarious to watch
Much needed mindset change/orthopraxy. If you have saved just $5 in  back when it was a year old, every week, you’d have over $40K saved by now.
Can an analogy be made between the messiness and biochemical pathway contradictions of Life and the messiness and self-contradictions of any particular religionists conception of the Creator?
My dog isn’t a whiner, UNLESS THERE’S A HALF-EMPTY WATER BOTTLE SITTING THERE then he insists you give it to him so he can chew on it
Can a naturalist balance between all centers?
Verizon JetPacks are very slow:
Take up your cross, integrate your shadow, and radiate the potential for havoc:
From Wikipedia: a Stand is a supernatural ability.
Who's JoJo? The singer?
"In his errors a man is true to type. Observe the errors and you will know the man" ~ Analects
“I will play for higher stakes than you will” - Integrated Aggression vs Cowardice Disguised as Morality  via
Don't tell me: that food has been in there since last year, right?
When she said her second line in the movie, I was like "I assumed she just had a bit part ?". When she moved the plot line a second time, I was thinking "I assumed she'd be off screen by now ?." When she helped her partner grow as a human being I was truly glad she was there.
Programming rules for how punctuation and quotation marks interact preserve the scope of the quoted section and we programmers are adopting the convention in our English writing
I still remember 2017 like it was yesterday
You could come directly from the outdoors today into a walk-in freezer and feel warmer. Source: me
Ochlochracy is a form of ophanocracy?
Start GitHub repository of all my deep learning projects; take more Coursera classes
So an HR Bot just locked me out of my laptop
There’s a three month periodicity for that. Is it related to something that happens every quarter IRL?
During a transfer at the company I work for, I was inadvertently “fired” and rehired. Enter the HR Bots, who have spooled off a dizzying array of “terminated employee” and “new employee” processes that have spammed my inbox.
Ahriman is the devil you know, just saying...
An unlimited number of social networking services could also come into existence. Does this dilute the value of Facebook? Is a commodity the best way to describe a social media app?
Technically I lost the private key to a wallet. It was the only copy. I was not clear on the concept of keeping backups
I lost a thumb drive containing what is now a half a million USD worth of bitcoin. Not a big deal back in 2012.
3 cases of whooping cough at our daycare
We’re having a harder time this year telling the difference between rigorous social sciences terminology and ideologically motivated slurs and epistemological manipulations.
In the story it is left perfectly ambiguous what God’s requirements are so that we can focus on the two ways of dealing with the suffering that is part of Existing
When will #Coinbase get in the “too big to fail” zone?
Tulip Mania: it's a slur, not an argument.
The S &amp; P data points were all averaged, so that's probably why the volatility metric is so low
I did the sd log standard of volatility (over roughly the same time period from the opening of #Coinbase to the present) on a few select datasets: the #SP500 was 0.08, #Walmart was 0.11, and #Bitcoin was 1.22!
Doesn't every hetero male see the divine feminine impulse in action in the process of love at first sight? If not, what would it look like?
The institution of slavery was defended using social contract arguments:nhttps://t.co/euZo0rTWCl
Nobody wants to hear this but if you'd just put $5 a week into #coinbase since it opened you'd have $USD 20K right now
I refer to it as demand/supply denialism, but I’m open to better labels.
Does it yield a github page?
Charles, are you familiar with the Dave Winer, the inventor of blogs and RSS syndication?
As soon as he said bitcoin should be banned, we bought some. What other actions should I take?
True. My problem is though I can quickly see the potential for what you’re doing (and can get on the ground floor if I want), I’m not industrious and conscientious enough to implement anything.
Yeah, when we met, first thing that Charles guy did was rag on me about how long it took me to get my MS! :-)
Here’s my attempt
The free market is always more responsive to the needs of the customer.
"Sure, you can print out a bitcoin on a piece of paper" - actually, you are just printing out the public key of a wallet. It could be empty.
Reddit has been blanketed with Net Neutrality activism
I saw this in my browser toolbar and got a little thrill:
This is meant long-term: reputation and character development, not micromanagement. If you see a trend, nip it in the bud.
It looks like the more “Britishized” the country, the higher the standard of living. What ruiner are you comparing them to?
Mask: Socialism, Underneath: Will to Negate Life
I think they’re trying to STOP an argument from happening.
The US income tax was originally only supposed to be applied to the rich, also.
Yeah, I remember Nick’s pessimism about it. But he is ALWAYS cranky. :-)
He was going through the social signals a man would step through in an escalation with another man, and how there were a few steps on the end that are missing from social norms if a woman did the escalating.
Exactly. From the video you get that Peterson is personally grappling with the fact that the fifty-year-old Social Norms he was raised on don’t prepare him to deal with verbal violence from females.
In the Camille Paglia discussion, Peterson leaves it ambiguous what would provoke a shoving match and doesn’t mention Nazis
"[There] is an increasing tendency among modern men to imagine themselves ethical  because they have delegated their vices to larger and larger groups." Hayek
"It seems to be almost a law of human nature that it is easier for people to agree on a negative program — on the hatred of an enemy, on the envy of those better off — than on any positive task." Hayek
The voices could easily be unpublished content from the first movie.
The practicality of free market is that it marshals the resources of both those with noble motives and those with ignoble motives toward negotiating the catastrophe of existence.
The message actually reads: “Free lunch, everyone welcome”
“Why do I put parentheses around the if and return predicates?!? You betrayed me with print!! I will never! Trust you! Again!” Something like that. :-)
A rude awakening to the sometimes necessary inclusion of parentheses
“Guided by the finger, [a] person should see the moon. If he looks at the finger instead and mistakes it for the moon, he loses not only the moon but the finger also. Why? It is because he mistakes the pointing finger for the bright moon.” Shurangama
Then there’s Dave Winer, who wrote UserLand Frontier and developed RSS
I want a good day to be a better person and get a better question about this situation?
So, students have to be kept unaware of their exposure in order not to be considered blocked? You need a certain number of “useful idiots”?
Don’t forget the supply/demand denialists
Don’t forget the Ten Commandments, Christianity, and Psychotherapy
So, the first of the Four Noble Truths of Buddhism can also be discovered by robots?
“I have only ever made one prayer to God, a very short one: ‘O Lord, make my enemies ridiculous.’ And God granted it.” Voltaire
Science is about personal honesty:
Also a “ruler” could be a deistic “architect” - like Satoshi - who has no power to change it later.
So, Bitcoin is like a mountain range, then, a “structure” without a “legal owner that has the authority and capacity to make changes”?
You don’t consider the fact that there is now more than one crypto currency to be the case that evolution has been “added”?
If you consider “walls” to be “rules”, then any physical architecture
Of the 4 modes of Lessigian crowd control (laws, norms, markets, and architecture), r-w/o-r sounds most like a description of architecture
There's a patch of grass near where I live where many apartment dwellers take their pets to urinate. I'm telling you: it's Twitter for dogs!
Humanity has only been aware of the problem for 0.0016% of their history.
“Everyone thinks of changing society and nobody thinks of changing himself” — Leo Tolstoy
Who do you prefer?
Looks like they trimmed out the we-got-a-group-photo-with-Buterin connections
There’s only one way to improve society. Present it with a single improved unit: yourself. — Albert Jay Nock
We should start a campaign to get them to.
So their logic is “Exchanges get hacked therefore Banks (with private blockchains) won’t get hacked”?
Socialism precludes “entrepreneurs who [confidently] imagine they will create greater value for consumers”: disheartened? Confused?
The time for ophanocracy has arrived:
The path from tolerance to SJWism:
We need an app for this
Where does one find all necessary principles of knowledge and criteria of truth and meaning?
Doesn't quite have his style - is this a forgery?
"It is easy to be 'conspicuously compassionate' if others are being forced to pay the cost." Murray Rothbard
"Laws must protect us" - sounds naive. Maybe you could clarify.
When you vectorize a sequence of words it allows you to do surprisingly simple math, like "king" - "man" + "woman" = "queen".
It didn't need to be flattened - that was just for a human to visualize what was going on. The author is right about this being old hat.
That brings to mind the pompous blowhard who starts off with "as a wife and mother..." Note taken.
Or TVs! One would have to do a statistical analysis using some metric like book-feet of regulatory text to establish a correlation
The more regulated and politicized the consumer good, the more positive the price change.
There is no great intelligence without some touch of madness. Aristotle
Great optics, great cinematography. Thumbs up to the camera crew for this.
IQ is of predictive power for individual socioeconomic and national outcomes, it varies among races, and it can be reliably measured.
I'm pretty sure you can buy birth control at Target for like $9 a month. But if you remove enough market signals, Bernie...
"So long as we fetishize race, we ensure that we will never be rid of the hierarchies it imposes"
There are... positions which must not be contested, commands of the sovereign which must not be obeyed. Sun Tzu
The word you're searching for is Ophanocracy
"They have sealed her in a cave, and I fear there is no going back."
Yeah, I call them "ophanocracies"
This CANNOT become like the gun control debate, where the technically uninformed try to push flawed solutions in an atmosphere of hysteria
Theodicy for Authoritarians: "Why do bad things happen to good governments?"
Internet memes are just baby ? Jungian archetypes evolved in the age of social media
He's still in celebrity outsider mode
Look upon my enemies, for they are many, And they hate me with violent hatred:
Things more disrespectful to the American Flag than kneeling:
That's right: when you're old, force somebody else's kids to take care of you.
Let me stump for monogamy here: it takes a lot of time for a man to learn one particular way (involving a lot of interpersonal skills, etc.)
I get visions of societal collapse as the economic disruption of education cascades into this other domain:
Invigilator: A person who supervises students during an examination; a proctor
That's a reason we have the best "starvationcare" system
You should break the US down by states: that's more equivalent
"Find the heaviest weight you can and pick it up. And that will make you strong. You’re not who you could be."
Field tested, reliable, easily replaceable
And they're called "bridesmaids"?
What's better: GLM or Decision Trees?
Some of the Environmentalist movement is hiding a Nietzschean "will to negate life" - it's hard to get behind those people
I am defeated
I'm hoping for an audiobook or text-to-speech-able version of this when it comes out. I can't read that tiny print.
"Gymnasium"?
Deflation? As in what the electronics industry has experienced for decades? I'm confused as to what that word conveys.
The politics of envy destroys our ability to innovate, but innovation creates the inequalities which destabilize the State
Economic illiteracy breeds supply-demand denialism
Technically, it's the "Spirit of Christ" that's decentralized ?
The Feds should also get rid of insurance subsidies, agricultural subsidies, etc. Texas will then soon eclipse CA as the best place to live
Are they going to address the blockchain?
Solzhenitsyn: "The battleline between good and evil runs through the heart of every man."
All anarcho-capitalists?
[A] cultivated intellect, a delicate taste, a candid, equitable, dispassionate mind, a noble and courteous bearing in the conduct of life
The stock market is where the hands that receive the central bankers fiat put a lot of the extra money
The top entry is the hotel we are staying in; the bottom one is the StarBucks a few steps away
"Now, in his heart, Ahab had some glimpse of this, namely: all my means are sane, my motive and my object mad." Herman Melville, Moby Dick
I, representing most men here, have a problem with sexism. I'm working hard at the cure, but I need help from everyone in the community.
Being a victim all the time means never having to accept responsibility for anything
Do you have the M1 rank over time in a chart we can look at? I remember it went up and down for a while.
Simple solution: allow bank to create savings plans that include a chance to win $$
Lack of an unlicensed, decentralized, pay-as-you-go healthcare industry?
I've tts'd all 30 hours of the Federalist Papers, and after numerous failed attempts, have concluded that you can't quote it on twitter.
No idea is too insane to be off limits to a group infected with a longing to rule:
"The LORD tests the righteous and the wicked, and the one who loves violence His soul hates." Psalms 11:5
#ophanocracy
Why does being true neutral take the most effort?
"And if thou gaze long into an abyss, the abyss will also gaze into thee." Nietzsche
"He who fights with monsters, should be careful lest he thereby become a monster." Nietzsche
"And 'Will to Equality'—that itself shall henceforth be the name of virtue; and against all that hath power will we raise an outcry!"
"Vengeance will we use, and insult, against all who are not like us"—thus do the tarantula-hearts pledge themselves. Zarathrusta
Pepe is the "Mirror of Galadriel" for the victim culture. The right is getting too complex for the usual label-and-dismiss thing I guess.
How do you define "poverty"? We have the richest "poor" people the world has ever seen (in the economies with all the wealthy entrepreneurs)
Bayesian inference: when you can never be absolutely certain.
“Science is the Belief in the Ignorance of Experts” — Richard Feynman
It's these authoritarian idealists who inadvertently run cover for the violent who scare me ?
It should be temporarily hosted in LA until the committee can develop a business model that generates enough for other host cities.
for i in range(1,101): print("FizzBuzz"[i*i%3*4:8--i**4%5] or i)
No if-then statements!
The California National Guard can take the EU in a drill weekend:
Timeless
The purpose of government is to limit your competition:
I propose that the 5-9 year old girls are just innocent bystanders.
Tastes just like those large cans of fizzy fruity alcoholic drinks you buy at the gas station:
Reengineer the TX Holdem AI for maximum payouts?
A better UX would be to vibrate your seat ? or something
To be meaningful, a discontinuity design must be such that the individuals on the left == those on the right except for the treatment.
Sweden, Denmark, Iceland, Norway, et al, have no legal minimum wage, but of course they're distressed hell holes of concentrated poverty. /s
Is the OT really more focused on hate than love? I did a simple word count of the KJV:
Time to resurrect evictionism:
I fully expect a government to co-opt an ophanocracy (governance solution stack running on top of the "cockroach") to perpetuate themselves
Yeah, when I saw that I was thinking that was totally off base.
"Over 90% of disinvitation attempts over racial..., gender, immigration, Islam, and local politics... were from the left of the speaker."
Before twitter, politicians took months to contradict themselves in print:
That "hands-comb" pun Katie told at the beginning went right over Ben's head. Wooosh!!!
When the robots come to take our jobs, it might be better to have no minimum wage at all. Everything is going to cost less anyway.
Shoot! Let  know: she needs the exposure.
You should make one comparing it to the internet cabling system: somehow it's in private hands yet nobody worries about blockages.